Table of Contents
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☑ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ________ to ________
Commission
File
NumberExact name of registrants as specified in their
charters, address of principal executive offices and
registrants' telephone numberIRS Employer
Identification
Number
1-8841 NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. 59-2449419
2-27612 FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY 59-0247775
700 Universe Boulevard
Juno Beach, Florida 33408
(561) 694-4000
State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization:  Florida
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Registrants Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange
on which registered
NextEra Energy, Inc. Common Stock, $0.01 Par Value NEE New York Stock Exchange
4.872% Corporate Units NEE.PRO New York Stock Exchange
5.279% Corporate Units NEE.PRP New York Stock Exchange
6.219% Corporate Units NEE.PRQ New York Stock Exchange
Florida Power & Light Company None
Indicate by check mark if the registrants are well-known seasoned issuers, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act of 1933.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrants are not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☐  No ☑                                                                     Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☐     No ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants (1) have filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding
12 months, and (2) have been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants have submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S‑T during
the preceding 12 months.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants are a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth
company.
NextEra Energy, Inc. Large Accelerated Filer ☑ Accelerated Filer ☐ Non-Accelerated Filer ☐ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
Florida Power & Light Company Large Accelerated Filer ☐ Accelerated Filer ☐ Non-Accelerated Filer ☑ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrants have elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial
accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether each registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over financial
reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants are shell companies (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934).  Yes ☐    No ☑
Aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity of NextEra Energy, Inc. held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2020 (based on the closing market price on the
Composite Tape on June 30, 2020) was $117,405,158,883.
There was no voting or non-voting common equity of Florida Power & Light Company held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2020.
Number of shares of NextEra Energy, Inc. common stock, $0.01 par value, outstanding at January 31, 2021: 1,959,874,682
Number of shares of Florida Power & Light Company common stock, without par value, outstanding at January 31, 2021, all of which were held, beneficially and of record, by
NextEra Energy, Inc.: 1,000
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of NextEra Energy, Inc.'s Proxy Statement for the 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference in Part III hereof.
__________________________________
This combined Form 10-K represents separate filings by NextEra Energy, Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company. Information contained herein relating to an individual
registrant is filed by that registrant on its own behalf. Florida Power & Light Company makes no representations as to the information relating to NextEra Energy, Inc.'s other
operations.
Florida Power & Light Company meets the conditions set forth in General Instruction I.(1)(a) and (b) of Form 10-K and is therefore filing this Form with the reduced disclosure
format.
Table of Contents
DEFINITIONS
Acronyms and defined terms used in the text include the following:
Term Meaning
AFUDC - equity equity component of allowance for funds used during construction
Bcf billion cubic feet
CAISO California Independent System Operator
capacity clause capacity cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
DOE U.S. Department of Energy
environmental clause environmental cost recovery clause
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
ERCOT Electric Reliability Council of Texas
FERC U.S. Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
Florida Southeast Connection Florida Southeast Connection, LLC, a wholly owned NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary
FPL the legal entity, Florida Power & Light Company, and prior to the merger of FPL and Gulf Power, an operating segment of NEE
FPL segment post-merger, FPL, excluding Gulf Power, and an operating segment of NEE and FPL
FPSC Florida Public Service Commission
fuel clause fuel and purchased power cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
GAAP generally accepted accounting principles in the U.S.
GHG greenhouse gas(es)
Gulf Powerprior to January 1, 2021, the legal entity, Gulf Power Company, and an operating segment of NEE; thereafter, an operating division of
FPL and operating segment of FPL and NEE
ISO independent system operator
ISO-NE ISO New England Inc.
ITC investment tax credit
kW kilowatt
kWh kilowatt-hour(s)
Management's Discussion Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
MISO Midcontinent Independent System Operator
MMBtu One million British thermal units
mortgage mortgage and deed of trust dated as of January 1, 1944, from FPL to Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as supplemented and
amended
MW megawatt(s)
MWh megawatt-hour(s)
NEE NextEra Energy, Inc.
NEECH NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc.
NEER an operating segment comprised of NextEra Energy Resources and NEET
NEET NextEra Energy Transmission, LLC
NEP NextEra Energy Partners, LP
NEP OpCo NextEra Energy Operating Partners, LP
NERC North American Electric Reliability Corporation
net capacity net ownership interest in pipeline(s) capacity
net generating capacity net ownership interest in plant(s) capacity
net generation net ownership interest in plant(s) generation
Note __ Note __ to consolidated financial statements
NextEra Energy Resources NextEra Energy Resources, LLC
NRC U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission
NYISO New York Independent System Operator
O&M expenses other operations and maintenance expenses in the consolidated statements of income
OEB Ontario Energy Board
OTC over-the-counter
OTTI other than temporary impairment
PJM PJM Interconnection, LLC
PMI NextEra Energy Marketing, LLC
Point Beach Point Beach Nuclear Power Plant
PTC production tax credit
PUCT Public Utility Commission of Texas
PV photovoltaic
Recovery Act The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, as amended
regulatory ROE return on common equity as determined for regulatory purposes
RPS renewable portfolio standards
RTO regional transmission organization
Sabal Trail Sabal Trail Transmission, LLC, an entity in which a NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary has a 42.5% ownership interest
Seabrook Seabrook Station
SEC U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
storm protection plan storm protection plan cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
tax reform Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
U.S. United States of America
NEE, FPL, NEECH, NextEra Energy Resources and NEET each has subsidiaries and affiliates with names that may include NextEra Energy, FPL, NextEra Energy Resources,
NextEra Energy Transmission, NextEra, FPL Group, FPL Energy, FPLE, NEP and similar references. For convenience and simplicity, in this report the terms NEE, FPL,
NEECH, NextEra Energy Resources, NEET and NEER are sometimes used as abbreviated references to specific subsidiaries, affiliates or groups of subsidiaries or affiliates.
The precise meaning depends on the context.
2
Table of Contents
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page No.
Definitions 2
Forward-Looking Statements 3
PART I
Item 1. Business 4
Item 1A. Risk Factors 20
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 31
Item 2. Properties 32
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 32
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 32
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrants' Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities33
Item 6. Selected  Financial Data 33
Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 34
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 54
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 55
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 114
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 114
Item 9B. Other Information 114
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 115
Item 11. Executive Compensation 115
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 115
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 115
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 116
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules 117
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 124
Signatures 125
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This report includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securitie s Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Any
statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, strategies, future events or
performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as may result, are expected to, will continue, is
anticipated, believe, will, could, should, would, estimated, may, plan, potential, future, projection, goals, target, outlook, predict and
intend or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forwar d looking. Forward-looking statements
involve estimates, assumptions and uncertaintie s. Accordingly , any such statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and
are accompanied by, important factors included in Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors (in addition to any assumptions and other factors
referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements) that could have a significant impact on NEE's and/or FPL's
operations and financial results, and could cause  NEE's and/or FPL's actual results to differ materially from those contained or implied in
forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of NEE and/or FPL in this combined Form 10-K, in presentations, on their respective
websites, in response to questions or otherwise.
Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and NEE and FPL undertake no obligation
to update any forward-lo oking statement to reflect events or circumstances, including, but not limited to, unanticipated events, after the
date on which such statement is made, unless otherwise required by law. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for
management to predict all of such factors, nor can it assess the impact of each such factor on the business or the extent to which any
factor , or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those conta ined or implied in any forward-looking
statement.
3
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business
OVERVIEW
NEE is one of the large st electric power and energy infrastructure companies in North America  and a leader in the renewable energy
industry . NEE has two principal businesses, FPL, including Gulf Power , and NEER. FPL is the largest electric utility in the state of Florida
and one of the largest electric utilities in the U.S. FPL’s strategic focus is centered on investing in generation, transmission and
distribution facilities to deliver on its value proposition of low customer bills, high reliability , outstanding customer service and clean
energy solut ions for the benefit of its more than 5.6 million customers. NEER is the world's largest generator of renewable energy from
the wind and sun, as well as a world leader in battery storage. NEER’ s strategic focus is centere d on the development, construction and
operation of long-term contracted assets throughout the U.S. and Canada, primarily consisting of clean energy solutions such as
renewable generation facilities and battery storage projects, and electric transmission facilities.
In January 2019, NEE acquired Gulf Power , a rate-regulated electric utility engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale
of electric energy in northwest Florida. On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However , FPL
will continue  to be regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power until the FPSC
approves consolidation of the FPL and Gulf Power rates and tariffs. FPL has notified the FPSC of its intent to submit such a request as
part of its upcoming base  rate proceeding to be initiated in March 2021 (see FPL - FPL Regulation - FPL Electric Rate Regulation - Base
Rates - FPL 2021 Base Rate Proceeding). FPL and Gulf Power will continue to be separate operating segments of NEE as well as FPL,
through 2021. For purposes of discussion herein, prior to the merger , the use of the term "FPL " represents FPL the legal entity , which
excludes Gulf Power , and "Gulf Power" represen ts Gulf Power Company the legal entity; post-m erger "FPL" represents the legal entity ,
including Gulf Power , "FPL  segment" represents FPL, excluding Gulf Power , and "Gulf Power" represents an operating division of FPL.
As described in more detail in the following sections, NEE seeks to create value in its two principal businesses by meeting its customers'
needs more economicall y and more reliably than its competitors. NEE's strategy has resulted in profitable growth over sustained periods
at both FPL and NEER. Management seeks to grow each business in a manner consistent with the varying opportunities available to it;
however , management believes that the diversification and balance represented by FPL and NEER is a valuable characteristic of the
enterprise and recognize s that each business contributes to NEE's financial strength in different ways. FPL and NEER share a common
platform with the objecti ve of lowering costs and creating efficiencies for their businesses. NEE and its subsidiaries, with employees
totaling approximately 14,900 as of December 31, 2020, continue to develop and implement enterprise-wide initiatives focused on
improving productivity , process ef fectiveness and quality .
NEE's segments for financial reporting purposes are the FPL segment, Gulf Power and NEER.  NEECH, a wholly owned subsidiary of
NEE, owns and provide s funding for NEE's operating subsidiaries, other than FPL and its subsidiaries. NEP, an affiliate of NextEra
Energy Reso urces, acqu ires, manages and owns contracted clean energy projects with stable, long-term cash flows. See NEER section
below for further discussion of NEP . The following diagram depicts NEE's simplified ownership structure:
4
Table of Contents
FPL
FPL is a rate-regulated electric utility engaged primarily in the generation, transmission, distributio n and sale of electric energy in Florida.
FPL is the largest electri c utility in the state of Florida and one of the largest electric utilities in the U.S. At December 31, 2020, FPL had
approximately 28,400 MW of net generating capacity , approximately 76,200  circuit miles of transmission and distribution lines and 673
substations. FPL provides service to its electric customers through integrated transmission and distribution systems that link its
generation facilities to its customers. In 2018, FPL  acquired a retail gas business (see Note 6 - Other).
On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However , FPL will continue to be regulated as two
separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power until the FPSC approves consolidation of the FPL and
Gulf Power rates and tariffs. FPL and Gulf Power will continue to be separate operating segment s of NEE as well as FPL, through 2021.
See FPL - FPL Regulat ion - FPL Electric Rate Regulation - Base Rates - FPL 2021 Base Rate Proceeding and Gulf Power below .
Following the merger , FPL now serves more than 11 million people through more than 5.6 million customer accounts. The following map
shows FPL's  service areas and plant locations, which cover most of the east and lower west coasts of Florida and are in eight counties
throughout northwest Florida (see FPL  Sources of Generation below).
5
Table of Contents
CUSTOMERS AND REVENUE
FPL's primary source of operating revenues is from its retail customer base; it also serves a limited number of wholesale customers
within Florida. The percentage of FPL's operating revenues and customer accounts  by customer class were as follows:
For both retail and wholesale customers, the prices (or rates) that FPL may charge are approved by regulatory bodies, by the FPSC in
the case of retail customers and by the FERC in the case of wholesale customers. In general,  under U.S. and Florida law, regulated
rates are intended to cover the cost of providing service, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital. Since the regulatory
bodies have authority to determine the relevant cost of providing service and the appropriate rate of return on capital employed, there
can be no guarantee that FPL will be able to earn any particular rate of return or recover all of its costs through regulated rates. See FPL
Regulation below .
FPL seeks to maintain attractive rates for its customers. Since rates are largely cost-based, maintaining low rates requires a strategy
focused on developing and maintaining a low-cost position, including the implementation of ideas generated from cost savings
initiatives. A common benchmark used in the electric power industry for comparing rates across companies is the price of 1,000 kWh of
consumption per month for a residential custom er. FPL's 2020 average bill for 1,000 kWh of monthly residential usage was well below
both the average of reporting electric utilities within Florida and the July 2020 national average  (the latest date for which this data is
available) as indicated below:
6
Table of Contents
FRANCHISE AGREEMENTS AND COMPETITION
FPL's service to its electric retail customers is provided primarily under franchise agreements negotiated with municipalities or counties.
During the term of a franchise agreement, which is typically 30 years, the municipality or count y agrees not to form its own utility , and
FPL has the right to offer electric service to residents. At December 31, 2020, FPL held 192 franchise agreements with various
municipalities and counties in Florida with varyi ng expiration dates through 2050. These franchise agreements covered approximately
88% of FPL's retail custo mer base in Florida. At December 31, 2020, FPL also provided service to customers in 11 other municipalities
and to 23 unincorporate d areas within its service area without franchise agreements pursuant to the general obligation to serve as a
public utility . FPL  relies upon Florida law for access to public rights of way .
Because any customer may elect to provide his/her own electric services, FPL effectively must compete for an individual customer's
business. As a practical matter , few customers provide their own service at the present time since FPL's cost of service is lower than the
cost of self-generation for the vast majority of customers. Changing technology , economic conditions and other factors could alter the
favorable relative cost position that FPL currently enjoys; however , FPL seeks as a matter of strategy to ensure that it delivers superior
value, in the form of low customer bills, high reliability , outstanding customer service and clean energy solutions.
In addition to self-generation by residential, commercial and industrial customers, FPL also faces competition from other suppliers of
electrical energy to wholesale customers and from alternative energy sources. In each of 2020, 2019 and 2018, operating revenues from
wholesale and ind ustrial electric customers combined represented approximately five percent of FPL's total operating revenues.
For the building of new steam and solar genera ting capacity of 75 MW or greater , the FPSC requires investor-owned electric utilities,
including FPL, to issue a request for proposal (RFP) except when the FPSC determines that an exception from the RFP process is in
the public interest. The RFP process allows independent power producers and others to bid to supply the new generating capacity . If a
bidder has the most cost-ef fective alternative, meets other criteria such as financial viability and demonstrates adequate expertise and
experience in building and/or operating generating capacity of the type proposed, the investor-owned electric utility would seek to
negotiate a purchased power agreement with the selected bidder and request that the FPSC approve the terms of the purchased power
agreement and, if appropriate, provide the required authorization for the construction of the bidder's generating capacity .
FPL SOURCES OF GENERATION
At December 31, 2020, FPL's resources for serving load consisted of approximately  28,528 MW, of which 28,414 MW were from FPL-
owned facilit ies and 114 MW were available through purchased power agreements. FPL owned and operated 30 units that used fossil
fuels, primar ily natural gas, with generating capacity  of 22,008 MW and had a joint ownership intere st in Scherer Unit No. 4, a coal unit
located in Georgia which it does not operate, with net generating capacity of 634 MW. During 2020, FPL announced plans to retire
Scherer Unit No. 4 in early 2022 (see Note 7 - Jointly-Owned Electric Plants). In addition, FPL owned, or had undivided interests in, and
operated  4 nuclear units with net generating capacity totaling 3,502 MW (see Nuclear Operations below) and owned and operated  32
solar generation facilities with generating capaci ty totaling 2,270 MW. FPL customer usage and operating revenues are typically higher
during the summer months, largely due to the prevalent use of air conditioning in its service area. Occasionally , unusually cold
temperatures during the winter months result in significant increases in electricity usage for short periods of time.
FPL is in the process of modernizing two generating units at its Lauderdale facility to a high-ef ficiency , clean-burning natural gas unit
(Dania Beac h Clean Energy Center). The Dania Beach Clean Energy Center is expected to provide approximately 1,200 MW of
generating capacity and to be in service in 2022. FPL is also in the process of completing the construction of the final nine of twenty
planned 74.5 MW solar power plants dedicated to its SolarT ogether program, a voluntary community solar program approved by the
FPSC that gives certain FPL electric customers an opportunity to participate directly in the expan sion of solar energy and receive credits
on their related monthly customer bill. The final nine plants are expected to be placed in service by mid-2021.
7
Table of Contents
Fuel Sources
FPL relies upon a mix of fuel sources for its generation facilities, the ability of some of its generation facilities to operate on both natural
gas and oil, and on purchased power to maintain the flexibility to achieve a more economical fuel mix in order to respond to market and
industry  developments.
*approximately 71% has dual fuel capability
Significant Fuel and T ransportation Contracts.  At December 31, 2020, FPL  had the following significant fuel and transportation contracts
in place:
•firm transportation contracts with seven different transportation suppliers for natural gas pipel ine capacity for an aggregate
maximum quantity of 3,169,000 MMBtu/day with expiration dates ranging from 2021 to 2042  (see Note 15 - Contracts);
•several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of nuclear fuel with expiration dates
ranging from March 2021 through 2032; and
•short- and medium-term  natural gas supply contracts to provide a portion of FPL's anticipate d needs for natural gas. The
remainder of FPL's natural gas requirements is purchased in the spot market.
Nuclear Operations
At December 31, 2020, FPL owned, or had undivided interests in, and operated the four nuclear  units in Florida discussed below . FPL's
nuclear units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and main tenance outages, including inspections,
repairs and certain other modifications. Scheduled nuclear refueling outages require the unit to be removed from service for variable
lengths of time.
FacilityFPL's Ownership
(MW)Beginning of Next
Scheduled Refueling OutageOperating License
Expiration Date
St. Lucie Unit No. 1 981 April 2021 2036
St. Lucie Unit No. 2    840 August 2021 2043
Turkey Point Unit No. 3 837 October 2021 2052
Turkey Point Unit No. 4 844 March 2022 2053
______________________
(a)    Excludes 147 MW operated by FPL but owned by non-affiliates.
NRC regulations require FPL to submit a plan for decontamination and decommissioning five years before the projected end of plant
operation. FPL's current plans, under the existi ng operating licenses, provide for St. Lucie Unit No. 1 to be shut down in 2036 with
decommissioning activities to be integrated with the dismantlement of St. Lucie Unit No. 2 commencing in 2043. Current plans provide
for the dismantlement of Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 with decommissioning activities commencing in 2052 and 2053, respectively .(a)
8
Table of Contents
FPL's nuclear facilities use both on-site storage pools and dry storage casks to store spent nuclear fuel generated by these facilities,
which are expected to provide suf ficient storage of spent nuclear fuel that is generated at these facilities through license expiration.
FPL ENERGY MARKETING AND TRADING
FPL's Energ y Marketing & Trading division (EMT) buys and sells wholesale energy commodities, such as natural gas, oil and electricity .
EMT  procure s natural gas and oil for FPL's use in power generation and sells excess natural gas, oil and electricity . EMT  also uses
derivative instruments (primarily swaps, options and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent in the purchase and
sale of fuel and electric ity. Substantially all of the results of EMT's activities are passed throug h to customers in the fuel or capacity
clauses. See Management's Discussion - Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity and Note 3.
FPL REGULATION
FPL's operations are subject to regulation by a number of federal, state and other organiza tions, including, but not limited to, the
following:
•the FPSC, which has jurisdiction over retail rates , service area, issuances of securities, planning, siting and construction of facilities,
among other things;
•the FERC, which oversees the acquisition and disposition of generation, transmission and other facilities, transmission of electricity
and natural gas in interstate commerce, proposals to build and operate interstate natural gas pipelines and storage facilities, and
wholesale purchases and sales of electric energy , among other things;
•the NERC, which, through its regional entities, establishes and enforces mandatory reliability standards, subject to approval by the
FERC, to ensure the reliability of the U.S. electric transmission and generation system and to prevent major system blackouts;
•the NRC, which has jurisdiction over the operation of nuclear power plants through the issuance of operating licenses, rules,
regulations and orders; and
•the EPA, which has the responsibility to maintain and enforce national standards under a variety of environmental laws, in some
cases deleg ating authority to state agencies. The EPA also works with industries and all levels of government, including federal and
state governments, in a wide variety of voluntary pollution prevention programs and energy conservation ef forts.
FPL Electric Rate Regulation
The FPSC sets rates at a level that is intended to allow the utility the opportunity to collect from retail customers total revenues (revenue
requirements) equal to its cost of providing service, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital. To accomplish this, the
FPSC uses various ratemaking mechanisms, including, among other things, base rates and cost recovery clauses. Although FPL and
Gulf Power merged effective January 1, 2021, FPL will continue to be regulated as two separate rate making entities until the FPSC
approves consolidation of the FPL  and Gulf Power rates and tarif fs (see FPL  2021 Base Rate Proceeding below).
Base Rates . In general, the basic costs of providing electric service, other than fuel and certain other costs, are recovered through base
rates, which  are designed to recover the costs of constructing, operating and maintaining the utility system. These basic costs include
O&M expen ses, depreciation and taxes, as well as a return on investment in assets used and useful in providing electric service (rate
base). At the time base  rates are established, the allowed rate of return on rate base approxim ates the FPSC's determination of the
utility's estimated weighted-average cost of capital, which includes its costs for outstanding debt and an allowed return on common
equity . The FPSC monit ors the utility's actual regulatory ROE through a surveillance report that is filed monthly with the FPSC. The
FPSC does not provide assurance that any regulatory ROE will be achieved. Base rates are determined in rate proceedings or through
negotiated settlements of those proceedings. Proceedings can occur at the initiative of the utility or upon action by the FPSC. Existing
base rates remain in ef fect until new base rates are approved by the FPSC.
FPL Base Rates Effecti ve January 2017 - In Decemb er 2016, the FPSC issued a final order approving a stipulation and settlement
between FPL and severa l intervenors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2016 rate agreement). Key elements of the 2016 rate agreement,
which became ef fective in January 2017, include, among other things, the following:
•New retail base rates and charges were established resulting in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$400 million beginning January 1, 2017;
◦$211 million beginning January 1, 2018; and
◦ $200 million  beginning April 1, 2019 for a new approximately 1,720 MW natural gas-fired combined-cycle unit in
Okeechobee County , Florida (Okeechobee Clean Energy Center) that achieved commercial operation on March 31,
2019.
9
Table of Contents
•In addition, FPL received  base rate increases in 2018 through 2020 associated with the addition of approximately 1,200 MW of new
solar generating capacity that became operational during that timeframe.
•FPL's allowed regulatory ROE is 10.55%, with a range of 9.60% to 11.60%. If FPL's earned regulatory ROE falls below 9.60%, FPL
may seek retail base rate relief. If the earned regulatory ROE rises above 11.60%, any party with standing, other than FPL, may
seek a review of FPL's retail base rates.
•Subject to certain condit ions, FPL may amortize, over the term of the 2016 rate agreement, up to $1.0 billion of depreciation reserve
surplus plus the reserve amount that remained under FPL's previous rate agreement (approxima tely $250 million), provided that in
any year of the 2016 rate agreement FPL must amortize at least enough reserve to maintain a 9.60% earned regulatory ROE but
may not amortize any reserve that would result in an earned regulatory ROE in excess of 11.60%.
•Future storm restoration costs would be recoverable on an interim basis beginning 60 days from the filing of a cost recovery
petition, but capped at an amount that could produce a surcharge of no more than $4 for every 1,000 kWh of usage on residential
bills during the first 12 months of cost recovery . Any additional costs would be eligible for recovery in subsequent years. If storm
restoration costs exceed $800 million in any given calendar year, FPL may request an increa se to the $4 surcharge to recover
amounts above $400 million. See Note 1 - Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
FPL 2021 Base Rate Proceeding - On January 11, 2021, FPL filed a formal notifi cation with the FPSC indicating its intent to initiate a
base rate proceeding by submitting a four-year rate plan that would begin in January 2022 replacing the 2016 rate agreement. As Gulf
Power legally merged with FPL on January 1, 2021, the notification indicates that the plan will include the total revenue requirements of
the combined utility system, reflecting the legal and operational consolidation of Gulf Power into FPL. The notification also states that,
based on preliminary estimates, FPL expects to request a general base annual revenue requi rement increase of approximately $1.1
billion effective January 2022 and a subsequent annual increase of approximately $615 million effective January 2023. The plan is also
expected to request authority for a Solar Base Rate Adjustment (SoBRA) mechanism to recove r, subject to FPSC review , the revenue
requirements of up to 900 MW of solar projects in 2024 and up to 900 MW in 2025. If the full amount of new solar capacity allowed
under the proposed SoBRA  mechanism were constructed, FPL’s preliminary estimate is that it would result in base rate adjustments of
approximately $140 million in 2024 and $140 million in 2025. The proposed SoBRA  mechanism adjustments would be offset, in part, by
a reduction in FPL’s fuel costs. Under the filing, FPL does not expect to request further adjustments to general base annual revenue
requirements to be effective before January 2026. In addition, FPL expects to propose an allowed regulatory ROE midpoint of 11.50%,
which includ es a 50 basis point incentive for superior performance. FPL expects to file its formal request to initiate a base rate
proceeding in March 2021.
Cost Recovery Clauses . Cost recove ry clauses are designed to permit full recovery of certain costs and provide a return on certain
assets allow ed to be recovered through various clauses. Cost recovery clause costs are recovered through levelized monthly charges
per kWh or kW, depending on the customer's rate class. These cost recovery clause charg es are calculated annually based on
estimated costs and estimated customer usage for the following year, plus or minus true-up adjustments to reflect the estimated over or
under recove ry of costs for the current and prior periods. An adjustment to the levelized charges may be approved during the course of a
year to reflect revised estimates. FPL  recovers costs from customers through the following clauses:
•Fuel - primarily fuel costs, the most significant of the cost recovery clauses in terms of operating revenues (see Note 1 - Rate
Regulation);
•Storm Protection Plan - costs associated with an FPSC-approved transmission and distribution storm protection plan, which
includes costs for hardening of overhead transmission and distribution lines, undergrounding of certain distribution lines and
vegetation management;
•Capacity - primarily certain costs associated with the acquisition of several electric generation facilities (see Note 1 - Rate
Regulation);
•Energy Conservation - costs associated with implementing energy conservation programs; and
•Environmental - certain costs of complying with federal, state and local environmental regulation s enacted after April 1993 and
costs associated with three of FPL's solar facilities placed in service prior to 2016.
The FPSC has the autho rity to disallow recovery  of costs that it considers excessive or imprudently incurred. These costs may include,
among other s, fuel and O&M expenses, the cost of replacing power lost when fossil and nuclear units are unavailable, storm restoration
costs and costs associated with the construction or acquisition of new facilities.
FERC
The Federal Power Act grants the FERC exclus ive ratemaking jurisdiction over wholesale sales of electricity and the transmission of
electricity and natural gas in interstate commerce. Pursuant to the Federal Power Act, electric  utilities must maintain tariffs and rate
schedules on file with the FERC which govern the rates, terms and conditions for the provision of FERC-jurisdictional wholesale power
and transmis sion service s. The Federal Power Act also gives the FERC authority to certify and oversee an electric reliability organization
with authority to establis h and independently enforce mandatory reliability standards applicable to all users, owners and operators of the
bulk-power system. See NERC below . Electric utilities are subject to accounting, record -keeping and reporting requirements
administered by the FERC. The FERC also places certain limitations on transactions between electric utilities and their af filiates.
10
Table of Contents
NERC
The NERC has been certified by the FERC as an electric reliability organization. The NERC's mandate is to ensure the reliability and
security of the North American bulk-power system through the establishment and enforcement of reliability standards approved by
FERC. The NERC's regional entities also enforce reliability standards approved by the FERC. FPL is subject to these reliability
standards and incurs costs to ensure compliance with continually heightened requirements, and can incur significant penalties for failing
to comply with them.
FPL Environmental Regulation
FPL is subject to environmental laws and regulations as described in the NEE Environmental Matters section below . FPL expects to
seek recovery through FPL's and Gulf Power's respective environmental clauses for compliance costs associated with any new
environmental laws and regulations.
FPL HUMAN CAPITAL
FPL had approximately 9,100 employees at December 31, 2020, with approximately 31% of these employees represented by the
International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers  (IBEW), substantially all of which are under a collective bargaining agreement with FPL
that expires January 31, 2022.
GULF POWER
Gulf Power , a part of FPL's rate-regulated electr ic utility system beginning January 1, 2021, is engaged in the generation, transmission,
distribution and sale of electric energy in northwest Florida, and is subject to similar regulatio ns described in FPL - FPL Regulation
above. Gulf Power operates under a separate base rate settlement agreement, which took effect July 1, 2017, that provides for an
allowed regulatory ROE of 10.25%, with a range of 9.25% to 11.25%. As of December 31, 2020, Gulf Power served approximately
474,000 customers in eight counties throughout northwest Florida and had approximately 2,400 MW of primarily fossil-f ueled electric net
generating capacity and 9,500  miles of transmission and distribution lines located primarily in Florida. See FPL - FPL Regulatio n - FPL
Electric Rate Regulation - Base Rates - FPL  2021 Base Rate Proceeding.
On January 1, 2019, NEE completed the acquisition of all of the outstanding common shares of Gulf Power under a stock purchase
agreement with The Southern Company dated May 20, 2018, as amended, for approximately $4.44 billion in cash consideration and the
assumption of approximately $1.3 billion of Gulf Power debt. On January 1, 2021, Gulf Power merged with FPL, with FPL as the
surviving entity. FPL and Gulf Power will continu e to be separate operating segments of NEE as well as FPL, through 2021. See Note 6
- Gulf Power Company and - Merger of FPL  and Gulf Power for further discussion.
NEER
NEER,  comprised of NEE's competitive energy and rate-regulated transmission businesses, is a diversified clean energy business with
a strategy that emphasizes the development, construction and operation of long-term contrac ted assets with a focus on renewable
projects. NEE reports NextEra Energy Resources and NEET , a rate-regulated transmission business, on a combined basis for segment
reporting purposes, and the combined segment is referred to as NEER. The NEER segment currently owns, develops, constructs,
manages and operates electric generation facilities in wholesale energy markets in the U.S. and Canada. NEER, with approximately
23,900 MW of total net generating capacity at December 31, 2020, is one of the largest wholesale generators of electric power in the
U.S., including approximately 23,370 MW of net generating capacity across 38 states and 520 MW of net generating capacity in 4
Canadian provinces. At December 31, 2020 , NEER opera tes facilitie s, in which it has owne rship interests, with a total generating
capacity of 27,300 MW. NEER produces the majority of its electricity from clean and renewable sources as described more fully below .
In addition, NEER deve lops and constructs battery storage projects, which when combined with its renewable projects, serve to
enhance its ability to meet customer needs for a nearly firm generation source. NEER is the world's largest generator of renewable
energy from the wind and sun based on 2020 MWh produced on a net generation basis, as well as a world leader in battery storage.
NEER also owns and operates rate-regulated transmission facilities, primarily in Texas and California, and transmission lines that
connect its electric generation facilities to the electric grid, which are comprised of approximately 215 substations and 1,910 circuit miles
of transmission lines at December 31, 2020.
NEER also engages in energy-related commo dity marketing and trading activities, includin g entering into financial and physical
contracts. These contracts primarily include power and fuel commodities and their related products for the purpose of providing full
energy and capacity requirements services, primarily to distribution utilities in certain markets, and offering customized power and fuel
and related risk manage ment services to wholes ale customers, as well as to hedge the production from NEER's generation assets that
is not sold under long- term power supply agreements. In addition, NEER participates in natural gas, natural gas liquids and oil
production through operating and non-operating ownership interests, and in pipeline infrastructure construction, management and
operations, through either wholly owned subsi diaries or noncontrolling or joint venture interests, hereafter referred to as the gas
infrastructure business. NEER also hedges the expected output from its gas infrastructure production assets to protect against price
movements.
11
Table of Contents
NEP - NEP acqu ires, manages and owns contracted clean energy projects with stable long-term cash flows through a limited partner
interest in NEP OpCo. NEP's projects include energy projects contributed by or acquired from NextEra Energy Resources, as well as
ownership interests in contracted natural gas pipelines acquired from third parties. NextE ra Energy Resources' indirect limited
partnership interest in NEP OpCo based on the number of outstanding NEP OpCo common units was approximately 57.2% at
December 31, 2020.  NextEra Energy Resources accounts for its ownership interest in NEP as an equity method investment with its
earnings/losses from NEP as equity in earnings  (losses) of equity method investees and accou nts for its asset sales to NEP as third-
party sales in its consoli dated financial statements. See Note 1 - Basis of Presentation. At Dece mber 31, 2020, NEP owned, or had an
ownership interest in, a portfolio of 38 wind and solar projects with generating capacity totaling approximately 5,730 MW and in
contracted natural gas pipelines, all located in the U.S. as further discussed in Generation and Other Operations.  NextEra Energy
Resources operates all of the energy projects in NEP's portfolio and its ownership interest in the portfolio's generating capacity was
approximately 3,379 MW at December 31, 2020.
GENERATION AND OTHER OPERATIONS
NEER sells products associated with its generation facilities (energy , capacity , renewable energy credits (RECs) and ancillary services)
in competitive markets in regions where those facilities are located. Customer transactions may be supplied from NEER generation
facilities or from purchases in the wholesale markets, or from a combination thereof. See Markets and Competition below .
At December 31, 2020, NEER managed or partic ipated in the management of essentially all of the following generation projects, natural
gas pipelines and transmission facilities that it wholly owned or in which it had an ownership interest.
12
Table of Contents
Generation Assets and Other Operations
*Primarily natural gas
Generation Assets.
NEER's portfolio of generation assets primarily consist of generation facilities with long-term power sales agreements for substantially all
of their capacity and/or energy output. Information related to contracted generation assets at December 31, 2020 was as follows:
•represented approximately 21,983 MW of total net generating capacity;
•weighted-average remai ning contract term of the power sales agreements and the remaining life of the PTCs associated with
repowered wind facilities of approximately 16 years, based on forecasted contributions to earnings and forecasted amounts of
electricity produced by the repowered wind facilities; and
•contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of nucle ar fuel have expiration dates
ranging from March 2021 through 2033 (see Note 15 - Contracts).
NEER's merchant generation assets primarily consist of generation facilities that do not have long-term power sales agreements to sell
their capacity and/or energy output and therefor e require active marketing and hedging. Merchant generation assets at December 31,
2020 represented approximately 1,913 MW of total net generating capacity , including 1,102 MW from nuclear generation and 805 MW
from other peak generat ion facilities, and are primarily located in the Northeast region of the U.S. NEER utilizes swaps, options, futures
and forwards to lock in pricing and manage the commodity price risk inherent in power sales and fuel purchases.
13
Table of Contents
Other Operations.
Gas Infrastructure Business - At December 31, 2020, NextEra Energy Resources had ownership interests in natural gas pipelines, the
most signific ant of which are discussed below , and in oil and gas shale formations located prima rily in the Midwest and South regions of
the U.S.
Miles
of
PipelinePipeline
Location/Route OwnershipTotal
Net Capacity
(per day)Actual/Expected
In-Service
Dates
Operational:
Texas Pipelines 542 South Texas 53.8% 2.19 Bcf 1950s - 2015
Sabal Trail 517 Southwestern Alabama to Central Florida 42.5% 0.43 Bcf June 2017 - May
2020
Florida Southeast Connection 169 Central Florida to South Florida 100% 0.64 Bcf June 2017
Central Penn Line 185 Northeastern Pennsylvania to Southeastern
Pennsylvania22.3%0.29 Bcf - 0.40
BcfOctober 2018 -
Mid-2022
Under Construction:
Mountain V alley Pipeline 303 Northwestern W est V irginia to Southern
Virginia31.5% 0.63 Bcf 2022
______________________
(a)    A NEP portfolio of seven natural gas pipelines, of which a third party owns a 10% interest in a 120-mile pipeline with a daily capacity of approximately 2.3 Bcf.
Approximately 1.71 Bcf per day of net capacity is contracted with firm ship-or-pay contracts that have expiration dates ranging from 2021 to 2035.
(b)    Ownership percentage based on NextEra Energy Resources limited partnership interest in NEP OpCo common units.
(c)    See Note 15 - Contracts for a discussion of transportation contracts with FPL.
(d)    NEP has an indirect equity method investment in the Central Penn Line (CPL) which represents an approximately 39% aggregate ownership interest in the CPL.
(e)    Completion of construction of the natural gas pipeline is subject to certain conditions, including applicable regulatory approvals and the resolution of legal challenges.
Also, see Note 4 - Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of an impairment charge and Note 15 - Contracts for a discussion of a transportation contract
with a NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary.
Rate-Regulated Transm ission - At December 31, 2020, certain entities within the NEER segment had ownership interests  in rate-
regulated transmission facilities, the most significant of which are discussed below , which facilities are located primarily in ERCOT ,
CAISO and Independent Electricity System Operator (IESO) jurisdictions.
Miles Substations Kilovolt LocationRate
Regulator OwnershipActual/Expected
In-Service
Dates
Operational:
Lone Star 330 6 345 Central Texas PUCT 100% 2013
Trans Bay Cable 53 2 200 DC Northern California FERC 100% 2010
Under Construction:
NextBridge Infrastructure 280 - 230 Ontario, Canada OEB 50% First Quarter of
2022
______________________
(a)    Direct current
In September 2020, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  entered into agreements to acquire GridLiance Holdco, LP and GridLiance GP,
LLC, which owns and operates three FERC-regulated transmission utilities with approximately 700 miles of high-voltage transmission
lines across six states. The acquisition is expected to close in the first half of 2021, and is subject to, among other things, certain
regulatory approvals. See Note 6 - GridLiance.
Customer Supply and Proprietary Power and Gas Trading - NEER provides commodities-related products to customers, engages in
energy-related commodity marketing and trading activities and includes the operations of a retail electricity provider . Through NextEra
Energy Resources subsidiary PMI, NEER:
•manages risk associated with fluctuating commodity prices and optimizes the value of NEER's power generation and gas
infrastructure production assets through the use of swaps, options, futures and forwards;
•sells output from NEER 's plants that is not sold under long-term contracts and procures fossil fuel for use by NEER's
generation fleet;
•provides full energy and capacity requirements to customers; and
•markets and trades energy-related commodity products and provides a wide range of electricity and fuel commodity products
as well as marketing and trading services to customers.(a) (b)
(c)
(c)
(d)(b)
(e)
(a)
14
Table of Contents
NEER Generation Assets Fuel/Technology Mix
NextEra Energy Resources utilized the following mix of fuel sources for generation facilities in which it has an ownership interest:
*Primarily natural gas
Wind Facilities
•located in 20 states in the U.S. and 4 provinces in Canada;
•operated a total generating capacity of 18,551 MW at December 31, 2020;
•ownership interests in a total net generating capacity of 16,073 MW at December 31, 2020;
◦all MW are from contrac ted wind assets located  primarily throughout Texas and the Midwest and West regions of the
U.S. and Canada;
◦ added approximately 2,299 MW of new generating capacity  and repowered wind generating capacity totaling 1,412
MW in the U.S. in 2020 and sold assets to NEP (see Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets and - Sale of
Noncontrolling Ownership Interests ).
Solar Facilities
•located in 27 states in the U.S.;
•operated PV and solar thermal facilities with a total generating capacity of 3,629 MW at December 31, 2020;
•ownership interests in PV and solar thermal facilities with a total net generating capacity of 3,160 MW at December 31, 2020;
◦essentially all MW are from contracted solar facilities located primarily throughout the West and South regions of the
U.S.;
◦added approximately 625 MW of generating capacity in the U.S. in 2020 (see Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets
and - Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests for asset sales, including sales to NEP).
Nuclear Facilities
At December 31, 2020, NextEra Energy Resources owned, or had undivided interests in, and operated the three nuclear units discussed
below . NEER's nuclear units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages,
including inspections, repairs and certain other modifications. Scheduled nuclear refueling outages require the unit to be removed from
service for variable lengths of time.
Facility LocationOwnership
(MW)Portfolio
CategoryNext Scheduled
Refueling OutageOperating License
Expiration Date
Seabrook New Hampshire 1,102 Merchant October 2021 2050
Point Beach Unit No. 1 Wisconsin 595 Contracted March 2022 2030
Point Beach Unit No. 2 Wisconsin 595 Contracted October 2021 2033
______________________
(a)    Excludes 147 MW operated by NEER but owned by non-affiliates.
(b)    NEER sells all of the output of Point Beach Units Nos. 1 and 2 under long-term contracts through their current operating license expiration dates.
(c)    In 2020, NEER filed an application with the NRC to renew both Point Beach operating licenses for an additional 20 years. License renewal is pending.(a)
(b) (c)
(b) (c)
15
Table of Contents
NEER is responsible for all nuclear unit operation s and the ultimate decommissioning of the nuclear units, the cost of which is shared on
a pro-rata basis by the joint owners for the jointly-owned units. NRC regulations require plant owners to submit a plan for
decontamination and decommissioning five years before the projected end of plant operation. NEER's nuclear facilities use both on-site
storage pools and dry storage casks to store spent nuclear fuel generated by these facilities, which are expected to provide sufficient
storage of spent nuclear fuel that is generated at these facilities through current license expiration.
NEER also owns an approximately 70% interest in Duane Arnold Energy Center (Duane Arnold), a nuclear facility located in Iowa that
ceased operations in August 2020. NEER submitted a site-specific cost estimate and plan for decontamination and decommissioning to
the NRC. All spent nucle ar fuel housed onsite is expected to be in long-term dry storage within three years of plant shutdown and until
the DOE is able to take possession. NEER estimates that the cost of decommissioning Duane Arnold is fully funded and expects
completion by approximately 2080.
Policy Incentives for Renewable Energy Projects
U.S. federal, state and local governments have established various incentives to support the development of renewable energy projects.
These incen tives include accelerated tax depreciation, PTCs, ITCs, cash grants, tax abatements and RPS programs. Pursuant to the
U.S. federal Modified Accelerated Cost Recovery  System, wind and solar projects are fully depreciated for tax purposes over a five-year
period even though the useful life of such projects is generally much longer than five years.
Owners of utility-scale wind facilities are eligible to claim an income tax credit (the PTC, or an ITC in lieu of the PTC) upon initially
achieving commercial operation. The PTC is determined based on the amount of electricity produced by the wind facility during the first
ten years of commercia l operation. This incenti ve was created under the Energy Policy Act of 1992 and has been extended several
times. Altern atively , an ITC equal to 30% of the cost of a wind facility may be claimed in lieu of the PTC. Owners of solar facilities are
eligible to claim a 30% ITC for new solar facilities. Previously , owners of solar facilities could have elected to receive an equivalent cash
payment from the U.S. Department of Treasury for the value of the 30% ITC (convertible ITC) for qualifying solar facilities where
construction began before the end of 2011 and the facilities were placed in service before 2017. In order to qualify for the PTC (or an
ITC in lieu of the PTC) for wind or ITC for solar, construction of a facility must begin before a specified date and the taxpayer must
maintain a continuous program of construction or continuous efforts to advance the project to completion. The Internal Revenue Service
(IRS) issued  guidance stating that the safe harbor for continuous efforts and continuous construction requirements will generally be
satisfied if the facility is placed in service no more than four years after the year in which constru ction of the facility began (extended to
five years for a facility that began construction in 2016 or 2017). The IRS also confirmed that retrofitted wind facilities may re-qualify for
PTCs or ITCs pursuant to the 5% safe harbor for the begin construction requirement, as long as the cost basis of the new investment is
at least 80% of the facility’ s total fair value. Tax credits for qualifying wind and solar projects are subject to the following schedule.
Year construction of project begins
2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 20232024 and
beyond
PTC 100 % 80 % 60 % 40 % 60 % 60 % - - -
Wind ITC 30 % 24 % 18 % 12 % 18 % 18 % - - -
Solar ITC 30 % 30 % 30 % 30 % 26 % 26 % 26 % 22 % 10 %
_________________________
(a)    A project must be placed in service no more than four years after the year in which construction of the project began (extended to five years for a facility that began
construction in 2016 or 2017) to qualify for the PTC or ITC.
(b)    Percentage of the full PTC available for wind projects that begin construction during the applicable year.
(c)    Percentage of eligible project costs that can be claimed as ITC by wind projects that begin construction during the applicable year.
(d)    Percentage of eligible project costs that can be claimed as ITC by solar projects that begin construction during the applicable year. ITC is limited to 10% for solar projects
not placed in service before January 1, 2026.
Other countr ies, including Canada, provide for incentives like feed-in-tarif fs for renewable energy projects. The feed-in-tarif fs promote
renewable energy invest ments by offering long-term contracts to renewable energy producers, typically based on the cost of generation
of each technology .
MARKETS AND COMPETITION
Electricity markets in the U.S. and Canada are regional and diverse in character . All are extensively regulated, and competition in these
markets is shaped and constrained by regulation. The nature of the products offered varies base d on the specifics of regulation in each
region. Generally , in addition to the natural constraints on pricing freedom presented by competition, NEER may also face specific
constraints in the form of price caps, or maximum allowed prices, for certain products. NEER's ability to sell the output of its generation
facilities may also be constrained by available transmission capacity , which can vary from time to time and can have a significant impact
on pricing.
The degree and nature of competition is different in wholesale markets than in retail markets. During 2020, 2019 and 2018,
approximately 85% of NEER's revenue was derived from wholesale electricity markets.
Wholesale power generation is a capital-intensive, commodity-driven business with numerous  industry participants. NEER primarily
competes on the basis of price, but believes the green attributes of NEER's generation assets, its creditworthiness and(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
16
Table of Contents
its ability to offer and manage reliable customized risk solutions to wholesale customers are competitive advantages. Wholesale power
generation is a regional business that is highly fragmented relative to many other commodity industries and diverse in terms of industry
structure. As such, there is a wide variation in terms of the capabilities, resources, nature and identity of the companies NEER competes
with depending on the market. In wholesale markets, customers' needs are met through a variety  of means, including long-term bilateral
contracts, standardized bilateral products such as full requirements service and customized supply and risk management services.
In general, U.S. and Canadian electricity markets encompass three classes of services: energy , capacity and ancillary services. Energy
services relate to the physical delivery of power; capacity services relate to the availability of MW capacity of a power generation asset;
and ancillary services are other services that relate to power generation assets, such as load regulation and spinning and non-spinning
reserves. The exact nature of these classes of services is defined in part by regional tariffs. Not all regions have a capacity services
class, and the specific definitions of ancillary services vary from region to region.
RTOs and ISOs exist throughout much of North America to coordinate generation and transmis sion across wide geographic areas and
to run markets. NEER operates in all RTO and ISO jurisdictions. At December 31, 2020, NEER also had generation facilities with
ownership interests in a total net generating capacity of approximately 5,913 MW that fall within reliability regions that are not under the
jurisdiction of an established RTO or ISO, including 3,641 MW within the Western Electricity Coordinating Council and 1,303 MW within
the SERC Reliability Corporation. Although each RTO and ISO may have differing objectives and structures, some benefits of these
entities include regional planning, managing transmission congestion, developing larger wholesale markets for energy and capacity ,
maintaining reliability and facilitating competition among wholesale electricity providers. NEER has operations that fall within the
following R TOs and ISOs:
NEER competes in different regions to differing degrees, but in general it seeks to enter into long-term bilateral contracts for the full
output of its generation facilities. At December 31, 2020, approximately 92% of NEER's net generating capacity was committed under
long-term contracts. Where long-term contracts are not in effect, NEER sells the output of its facilities into daily spot markets. In such
cases, NEER  will frequently enter into shorter term bilateral contracts, typically of less than three  years duration, to hedge the price risk
associated with selling into a daily spot market. Such bilateral contracts, which may be hedges
17
Table of Contents
either for physical delivery or for financial (pricing) offset, serve to protect a portion of the revenue that NEER expects to derive from the
associated generation facility . Contracts that serve the economic purpose of hedging some portion of the expected revenue of a
generation facility but are not recorded as hedges under GAAP  are referred to as “non-qualifying hedges” for adjusted earnings
purposes. See Management's Discussion - Overview - Adjusted Earnings.
Certain facilities within the NEER wind and solar generation portfolio produce RECs and other environmental attributes which are
typically sold along with the energy from the plants under long-term contracts, or may be sold separately from wind and solar generation
not sold under long-term contracts. The purchasing party is solely entitled to the reporting rights and ownership of the environmental
attributes.
While the majority of NEER's revenue is derived from the output of its generation facilities, NEER is also an active competitor in several
regions in the wholesale  full requirements busine ss and in providing structured and customized power and fuel products and services to
a variety of customers. In the full requirements service, typically , the supplier agrees to meet the customer's needs for a full range of
products for every hour of the day, at a fixed price, for a predetermined period of time, thereby assuming the risk of fluctuations in the
customer's volume requirements.
Expanded competition in a frequently changing regulatory environment presents both opportun ities and risks for NEER. Opportunities
exist for the selective acquisition of generation assets and for the construction and operation of efficient facilities that can sell power in
competitive markets. NEER seeks to reduce its market risk by having a diversified portfolio by fuel type and location, as well as by
contracting for the future sale of a significant amount of the electricity output of its facilities.
NEER REGULATION
The energy markets in which NEER operates are subject to domestic and foreign regulation, as the case may be, including local, state
and federal regulation, and other specific rules.
At Decembe r 31, 2020 , essentially  all of NEER's operating indep endent power projects located in the U.S. have received exempt
wholesale generator status as defined under the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005.  Exempt wholesale generators own or
operate a facility exclusiv ely to sell electricity to wholesale customers. They are barred from sellin g electricity directly to retail customers.
While projects with exem pt wholesale generator status are exempt from various restrictions, each project must still comply with other
federal, state  and local laws, including, but not limited to, those regarding siting, construction, operation, licensing, pollution abatement
and other environmental laws.
Additionally , most of the NEER facilities located in the U.S. are subject to FERC regulations and market rules and the NERC's
mandatory reliability standards, all of its facilities are subject to environmental laws and the EPA's environmental regulations, and its
nuclear facilities are also subject to the jurisdict ion of the NRC. See FPL - FPL Regulation for additional discussion of FERC, NERC,
NRC and EPA regulation s. Rates of NEER's rate-regulated transmission businesses are set by regulatory bodies as noted in Generation
and Other Operations - Generation Assets and Other Operations - Other Operations - Rate-Regulated Transmission. With the exception
of facilities located in ERCOT, the FERC has jurisdiction over various aspects of NEER's business in the U.S., including the oversight
and investigation of competitive wholesale energy markets, regulation of the transmission and sale of natural gas, and oversight of
environmental matters related to natural gas projects and major electricity policy initiatives. The PUCT  has jurisdiction, including the
regulation of rates and services, oversight of competitive markets, and enforcement of statutes and rules, over NEER facilities located in
ERCOT .
Certain entities within the NEER segment and their affiliates are also subject to federal and provincial or regional regulations in Canada
related to energy operations, energy markets and environmental standards. In Canada, activitie s related to owning and operating wind
and solar projects and participating in wholesale and retail energy markets are regulated at the provincial level. In Ontario, for example,
electricity generation facilities must be licensed by the OEB and may also be required to complete registrations and maintain market
participant status with the IESO, in which case they must agree to be bound by and comply with the provisions of the market rules for
the Ontario electricity market as well as the mandatory reliability standards of the NERC.
In addition, NEER is subject to environmental laws and regulations as described in the NEE Environmental Matters section below . In
order to better anticipate potential regulatory changes, NEER continues to actively evaluate and participate in regional market redesigns
of existing operating rules for the integration of renewable energy resources and for the purchase and sale of energy commodities.
NEER HUMAN CAPITAL
NEER had approximately 4,900 employees at December 31, 2020. NEER has collective bargaining agreements with the IBEW , the
Utility Workers Union of Amer ica and the Security Police and Fire Professiona ls of America, which collectively represent approximately
13% of NEER's employees. The collective bargaining agreements have approximately two- to five-year terms and expire between June
2021 and September 2022.
18
Table of Contents
NEE ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
NEE and its subsidiaries , including FPL, are subject to environmental laws and regulations, including extensive federal, state and local
environmental statutes, rules and regulations relating to, among others, air quality , water quality and usage, waste management, wildlife
protection and historical resources, for the siting, construction and ongoing operations of their facilities. The U.S. government and
certain state s and regions, as well as the Government of Canada and its provinces, have taken and continue to take certain actions,
such as proposing and finalizing regulations or setting targets or goals, regarding the regulation and reduction of GHG emissions and
the increase of renewable energy generation. The environmental laws in the U.S., including, among others, the Endangered Species
Act, the Migratory Bird Treaty Act, and the Bald and Golden Eagle Protection Act, provide for the protection of numerous species,
including endangered species and/or their habitats, migratory birds and eagles. The environmental laws in Canada, including, among
others, the Species at Risk Act, provide for the recovery of wildlife species that are endangered  or threatened and the management of
species of special conce rn. Complying with these environmental laws and regulations could result in, among other things, changes in
the design and operation  of existing facilities and changes or delays in the location, design, construction and operation of new facilities.
Failure to comply could result in fines, penaltie s, criminal sanctions or injunctions. NEE's rate-regulated subsidiaries expect to seek
recovery for compliance costs associated with any new environmental laws and regulations, which recovery for FPL, including Gulf
Power , would be through their respective environmental clause.
WEBSITE ACCESS TO SEC FILINGS
NEE and FPL make their SEC filings, including the annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports  on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form
8-K, and any amendme nts to those reports, available free of charge on NEE's internet website, www .nexteraenergy .com, as soon as
reasonably practicable after those documents are electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. The information and materials
available on NEE's webs ite (or any of its subsidiaries' or affiliates' websites) are not incorporate d by reference into this combined Form
10-K.
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Name Age Position Effective Date
Miguel Arechabala 59 Executive V ice President, Power Generation Division of NEE
Executive V ice President, Power Generation Division of FPLJanuary 1, 2014
Deborah H. Caplan 58 Executive V ice President, Human Resources and Corporate Services of NEE
Executive V ice President, Human Resources and Corporate Services of FPLApril 15, 2013
Paul I. Cutler 61 Treasurer of NEE
Treasurer of FPL
Assistant Secretary of NEEFebruary 19, 2003
February 18, 2003
December 10, 1997
John W . Ketchum 50 President and Chief Executive Of ficer of NextEra Energy Resources March 1, 2019
Rebecca J. Kujawa 45 Executive V ice President, Finance and Chief Financial Of ficer of NEE
Executive V ice President, Finance and Chief Financial Of ficer of FPLMarch 1, 2019
James M. May 44 Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Of ficer of NEE March 1, 2019
Donald A. Moul 55 Executive V ice President, Nuclear Division and Chief Nuclear Of ficer of NEE
Vice President and Chief Nuclear Of ficer of FPLJanuary 1, 2020
May 17, 2019
Ronald R. Reagan 52 Executive V ice President, Engineering, Construction and Integrated Supply Chain of NEE
Vice President, Engineering and Construction of FPLJanuary 1, 2020
March 1, 2019
James L. Robo 58 Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer of NEE
Chairman of FPLDecember 13, 2013
May 2, 2012
Charles E. Sieving 48 Executive V ice President & General Counsel of NEE
Executive V ice President of FPLDecember 1, 2008
January 1, 2009
Eric E. Silagy 55 President and Chief Executive Of ficer of FPL May 30, 2014
______________________
(a)Information is as of February 12, 2021. Executive officers are elected annually by, and serve at the pleasure of, their respective boards of directors. Except as noted
below, each officer has held his/her present position for five years or more and his/her employment history is continuous. Mr. Ketchum served as Executive Vice
President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of NEE and FPL from March 2016 to February 2019 and NEE’s Senior Vice President, Finance from February 2015 to
March 2016. Ms. Kujawa served as Vice President, Business Management of NextEra Energy Resources from March 2012 to February 2019. Mr. May served as
Controller of NextEra Energy Resources from April 2015 to February 2019. Mr. Moul served as Vice President and Chief Nuclear Officer of NEE from May 2019 to
December 2019. He previously held various roles at several subsidiaries of FirstEnergy Corp., which are energy suppliers involved in the generation, transmission and
distribution of electricity. Mr. Moul was Executive on Special Assignment of FirstEnergy Solutions Corp. from March 2019 to May 2019, President and Chief Nuclear
Officer of FirstEnergy Generation Companies from March 2018 to March 2019, President of FirstEnergy Generation LLC from April 2017 to March 2018 and Senior Vice
President, Fossil Operations and Environmental of FirstEnergy Solutions from August 2015 to April 2017. Mr. Reagan served as Vice President, Engineering and
Construction of NEE from November 2018 to December 2019 and Vice President, Integrated Supply Chain of NEE from October 2012 to November 2018.(a)
19
Table of Contents
Item 1A. Risk Factors
Risks Relating to NEE's and FPL's Business
The business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL are subject to a variety of risks, many of which
are beyond the control of NEE and FPL. These risks, as well as additional risks and uncertainties either not presently known or that are
currently believed to not be material to the business, may materially adversely affect the business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects of NEE and FPL and may cause actual results of NEE and FPL to differ substantially from those that NEE or
FPL currently expects or seeks. In that event, the market price for the securities of NEE or FPL could decline. Accordingly , the risks
described below should be carefully considered together with the other information set forth in this report and in future reports that NEE
and FPL  file with the SEC.
Regulatory, Legislative and Legal Risks
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially adversely affected by the
extensive regulation of their business.
The operatio ns of NEE and FPL are subject to complex and comprehensive federal, state and other regulation. This extensive regulatory
framework, portions of which are more specifically identified in the following risk factors, regula tes, among other things and to varying
degrees, NEE's and FPL's industry , businesses, rates and cost structures, operation and licensing of nuclear power facilities,
construction and operation of electricity generation, transmission and distribution facilities and natural gas and oil production, natural
gas, oil and other fuel transportation, processing and storage facilities, acquisition, disposal, depreciation and amortization of facilities
and other assets, decommissioning costs and funding, service reliability , wholesale and retail competition, and commodities trading and
derivatives transactions. In their business plannin g and in the management of their operations, NEE and FPL must address the effects of
regulation on their busin ess and any inability or failure to do so adequately could have a material adverse effect on their business,
financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected if
they are unable to recover in a timely manner any significant amount of costs, a return on certain assets or a reasonable
return on invested capital through base rates, cost recovery clauses, other regulatory mechanisms or otherwise.
FPL operate s as an electric utility and is subject to the jurisdiction of the FPSC over a wide range of business activities, including,
among other items, the retail rates charged to its customers through base rates and cost recove ry clauses, the terms and conditions of
its services, procurement of electricity for its customers and fuel for its plant operations, issua nces of securities, and aspects of the
siting, construction and operation of its generatio n plants and transmission and distribution systems for the sale of electric energy . The
FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery by FPL of costs that it considers excessive or imprudently incurred and to determine the
level of return that FPL is permitted to earn on invested capital. The regulatory process, which may be adversely affected by the political,
regulatory and economic environment in Florida and elsewhere, limits or could otherwise adversely impact FPL's earnings. The
regulatory process also does not provide any assurance as to achievement of authorized or other earnings levels, or that FPL will be
permitted to earn an acceptable return on capita l investments it wishes to make. NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results
of operations and prosp ects could be materially adversely affected if any material amount of costs, a return on certain assets or a
reasonable return on invested capital cannot be recovered through base rates, cost recovery clauses, other regulatory mechanisms or
otherwise. Certain other subsidiaries of NEE are utilities subject to the jurisdiction of their regulators and are subject to similar risks.
Regulatory decisions that are important to NEE and FPL may be materially adversely affected by political, regulatory and
economic factors.
The local and national political, regulatory and economic environment has had, and may in the future have, an adverse effect on FPSC
decisions with negative consequences for FPL. These decisions may require, for example, FPL to cancel or delay planned development
activities, to reduce or delay other planned capital expenditures or to pay for investments or otherwise incur costs that it may not be able
to recover through rates , each of which could have a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition, results of operations
and prospects of NEE and FPL. Certain other subsidiaries of NEE are subject to similar risks.
FPL's use of derivativ e instruments could be subject to prudence challenges and, if found imprudent, could result in
disallowances of cost recovery for such use by the FPSC.
The FPSC engages in an annual prudence review of FPL's use of derivative instruments in its risk management fuel procurement
program and should it find any such use to be imprudent, the FPSC could deny cost recovery for such use by FPL. Such an outcome
could have a material adverse ef fect on FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Any reductions or modifications to, or the elimination of, governmental incentives or policies that support utility scale
renewable energy , including, but not limited to, tax laws, policies and incentives, RPS or feed-in-tariffs, or the
20
Table of Contents
imposition of additional taxes or other assessments on renewable energy , could result in, among other items, the lack of a
satisfactory market for the development and/or financing of new renewable energy projects, NEER abandoning the
development of renewable energy projects, a loss of NEER's investments in renewable energy projects and reduced project
returns, any of which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEER depe nds heavily on government policies that support utility scale renewable energy and enhance the economic feasibility of
developing and operating wind and solar energy projects in regions in which NEER operates or plans to develop and operate renewable
energy facilities. The federal government, a majority of state governments in the U.S. and portions of Canada provide incentives, such
as tax incen tives, RPS or feed-in-tarif fs, that support or are designed to support the sale of energy from utility scale renewable energy
facilities, such as wind and solar energy facilitie s. As a result of budgetary constraints, political factors or otherwise, governments from
time to time may review their laws and policies that support renewable energy and consider actions that would make the laws and
policies less conducive to the development and operation of renewable energy facilities. Any reductions or modifications to, or the
elimination of, governmental incentives or policies that support renewable energy or the imposition of additional taxes or other
assessments on renewable energy , could resul t in, among other items, the lack of a satisfact ory market for the development and/or
financing of new renewable energy projects, NEER abandoning the development of renewab le energy projects, a loss of NEER's
investments in the projects and reduced project returns, any of which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected as a
result of new or revised laws, regulations, interpretations or ballot or regulatory initiatives.
NEE's and FPL's busine ss is influenced by various legislative and regulatory initiatives, including , but not limited to, new or revised laws,
including international trade laws, regulations, interpretations or ballot or regulatory initiatives regarding deregulation or restructuring of
the energy industry , regulation of the commodit ies trading and derivatives markets, and regulation of environmental matters, such as
regulation of air emissions, regulation of water consumption and water discharges, and regulation of gas and oil infrastructure
operations, as well as associated environmental  permitting. Changes in the nature of the regulation of NEE's and FPL's business could
have a material adverse  effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. NEE and FPL are
unable to predict future legislative or regulatory changes, initiatives or interpretations, although any such changes, initiatives or
interpretations may increase costs and competitive pressures on NEE and FPL, which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's
and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
FPL has limited compe tition in the Florida market for retail electricity customers. Any chang es in Florida law or regulation which
introduce competition in the Florida retail electricity market, such as government incentives that facilitate the installation of solar
generation facilities on residential or other rooftops at below cost or that are otherwise subsidiz ed by non-participants, or would permit
third-party sales of electricity , could have a material adverse effect on FPL's business, financ ial condition, results of operations and
prospects. There can be no assurance that FPL will be able to respond adequately to such regulatory changes, which could have a
material adverse ef fect on FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEER is subject to FERC  rules related to transmission that are designed to facilitate competition in the wholesale market on practically a
nationwide basis by providing greater certainty , flexibility and more choices to wholesale power customers. NEE cannot predict the
impact of changing FERC rules or the effect of changes in levels of wholesale supply and demand, which are typically driven by factors
beyond NEE's control. There can be no assuran ce that NEER will be able to respond adequately or sufficiently quickly to such rules and
developments, or to any changes that reverse or restrict the competitive restructuring of the energy industry in those jurisdictions in
which such restructuring  has occurred. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects.
NEE’ s and FPL’s OTC financial derivatives are subject to rules implementing certain provisions of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform
and Consumer Protection Act and similar international regulations. NEE and FPL cannot predict the impact any proposed or not fully
implemented final rules will have on their ability to hedge their commodity and interest rate risks or on OTC derivatives markets as a
whole, but such rules and regulations could have  a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's risk exposure, as well as reduce market
liquidity and further increase the cost of hedging activities.
NEE and FPL are subject to numerous environmental laws, regulations and other standards that may result in capital
expenditures, increase d operating costs and various liabilities, and may require NEE and FPL to limit or eliminate certain
operations.
NEE and FPL are subje ct to domestic environmental laws, regulations and other standards, including, but not limited to, extensive
federal, state and local environmental statutes, rules and regulations relating to air quality , water quality and usage, soil quality , climate
change, emissions of greenhouse gases, including, but not limited to, carbon dioxide, waste management, hazardous wastes, marine,
avian and other wildlife mortality and habitat protection, historical artifact preservation, natural resources, health (including, but not
limited to, electric and magnetic fields from power lines and substations), safety and RPS, that could, among other things, prevent or
delay the development of power generation, power or natural gas transmission, or other infrastructure projects, restrict or enjoin the
output of some existing facilities, limit the availability and use of some fuels
21
Table of Contents
required for the production of electricity , require additional pollution control equipment, and otherwise increase costs, increase capital
expenditures and limit or eliminate certain operations. Certain subsidiaries of NEE are also subject to foreign environmental laws,
regulations and other standards and, as such, are subject to similar risks.
There are significant capital, operating and other costs associated with compliance with these environmental statutes, rules and
regulations, and those costs could be even more significant in the future as a result of new requi rements and stricter or more expansive
application of existing environmental laws and regulations.
Violations of current or future laws, rules, regulations or other standards could expose NEE and FPL to regulatory and legal
proceedings, disputes with, and legal challenges by, governmental entities and third parties, and potentially significant civil fines, criminal
penalties and other sanctions, such as restrictions on how NEER develops, sites and operates wind facilities. Proceedings could
include, without limitation, litigation regarding property damage, personal injury , common law nuisance and enforcement by citizens or
governmental authorities of environmental requirements. For example, NEER’ s wind facilities operate without take permits under the
Bald and Golden Eagle  Protection Act (BGEP A) and the federal government could seek to prosecute NEER or its wind facility
subsidiaries for the accidental eagle collisions with wind turbines or other structures that occur or may occur at those facilities for
criminal violations of BGEP A if the federal government ultimately disagrees with NEER’ s position that BGEP A’s criminal liability
provisions relate only to hunting and other intentional activities, and do not apply to accidental collisions with wind turbines or other
structures, such as airplanes and buildings.
NEE's and FPL's business could be negativ ely affected by federal or state laws or regulations mandating new or additional
limits on the production of greenhouse gas emissions.
Federal or state laws or regulations may be adopted that would impose new or additional limits on the emissions of greenhouse gases,
including, but not limited to, carbon dioxide and methane, from electric generation units using fossil fuels like coal and natural gas. The
potential effects of green house gas emission limits on NEE's and FPL's electric generation units  are subject to significant uncertainties
based on, among other things, the timing of the implementation of any new requirements, the required levels of emission reductions, the
nature of any market-based or tax-based mechanisms adopted to facilitate reductions, the relative availability of greenhouse gas
emission reduction offsets, the development of cost-ef fective, commercial-scale carbon capture and storage technology and supporting
regulations and liability mitigation measures, and the range of available compliance alternatives.
While NEE's and FPL's electric generation portfolio emits greenhouse gases at a lower rate of emissions than most of the U.S. electric
generation sector , the results of operations of NEE and FPL could be materially adversely affected to the extent that new federal or state
laws or regulations impose any new greenhouse gas emission limits. Any future limits on greenhouse gas emissions could:
•create substantial additional costs in the form of taxes or emissions allowances;
•make some of NEE's and FPL's electric generation units uneconomical to operate in the long term;
•require significant capital investment in carbon capture and storage technology , fuel switching, or the replacement of high-emitting
generation facilities with lower-emitting generation facilities; or
•affect the availability or cost of fossil fuels.
There can be no assurance that NEE or FPL would be able to completely recover any such costs or investments, which could have a
material adverse ef fect on their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Extensive federal regulation of the operations and businesses of NEE and FPL exposes NEE and FPL to significant and
increasing compliance costs and may also expose them to substantial monetary penalties and other sanctions for compliance
failures.
NEE's and FPL's operations and businesses are subject to extensive federal regulation, which generally imposes significant and
increasing compliance costs on their operations and businesses. Additionally , any actual or alleged compliance failures could result in
significant costs and other potentially adverse effects of regulatory investigations, proceedin gs, settlements, decisions and claims,
including, among other items, potentially significant monetary penalties. As an example, under the Energy Policy Act of 2005, NEE and
FPL, as owners and operators of bulk-power transmission systems and/or electric generation facilities, are subject to mandatory
reliability standards. Compliance with these mandatory reliability standards may subject NEE and FPL to higher operating costs and may
result in increased capita l expenditures. If FPL or NEE is found not to be in compliance with these standards, they may incur substantial
monetary penalties and other sanctions. Both the costs of regulatory compliance and the costs that may be imposed as a result of any
actual or alleged compli ance failures could have  a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects.
Changes in tax laws, guidance or policies, including but not limited to changes in corporate income tax rates, as well as
judgments and estimates used in the determination of tax-related asset and liability amounts, could materially adversely affect
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
22
Table of Contents
NEE's and FPL's provisi on for income taxes and reporting of tax-related assets and liabilities require significant judgments and the use
of estimates . Amounts of tax-related assets and liabilities involve judgments and estimates of the timing and probability of recognition of
income, deductions and tax credits, including, but not limited to, estimates for potential adverse  outcomes regarding tax positions that
have been taken and the ability to utilize tax benefit carryforwards, such as net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards. Actual
income taxes could vary significantly from estimated amounts due to the future impacts of, among other things, changes in tax laws,
guidance or policies, including changes in corporate income tax rates, the financial condition and results of operations of NEE and FPL,
and the resolution of audit issues raised by taxing authorities. These factors, including the ultimate resolution of income tax matters, may
result in material adjustments to tax-related assets and liabilities, which could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business,
financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially adversely affected due
to adverse results of litigation.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially affected by adverse results of
litigation. Unfavorable resolution of legal or administrative proceedings in which NEE or FPL is involved or other future legal or
administrative proceedings may have a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects
of NEE and FPL.
Development and Operational Risks
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could suffer if NEE and FPL do not
proceed with projects under development or are unable to complete the construction of, or capital improvements to, electric
generation, transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities or other facilities on schedule or within budget.
NEE's and FPL's ability to proceed with projects under development and to complete constructio n of, and capital improvement projects
for, their electric generat ion, transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities and other facilities on schedule and within
budget may be adverse ly affected by escalating  costs for materials and labor and regulatory compliance, inability to obtain or renew
necessary licenses, rights-of-way , permits or other approvals on acceptable terms or on schedule, disputes involving contractors, labor
organizations, land owners, governmental entitie s, environmental groups, Native American and aboriginal groups, lessors, joint venture
partners and other third parties, negative publicity , transmission interconnection issues and other factors. If any development project or
construction or capital improvement project is not completed, is delayed or is subject to cost overruns, certain associated costs may not
be approved for recovery or otherwise be recoverable through regulatory mechanisms that may be available, and NEE and FPL could
become obligated to make delay or termination payments or become obligated for other damages under contracts, could experience the
loss of tax credits or tax incentives, or delayed or diminished returns, and could be required to write off all or a portion of their investment
in the project. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL face risks related to projec t siting, financing, construction, permitting, governmental approvals and the
negotiation of project development agreements that may impede their development and operating activities.
NEE and FPL own, develop, construct, manage and operate electric-generation and transmission facilities and natural gas transmission
facilities. A key compone nt of NEE's and FPL's growth is their ability to construct and operate generation and transmission facilities to
meet customer needs. As part of these operations, NEE and FPL must periodically apply for licenses and permits from various local,
state, federal and other regulatory authorities and abide by their respective conditions. Should NEE or FPL be unsuccessful in obtaining
necessary licenses or permits on acceptable terms or resolving third-party challenges to such licenses or permits, should there be a
delay in obtaining or renewing necessary licenses or permits or should regulatory authorities initiate any associated investigations or
enforcement actions or impose related penalties or disallowances on NEE or FPL, NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results
of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected. Any failure to negotiate successful project development agreements
for new facilities with third parties could have similar results.
The operation and maintenance of NEE's  and FPL's electric generation, transmiss ion and distribution facilities, gas
infrastructure facilities, retail gas distribution system in Florida and other facilities are subject to many operational risks, the
consequences of which could have a mater ial adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's electric generation, transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities, retail gas distribution system in
Florida and other facilitie s are subject to many operational risks. Operational risks could result in, among other things, lost revenues due
to prolonged outages, increased expenses due to monetary penalties or fines for compliance failures or legal claims, liability to third
parties for property and personal injury damage or loss of life, a failure to perform under applicable power sales agreements or other
agreements and associated loss of revenues  from terminated agreements or liability for liquidated damages under continuing
agreements, and replacement equipment costs or an obligation to purchase or generate replacement power at higher prices.
23
Table of Contents
Uncertainties and risks inherent in operating and maintaining NEE's and FPL's facilities include, but are not limited to:
•risks associated with facility start-up operations, such as whether the facility will achieve projected operating performance on
schedule and otherwise as planned;
•failures in the availability , acquisition or transportation of fuel or other necessary supplies;
•the impact of unusual or adverse weather conditions and natural disasters, including, but not limited to, hurricanes, tornadoes, icing
events, floods, earthquakes and droughts;
•performance below expected or contracted levels of output or ef ficiency;
•breakdown or failure, including, but not limited to, explosions, fires, leaks or other major events, of equipment, transmission or
distribution systems or pipelines;
•availability of replacement equipment;
•risks of property damage , human injury or loss of life from energized equipment, hazardous substances or explosions, fires, leaks or
other events, especially where facilities are located near populated areas;
•potential environmental impacts of gas infrastructure operations;
•availability of adequate water resources and ability to satisfy water intake and discharge requirements;
•inability to identify , manage properly or mitigate equipment defects in NEE's and FPL's facilities;
•use of new or unproven technology;
•risks associated with dependence on a specific type of fuel or fuel source, such as commodity price risk, availability of adequate fuel
supply and transportation, and lack of available alternative fuel sources;
•increased competition due to, among other factors, new facilities, excess supply , shifting demand and regulatory changes; and
•insuf ficient insurance, warranties or performanc e guarantees to cover any or all lost revenues or increased expenses from the
foregoing.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be negatively affected by a lack of
growth or slower growth in the number of customers or in customer usage.
Growth in customer accounts and growth of customer usage each directly influence the demand for electricity and the need for
additional power generation and power delivery  facilities, as well as the need for energy-related commodities such as natural gas.
Customer growth and customer usage are affected by a number of factors outside the contro l of NEE and FPL, such as mandated
energy efficiency measu res, demand side management requirements, and economic and demographic conditions, such as population
changes, job and income growth, housing starts, new business formation and the overall level of economic activity . A lack of growth, or a
decline, in the number of customers or in customer demand for electricity or natural gas and other fuels may cause NEE and FPL to fail
to fully realize the anticip ated benefits from significant investments and expenditures and could have a material adverse effect on NEE's
and FPL's growth, business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects can be materially adversely affected by
weather conditions, including, but not limited to, the impact of severe weather .
Weather conditions directly influence the dema nd for electricity and natural gas and other fuels and affect the price of energy and
energy-related commodities. In addition, severe weather and natural disasters, such as hurricanes, floods, tornadoes, icing events and
earthquakes, can be destructive and cause power outages and property damage, reduce revenue, affect the availability of fuel and
water , and require NEE and FPL to incur additional costs, for example, to restore service and repair damaged facilities, to obtain
replacement power and to access available financing sources. Furthermore, NEE's and FPL's physical plants could be placed at greater
risk of damage should changes in the global climate produce unusual variations in temperature and weather patterns, resulting in more
intense, frequent and extreme weather events, abnormal levels of precipitation and, particularly relevant to FPL, a change in sea level.
FPL operate s in the east and lower west coasts of Florida and in northwest Florida, areas that historically have been prone to severe
weather events, such as hurricanes. A disruption or failure of electric generation, transmission  or distribution systems or natural gas
production, transmission, storage or distribution systems in the event of a hurricane, tornado or other severe weather event, or
otherwise, could preven t NEE and FPL from operating their business in the normal course and could result in any of the adverse
consequences describe d above. Any of the foregoing could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
At FPL and other businesses of NEE where cost recovery is available, recovery of costs to restore service and repair damaged facilities
is or may be subject to regulatory approval, and any determination by the regulator not to permit timely and full recovery of the costs
incurred could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Changes in weather can also affect the production of electricity at power generation facilities, including, but not limited to, NEER's wind
and solar facilities. For example, the level of wind resource affects the revenue produced by wind generation facilities. Because the
levels of wind and solar resources are variable and difficult to predict, NEER's results of operations for individual wind and solar facilities
specifically , and NEE's results of operations generally , may vary significantly from period to
24
Table of Contents
period, depending on the level of available resources. To the extent that resources are not available at planned levels, the financial
results from these facilities may be less than expected.
Threats of terrorism and catastrophic events that could result from terrorism, cyberattacks, or individuals and/or groups
attempting to disrupt NEE's and FPL's business, or the businesses of third parties, may materially adversely affect NEE's and
FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL are subject to the potentially adverse operating and financial effects of terrorist acts and threats, as well as cyberattacks
and other disruptive activities of individuals or groups. There have been cyberattacks within the energy industry on energy infrastructure
such as substations, gas pipelines and related assets in the past and there may be such attacks in the future. NEE's and FPL's
generation, transmission  and distribution facilities, fuel storage facilities, information technology systems and other infrastructure
facilities and systems could be direct targets of, or otherwise be materially adversely af fected by , such activities.
Terrorist acts, cyberattacks or other similar events affecting NEE's and FPL's systems and facilities, or those of third parties on which
NEE and FPL rely, could  harm NEE's and FPL's business, for example, by limiting their ability to generate, purchase or transmit power ,
natural gas or other energy-related commodities, by limiting their ability to bill customers and collect and process payments, and by
delaying their development and construction of new generation, distribution or transmission facilities or capital improvements to existing
facilities. These events, and governmental actio ns in response, could result in a material decrease in revenues, significant additional
costs (for example, to repair assets, implement additional security requirements or maintain or acquire insurance), significant fines and
penalties, and reputational damage, could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's operations (for example, by contributing to
disruption of supplies and markets for natural gas, oil and other fuels), and could impair NEE's and FPL's ability to raise capital (for
example, by contributing to financial instability and lower economic activity). In addition, the implementation of security guidelines and
measures has resulted in and is expected to continue to result in increased costs. Such events or actions may materially adversely
affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
The ability of NEE and FPL to obtain insurance and the terms of any available insurance coverage could be materially
adversely affected by international, national, state or local events and company-specific events, as well as the financial
condition of insurers. NEE's and FPL's insurance coverage does not provide protection against all significant losses.
Insurance coverage may not continue to be available or may not be available at rates or on terms similar to those presently available to
NEE and FPL. The ability of NEE and FPL to obtain insurance and the terms of any available insurance coverage could be materially
adversely affected by international, national, state or local events and company-specific event s, as well as the financial condition of
insurers. If insurance coverage is not available or obtainable on acceptable terms, NEE or FPL may be required to pay costs associated
with adverse future events. NEE and FPL generally are not fully insured against all significan t losses. For example, FPL is not fully
insured against hurricane-related losses, but could instead seek recovery of such uninsured losses from customers subject to approval
by the FPSC, to the extent losses exceed restricted funds set aside to cover the cost of storm damage. A loss for which NEE or FPL is
not fully insured could have a material advers e effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEE invests in gas and oil producing and transmission assets through NEER’ s gas infrastructure business. The gas
infrastructure busines s is exposed to fluctuating market prices of natural gas, natura l gas liquids, oil and other energy
commodities. A prolonged period of low gas and oil prices could impact NEER’ s gas infrastructure business and cause NEER
to delay or cancel certain gas infrastructure projects and could result in certain projects becoming impaired, which could
materially adversely affect NEE's results of operations.
Natural gas and oil price s are affected by supply and demand, both globally and regionally . Factors that influence supply and demand
include operational issues, natural disasters, weather , political instability , conflicts, new discoveries, technological advances, economic
conditions and actions by major oil-producing countries. There can be significant volatility in market prices for gas and oil, and price
fluctuations could have a material effect on the financial performance of gas and oil producing and transmission assets. For example, in
a low gas and oil price environment, NEER would generate less revenue from its gas infrastructure investments in gas and oil producing
properties, and as a result certain investments might become less profitable or incur losses. Prolonged periods of low oil and gas prices
could also result in the delay or cancellation of oil and gas production and transmission projects, could cause projects to experience
lower returns, and could result in certain projects becoming impaired, which could materially adversely affect NEE's results of
operations.
If supply costs necessary to provide NEER's full energy and capacity requirement services are not favorable, operating costs
could increase and materially adversely affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEER provides full energy and capacity requirements  services primarily to distribution utilities, which include load-following services and
various ancillary services, to satisfy all or a portion of such utilities' power supply obligations to their customers. The supply costs for
these transactions may be affected by a number of factors, including, but not limited to, events that may occur after such utilities have
committed to supply power , such as weather conditions, fluctuating prices for energy and ancillary
25
Table of Contents
services, and the ability  of the distribution utilities' customers to elect to receive service from competing suppliers. NEER may not be
able to recover all of its increased supply costs, which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects.
Due to the potential for significant volatility in market prices for fuel, electricity and renewable and other energy commodities,
NEER's inability or failure to manage properly or hedge effectively the commodity risks within its portfolios could materially
adversely affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
There can be significant  volatility in market prices for fuel, electricity and renewable and other energy commodities. NEE's inability or
failure to manage properly or hedge effectively its assets or positions against changes in commodity prices, volumes, interest rates,
counterparty credit risk or other risk measures, based on factors that are either within, or wholly or partially outside of, NEE's control,
may materially adversely af fect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Reductions in the liquidity of energy markets may restrict the ability of NEE to manage its operational risks, which, in turn,
could negatively affect NEE's results of operations.
NEE is an active particip ant in energy markets. The liquidity of regional energy markets is an important factor in NEE's ability to manage
risks in these operations. Market liquidity is driven in part by the number of active market participants. Liquidity in the energy markets
can be adversely affected by price volatility , restrictions on the availability of credit and other factors, and any reduction in the liquidity of
energy markets could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's hedging and trading procedures and associated risk management tools may not protect against significant
losses.
NEE and FPL have hedging and trading proce dures and associated risk management tools,  such as separate but complementary
financial, credit, operati onal, compliance and legal reporting systems, internal controls, management review processes and other
mechanisms. NEE and FPL are unable to assure that such procedures and tools will be effective against all potential risks, including,
without limitation, employee misconduct. If such procedures and tools are not effective, this could have a material adverse effect on
NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
If price movements significantly or persiste ntly deviate from historical behavior , NEE's and FPL's risk management tools
associated with their hedging and trading procedures may not protect against significant losses.
NEE's and FPL's risk management tools and metrics associated with their hedging and trading procedures, such as daily value at risk,
earnings at risk, stop loss limits and liquidity guidelines, are based on historical price movements. Due to the inherent uncertainty
involved in price movem ents and potential deviation from historical pricing behavior , NEE and FPL are unable to assure that their risk
management tools and metrics will be effective to protect against material adverse effects on their business, financial condition, results
of operations and prospects.
If power transmission or natural gas, nuclear fuel or other commodity transportation facilities are unavailable or disrupted, the
ability for subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, to sell and deliver power or natural gas may be limited.
Subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, depend upon power transmission and natural gas, nuclear fuel and other commodity transportation
facilities, many of which  they do not own. Occu rrences affecting the operation of these facilities that may or may not be beyond the
control of subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, (such as severe weather or a generation or transmission facility outage, pipeline rupture,
or sudden and significant increase or decrease in wind generation) may limit or halt their ability to sell and deliver power and natural gas,
or to purcha se necessa ry fuels and other commodities, which could materially adversely impa ct NEE's and FPL's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL  are subject to credit and performance risk from customers, hedging counterparties and vendors.
NEE and FPL are exposed to risks associated with the creditworthiness and performance of their customers, hedging counterparties and
vendors under contracts for the supply of equipment, materials, fuel and other goods and services required for their business operations
and for the construction  and operation of, and for capital improvements to, their facilities. Adve rse conditions in the energy industry or
the general economy , as well as circumstances of individual customers, hedging counterparties and vendors, may adversely affect the
ability of some customers, hedging counterparties and vendors to perform as required under their contracts with NEE and FPL.
If any hedging, vending or other counterparty fails to fulfill its contractual obligations, NEE and FPL may need to make arrangements
with other counterpartie s or vendors, which could result in material financial losses, higher costs, untimely completion of power
generation facilities and other projects, and/or a disruption of their operations. If a defaulting counterparty is in poor financial condition,
NEE and FPL  may not be able to recover damages for any contract breach.
26
Table of Contents
NEE and FPL could recognize financial losses or a reduction in operating cash flows if a counterparty fails to perform or make
payments in accordance with the terms of derivative contracts or if NEE or FPL is required to post margin cash collateral
under derivative contracts.
NEE and FPL use deriva tive instruments, such as swaps, options, futures and forwards, some of which are traded in the OTC markets
or on exchanges, to manage their commodity and financial market risks, and for NEE to engage in trading and marketing activities. Any
failures by their counterp arties to perform or make payments in accordance with the terms of those transactions could have a material
adverse effect on NEE's  or FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospec ts. Similarly , any requirement for FPL or
NEE to post margin cash collateral under its derivative contracts could have a material adverse effect on its business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects. These risks may be increased during periods of adverse market or economic conditions
affecting the industry in which NEE and FPL  participate.
NEE and FPL are highly dependent on sensitive and complex information technology systems, and any failure or breach of
those systems could have a material adverse effect on their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL operate in a highly regulated industry that requires the continuous functioning of sophisticated information technology
systems and network infrastructure. Despite NEE's and FPL's implementation of security measures, all of their technology systems are
vulnerable to disability , failures or unauthorized access due to such activities. If NEE's or FPL's information technology systems were to
fail or be breached, sensitive confidential and other data could be compromised and NEE and FPL could be unable to fulfill critical
business functions.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess is highly dependent on their ability to process and monitor , on a daily basis, a very large number of
transactions, many of which are highly complex and cross numerous and diverse markets. Due to the size, scope, complexity and
geographical reach of NEE's and FPL's business, the development and maintenance of informat ion technology systems to keep track of
and process  information  is critical and challenging. NEE's and FPL's operating systems and facilities may fail to operate properly or
become disabled as a result of events that are either within, or wholly or partially outside of, their control, such as operator error, severe
weather , terrorist activities or cyber incidents. Any such failure or disabling event could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's
ability to process transactions and provide services, and their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL add, modify and replace informati on systems on a regular basis. Modifying existing information systems or implementing
new or replacement information systems is costly and involves risks, including, but not limite d to, integrating the modified, new or
replacement system with existing systems and processes, implementing associated changes in accounting procedures and controls,
and ensuring that data conversion is accurate  and consistent. Any disruptions or deficiencies in existing information systems, or
disruptions, delays or deficiencies in the modification or implementation of new information syste ms, could result in increased costs, the
inability to track or collect revenues and the diversion of management's and employees' attentio n and resources, and could negatively
impact the ef fectiveness of the companies' control environment, and/or the companies' ability to timely file required regulatory reports.
NEE and FPL also face the risks of operational failure or capacity constraints of third parties, including, but not limited to, those who
provide power transmission and natural gas transportation services.
NEE's and FPL's retai l businesses are subject to the risk that sensitive customer data may be compromised, which could
result in a material adverse impact to their reputation and/or have a material adverse effect on the business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
NEE's and FPL's retail businesses require access to sensitive customer data in the ordinary course of business. NEE's and FPL's retail
businesses may also need to provide sensitive customer data to vendors and service providers who require access to this information in
order to provide services, such as call center services, to the retail businesses. If a significant breach occurred, the reputation of NEE
and FPL could be materially adversely affected, customer confidence could be diminished, or customer information could be subject to
identity theft. NEE and FPL would be subject to costs associated with the breach and/or NEE and FPL could be subject to fines and
legal claims, any of which may have a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition , results of operations and prospects of
NEE and FPL.
NEE and FPL could recognize financial losses as a result of volatility in the market values of derivative instruments and limited
liquidity in OTC markets.
NEE and FPL execute transactions in derivative instruments on either recognized exchanges or via the OTC markets, depending on
management's assessment of the most favorabl e credit and market execution factors. Transactions executed in OTC markets have the
potential for greater volatility and less liquidity than transactions on recognized exchanges. As a result, NEE and FPL may not be able to
execute desired OTC transactions due to such heightened volatility and limited liquidity .
In the absen ce of actively quoted market prices  and pricing information from external sources, the valuation of derivative instruments
involves management's judgment and use of estimates. As a result, changes in the underlying assumptions or use of
27
Table of Contents
alternative valuation methods could affect the reported fair value of these derivative instruments and have a material adverse effect on
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL  may be materially adversely affected by negative publicity .
From time to time, political and public sentiment may result in a significant amount of adverse press coverage and other adverse public
statements affecting NEE and FPL. Adverse press coverage and other adverse statements, whether or not driven by political or public
sentiment, may also result in investigations by regulators, legislators and law enforcement officials or in legal claims. Responding to
these invest igations and lawsuits, regardless of the ultimate outcome of the proceeding, can divert the time and effort of senior
management from NEE's and FPL's business.
Addressing any adverse publicity , governmental scrutiny or enforcement or other legal proceedings is time consuming and expensive
and, regardless of the factual basis for the assertions being made, can have a negative impact on the reputation of NEE and FPL, on the
morale and performance  of their employees and on their relationships with regulators. It may also have a negative impact on their ability
to take timely advantage of various business and market opportunities. The direct and indirect effects of negative publicity , and the
demands of responding to and addressing it, may have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be adversely affected if FPL is unable
to maintain, negotiate or renegotiate franchise agreements on acceptable terms with municipalities and counties in Florida.
FPL may negotiate franchise agreements with municipalities and counties in Florida to provide electric services within such
municipalities and counties, and electricity sales  generated pursuant to these agreements represent a very substantial portion of FPL's
revenues. If FPL is unable to maintain, negotiat e or renegotiate such franchise agreements on acceptable terms, it could contribute to
lower earnin gs and FPL may not fully realize the anticipated benefits from significant investments and expenditures, which could
adversely af fect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected by
work strikes or stoppages and increasing personnel costs.
Employee strikes or work stoppages could disrupt operations and lead to a loss of revenue and customers. Personnel costs may also
increase due to inflationary or competitive pressures on payroll and benefits costs and revised terms of collective bargaining agreements
with union employees. These consequences could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects.
NEE's ability to successfully identify , complete and integrate acquisitions is subject to significant risks, including, but not
limited to, the effect of increased competition for acquisitions resulting from the consolidation of the energy industry .
NEE is likely to encounte r significant competition for acquisition opportunities that may become available as a result of the consolidation
of the energy industry in general. In addition, NEE may be unable to identify attractive acquisition  opportunities at favorable prices and to
complete and integrate them successfully and in a timely manner .
Nuclear Generation Risks
The operation and maintenance of NEE's and FPL's nuclear generation facilities involve environmental, health and financial
risks that could result in fines or the closure of the facilities and in increased costs and capital expenditures.
NEE's and FPL's nuclear generation facilities are subject to environmental, health and financial risks, including, but not limited to, those
relating to site storage of spent nuclear fuel, the disposition of spent nuclear fuel, leakage and emissions of tritium and other radioactive
elements in the event of a nuclear accident or otherwise, the threat of a terrorist attack or cybe r incident and other potential liabilities
arising out of the ownership or operation of the facilities. NEE and FPL maintain decommis sioning funds and external insurance
coverage which are intended to reduce the financial exposure to some of these risks; however , the cost of decommissioning nuclear
generation facilities could exceed the amount available in NEE's and FPL's decommissioning funds, and the exposure to liability and
property damages could exceed the amount of insurance coverage. If NEE or FPL is unable to recover the additional costs incurred
through insurance or, in the case of FPL, through regulatory mechanisms, their business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects could be materially adversely af fected.
In the event of an incident at any nuclear generation facility in the U.S. or at certain nuclear generation facilities in Europe,
NEE and FPL could be assessed significant retrospective assessments and/or retrospective insurance premiums as a result of
their participation in a secondary financial protection system and nuclear insurance mutual companies.
28
Table of Contents
Liability for accidents at nuclear power plants is governed by the Price-Anderson Act, which limits the liability of nuclear reactor owners
to the amou nt of insurance available from both private sources and an industry retrospective payment plan. In accordance with this Act,
NEE maintains the maximum amount of private liability insurance obtainable, and participates in a secondary financial protection
system, which provides liability insurance coverage for an incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S. Under the secondary financial
protection system, NEE is subject to retrospective assessments and/or retrospective insurance premiums, plus any applicable taxes, for
an incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S. or at certain nuclear generation facilities in Europe , regardless of fault or proximity to the
incident. Such assessments, if levied, could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects.
NRC orders or new regulations related to increased security measures and any future safety requirements promulgated by the
NRC could require NEE and FPL to incur substantial operating and capital expenditures at their nuclear generation facilities
and/or result in reduced revenues.
The NRC has broad authority to impose licensing and safety-related requirements for the operation and maintenance of nuclear
generation facilities, the addition of capacity at existing nuclear generation facilities and the construction of new nuclear generation
facilities, and these requirements are subject to change. In the event of non-compliance, the NRC has the authority to impose fines
and/or shut down a nuclear generation facility , depending upon the NRC's assessment of the severity of the situation, until compliance is
achieved. Any of the foregoing events could require NEE and FPL to incur increased costs and capital expenditures, and could reduce
revenues.
Any serious nuclear incident occurring at a NEE or FPL plant could result in substantial remediation costs and other expenses. A major
incident at a nuclear facility anywhere in the world could cause the NRC to limit or prohibit the operation or licensing of any domestic
nuclear generation facility . An incident at a nuclear facility anywhere in the world also could cause the NRC to impose additional
conditions or other requirements on the industr y, or on certain types of nuclear generation units, which could increase costs, reduce
revenues and result in additional capital expenditures.
The inability to operate any of NEE's or FPL's nuclear generation units through the end of their respective operating licenses
could have a mater ial adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
If any of NEE's or FPL's nuclear generation facilities are not operated for any reason through the life of their respective operating
licenses, NEE or FPL may be required to increase depreciation rates, incur impairment charges and accelerate future decommissioning
expenditures, any of which could materially adversely af fect their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's nuclear units are periodica lly removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance
outages, and for other purposes. If planned outages last longer than anticipated or if there are unplanned outages, NEE's and
FPL's results of operations and financial condition could be materially adversely affected.
NEE's and FPL's nuclear units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages,
including, but not limited  to, inspections, repairs  and certain other modifications as well as to replace equipment. In the event that a
scheduled outage lasts longer than anticipated or in the event of an unplanned outage due to, for example, equipment failure, such
outages could materially adversely af fect NEE's or FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Liquidity, Capital Requirements and Common Stock Risks
Disruptions, uncertain ty or volatility in the credit and capital markets, among other factors, may negatively affect NEE's and
FPL's abilit y to fund their liquidity and capital needs and to meet their growth objectives, and can also materially adversely
affect the results of operations and financial condition of NEE and FPL.
NEE and FPL rely on access to capital and credit markets as significant sources of liquidity for capital requirements and other operations
requirements that are not satisfied by operating cash flows. Disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in those capital and credit markets could
increase NEE's and FPL's cost of capital and affect their ability to fund their liquidity and capital needs and to meet their growth
objectives. If NEE or FPL is unable to access regularly the capital and credit markets on terms that are reasonable, it may have to delay
raising capital, issue shorter-term securities and incur an unfavorable cost of capital, which, in turn, could adversely affect its ability to
grow its business, could  contribute to lower earnings and reduced financial flexibility , and could have a material adverse effect on its
business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Although NEE's competitive energy and certain other subsidiaries have used non-recourse or limited-recourse, project-specific or other
financing in the past, market conditions and other factors could adversely affect the future availability of such financing. The inability of
NEE's subsi diaries, including, without limitation, NEECH and its subsidiaries, to access the capital and credit markets to provide project-
specific or other financin g for electric generation or other facilities or acquisitions on favorable terms, whether because of disruptions or
volatility in those markets or otherwise, could necessitate additional capital raising or borrowings by NEE and/or NEECH in the future.
29
Table of Contents
The inability  of subsidiaries that have existing project-specific or other financing arrangement s to meet the requirements of various
agreements relating to those financings, as well as actions by third parties or lenders, could give rise to a project-specific financing
default which, if not cured or waived, might result in the specific project, and potentially in some limited instances its parent companies,
being requir ed to repay the associated debt or other borrowings earlier than otherwise anticipated, and if such repayment were not
made, the lenders or security holders would generally have rights to foreclose against the project assets and related collateral. Such an
occurrence also could result in NEE expending additional funds or incurring additional obliga tions over the shorter term to ensure
continuing compliance with project-specific financing arrangements based upon the expect ation of improvement in the project's
performance or financial returns over the longer term. Any of these actions could materially adversely affect NEE's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects, as well as the availability or terms of future financings for NEE or its subsidiaries.
NEE's, NEECH's and FPL's inability to maintain their current credit ratings may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's
liquidity and results of operations, limit the ability of NEE and FPL  to grow their business, and increase interest costs.
The inability  of NEE, NEECH and FPL to maintain their current credit ratings could materially adversely affect their ability to raise capital
or obtain credit on favora ble terms, which, in turn, could impact NEE's and FPL's ability to grow their business and service indebtedness
and repay borrowings, and would likely increase their interest costs. In addition, certain agreeme nts and guarantee arrangements would
require posting of additional collateral in the event of a ratings downgrade. Some of the factors  that can affect credit ratings are cash
flows, liquidity , the amount of debt as a component of total capitalization, NEE's overall business mix and political, legislative and
regulatory actions. There  can be no assurance that one or more of the ratings of NEE, NEECH and FPL will not be lowered or withdrawn
entirely by a rating agency .
NEE's and FPL's liquidity may be impaired if their credit providers are unable to fund their credit commitments to the
companies or to maintain their current credit ratings.
The inability of NEE's, NEECH's and FPL's credit providers to fund their credit commitments or to maintain their current credit ratings
could require NEE, NEECH or FPL, among other things, to renegotiate requirements in agreements, find an alternative credit provider
with accepta ble credit ratings to meet funding requirements, or post cash collateral and could have a material adverse effect on NEE's
and FPL's liquidity .
Poor market performance and other economic factors could affect NEE's defined benefit pension plan's funded status, which
may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity and results of operations and
prospects.
NEE sponsors a qualified noncontributory defin ed benefit pension plan for substantially all employees of NEE and its subsidiaries. A
decline in the market value of the assets held in the defined benefit pension plan due to poor investment performance or other factors
may increase the funding requirements for this obligation.
NEE's defined benefit pension plan is sensitive  to changes in interest rates, since as interest rates decrease, the funding liabilities
increase, potentially increasing benefits costs and funding requirements. Any increase in benefits costs or funding requirements may
have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and prospects.
Poor marke t performance and other econom ic factors could adversely affect the asset values of NEE's and FPL's nuclear
decommissioning funds, which may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's liquidity , financial condition and results of
operations.
NEE and FPL are required to maintain decomm issioning funds to satisfy their future obligations to decommission their nuclear power
plants. A decline in the market value of the assets held in the decommissioning funds due to poor investment performance or other
factors may increase the funding requirements for these obligations. Any increase in funding requirements may have a material adverse
effect on NEE's and FPL's liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
Certain of NEE's investments are subject to changes in market value and other risks, which may materially adversely affect
NEE's liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
NEE holds certain invest ments where changes in the fair value affect NEE's financial results. In some cases there may be no observable
market values for these  investments, requiring fair value estimates to be based on other valuation techniques. This type of analysis
requires significant judgment and the actual values realized in a sale of these investments could differ materially from those estimated. A
sale of an investment below previously estimated value, or other decline in the fair value of an investment, could result in losses or the
write-of f of such investment, and may have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
NEE may be unable to meet its ongoing and future financial obligations and to pay dividends on its common stock if its
subsidiaries are unable to pay upstream dividends or repay funds to NEE.
30
Table of Contents
NEE is a holding company and, as such, has no material operations of its own. Substantially all of NEE's consolidated assets are held
by its subsid iaries. NEE's ability to meet its financial obligations, including, but not limited to, its guarantees, and to pay dividends on its
common stock is primarily dependent on its subsidiaries' net income and cash flows, which are subject to the risks of their respective
businesses, and their ability to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds to NEE.
NEE's subsidiaries are separate legal entities and have no independent obligation to provide NEE with funds for its payment obligations.
The subsidiaries have financial obligations, including, but not limited to, payment of debt service, which they must satisfy before they can
provide NEE with funds. In addition, in the event  of a subsidiary's liquidation or reorganization, NEE's right to participate in a distribution
of assets is subject to the prior claims of the subsidiary's creditors.
The dividend-paying ability of some of the subsidiaries is limited by contractual restrictions which are contained in outstanding financing
agreements and which may be included in future  financing agreements. The future enactment of laws or regulations also may prohibit or
restrict the ability of NEE's subsidiaries to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds.
NEE may be unable to meet its ongoing and future financial obligations and to pay dividends on its common stock if NEE is
required to perform under guarantees of obligations of its subsidiaries.
NEE guarantees many of the obligations of its consolidated subsidiaries, other than FPL, throug h guarantee agreements with NEECH.
These guara ntees may require NEE to provide substantial funds to its subsidiaries or their creditors or counterparties at a time when
NEE is in need of liquidity to meet its own financ ial obligations. Funding such guarantees may materially adversely affect NEE's ability to
meet its financial obligations or to pay dividends.
NEP may not be able to access sources of capital on commercially reasonable terms, which would have a material adverse
effect on its ability to consummate future acquisitions and on the value of NEE’ s limited partner interest in NEP  OpCo.
Through an indirect wholly owned subsidiary , NEE owns a limited partner interest in NEP OpCo. NEP's inability to access capital on
commercially reasonable  terms and effectively consummate future acquisitions could have a material adverse effect on NEP's ability to
grow its cash distributio ns to its common unitholders, including NEE, and on the value of NEE’s limited partnership interest in NEP
OpCo. In addition, NEP's issuance of additional common units, securities convertible into NEP common units or other securities in
connection with acquisitions could cause significant common unitholder dilution and reduce cash distributions to its common unitholders,
including NEE, if the acquisitions are not suf ficiently accretive.
Disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in the credit and capital markets may exert downward pressure on the market price of
NEE's common stock.
The market price and trading volume of NEE's common stock are subject to fluctuations as a result of, among other factors, general
credit and capital market conditions and chang es in market sentiment regarding the operations, business and financing strategies of
NEE and its subsidiaries. As a result, disruption s, uncertainty or volatility in the credit and capital markets may, for example, have a
material adverse ef fect on the market price of NEE's common stock.
Widespread public health crises and epidemics or pandemics, including the novel coronavirus (COVID-19), may have material
adverse impacts on NEE’ s and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity and results of operations.
NEE and FPL are subje ct to the impacts of widespread public health crises, epidemics and pandemics, including, but not limited to,
impacts on the global, national or local econom y, capital and credit markets, NEE's and FPL's workforce, customers and suppliers.
There is no assurance that NEE's and FPL's businesses will be able to operate without material adverse impacts depending on the
nature of the public health crisis, epidemic or pandemic. Actions taken in response to such crises by federal, state and local government
or regulatory  agencies may have a material adverse impact on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity and results of
operations.
The ultimate  severity , duration and impact of public health crises, epidemics and pandemics cannot be predicted. Additionally , there is no
assurance that vaccines or other treatments will be widely available or effective, or that the public will be willing to participate, in an effort
to contain the spread of disease.
NEE and FPL are closely monitoring the global outbreak of COVID-19. At this time, NEE and FPL are unable to determine the ultimate
severity or duration of the outbreak or its effects on, among other things, the global, national or local economy , the capital and credit
markets, or NEE’ s and FPL’s workforce, customers and suppliers. To date, COVID-19 has not had a material adverse impact on NEE's
and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity and results of operations.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None
31
Table of Contents
Item 2. Properties
See Item 1. Business - FPL  and Item 1. Business - NEER for a description of principal properties.
Character of Ownership
Substantially all of FPL's properties are subject to the lien of FPL's mortgage, which secures most debt securities issued by FPL. The
majority of FPL's real property is held in fee and is free from other encumbrances, subject to minor exceptions which are not of a nature
as to substa ntially impair the usefulness to FPL of such properties. Some of FPL's electric lines are located on parcels of land which are
not owned in fee by FPL but are covered by necessary consents of governmental authorities or rights obtained from owners of private
property . Subsidiaries within the NEER segment have ownership interests in entities that own generation facilities, pipeline facilities and
transmission assets and a number of those facilities and assets are encumbered by liens securing various financings. Additionally , the
majority of NEER's generation facilities, pipeline facilities and transmission lines are located on land under easement or leased from
owners of private property . See Note 7 - FPL  and - NEER.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
None. With regard to environmental proceedings to which a governmental authority is a party , NEE's and FPL's policy is to disclose any
such proceeding if it is reasonably expected to result in monetary sanctions of greater than or equal to $1 million.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable
32
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5.  Market for Registrants' Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities
Common Stock Data. All of FPL's common stock is owned by NEE. NEE's common stock is traded on the New York Stock Exchange
under the symbol "NEE. " As of January 31, 2021, there were 16,080 holders of record of NEE's common stock. The amount and timing
of dividends payable on NEE's common stock are within the sole discretion of NEE's Board of Directors. The Board of Directors reviews
the dividend rate at least annually (generally in February) to determine its appropriateness in light of NEE's financial position and results
of operations, legislative and regulatory develop ments affecting the electric utility industry in general and FPL in particular , competitive
conditions, change in business mix and any other factors the Board of Directors deems relevant. In February 2021, NEE announced that
it would increase its quarterly dividend on its common stock from $0.35 per share to $0.385 per share.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities. Information regarding purchases made by NEE of its common stock during the three
months ended December 31, 2020 is as follows:
PeriodTotal
Number
of Shares
PurchasedAverage
Price Paid
Per ShareTotal Number of Shares
Purchased as Part of a
Publicly Announced ProgramMaximum Number of
Shares that May Yet be
Purchased Under the
Program
10/1/20 - 10/31/20 — — — 180,000,000
11/1/20 - 11/30/20 1,456$ 77.19 — 180,000,000
12/1/20 - 12/31/20 1,420$ 74.43 — 180,000,000
Total 2,876$ 75.83 —  
______________________
(a)Includes: (1) in November 2020, shares of common stock withheld from employees to pay certain withholding taxes upon the vesting of stock awards granted to such
employees under the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan; and (2) in December 2020, shares of common stock purchased as a
reinvestment of dividends by the trustee of a grantor trust in connection with NEE's obligation under a February 2006 grant under the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and
Restated Long-Term Incentive Plan (former LTIP) to an executive officer of deferred retirement share awards.
(b)In May 2017, NEE's Board of Directors authorized repurchases of up to 45 million shares of common stock (180 million shares after giving effect to the four-for-one stock
split of NEE common stock effective October 26, 2020 (2020 stock split)) over an unspecified period.
Item 6.  Selected Financial Data
Omitted/Not Applicable(a) (b)
33
Table of Contents
Item 7.  Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
OVERVIEW
NEE’ s operating performance is driven primarily by the operations of its two principal busines ses, FPL, which serves more than 5.6
million  custo mer accounts in Florida and is one of the largest electric utilities in the U.S., and NEER, which together with affiliated
entities is the world's largest generator of renew able energy from the wind and sun based on 2020 MWh produced on a net generation
basis. The table below presents net income (loss) attributable to NEE and earnings (loss) per share attributable to NEE, assuming
dilution, by reportable segment, FPL and NEER, as well as Gulf Power , acquired by NEE in January 2019 (see Note 6 - Gulf Power
Company ), and Corporate and Other , which is primarily comprised of the operating results of other business activities, as well as other
income and expense items, including interest expense, and eliminating entries. Prior years' share-based data included in Management's
Discussion has been retrospectively adjusted to reflect the 2020 stock split. See Note 14 - Earnings Per Share. The following discussion
should be read in conjunction with the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements contained herein and all comparisons are with the
corresponding items in the prior year .
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to NEEEarnings (Loss) Per Share Attributable
to NEE,
Assuming Dilution
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
(millions)
FPL $ 2,650  $ 2,334 $ 2,171 $ 1.35 $ 1.20 $ 1.14 
Gulf Power 238 180 — 0.12 0.09 — 
NEER 531 1,807 4,704 0.27 0.93 2.46 
Corporate and Other (500) (552) (237) (0.26) (0.28) (0.13)
NEE $ 2,919  $ 3,769 $ 6,638 $ 1.48 $ 1.94 $ 3.47 
______________________
(a)    Gulf Power was acquired by NEE in January 2019. See Note 6 - Gulf Power Company.
(b)    NEER’s results reflect an allocation of interest expense from NEECH based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by
NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries.
(c)    NEP was deconsolidated from NEER in January 2018. See Note 1 - Basis of Presentation.
For the five years ended December 31, 2020, NEE delivered a total shareholder return of approximately 237.6%, above the
S&P 500’s 103.0% return, the S&P 500 Utilities' 72.3% return and the Dow Jones U.S. Electricity's 72.6% return. The historical stock
performance of NEE's common stock shown in the performance graph below is not nece ssarily indicative of future stock price
performance.
(a)
(b)(c)
(c)
34
Table of Contents
Adjusted Earnings
NEE prepar es its financial statements under GAAP . However , management uses earnings  adjusted for certain items (adjusted
earnings), a non-GAAP  financial measure, intern ally for financial planning, analysis of performance, reporting of results to the Board of
Directors and as an input in determining perform ance-based compensation under NEE’ s employee incentive compensation plans. NEE
also uses adjusted earnings when communicating its financial results and earnings outlook to analysts and investors. NEE’s
management believes that adjusted earnings provide a more meaningful representation of NEE's fundamental earnings power . Although
these amou nts are properly included in the determination of net income under GAAP , management believes that the amount and/or
nature of such items make period to period comparisons of operations difficult and potentiall y confusing. Adjusted earnings do not
represent a substitute for net income, as prepared under GAAP .
The following table provides details of the after-tax adjustments to net income considered in computing NEE's adjusted earnings
discussed above.
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
(millions)
Net losses associated with non-qualifying hedge activity $ (650)$ (404)$ (186)
Tax reform-related, including the impact of tax rate change on differential membership interests $ (87)$ (89)$ 436 
NEP investment gains, net $ (94)$ 96 $ 2,863 
Gain on disposal of a business - NEER $ 274 $ — $ — 
Change in unrealized gains (losses) on NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds and OTTI, net $ 131 $ 176 $ (125)
Acquisition-related $ — $ (70)$ (14)
Operating results of solar projects in Spain - NEER $ 1 $ (2)$ (9)
Impairment charge related to investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline - NEER $ (1,208)$ — $ — 
______________________
(a)For 2020, 2019 and 2018, approximately $439 million of losses, $63 million of losses, and $41 million of gains, respectively, are included in NEER's net income; the
balance is included in Corporate and Other. The change in non-qualifying hedge activity is primarily attributable to changes in forward power and natural gas prices,
interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates, as well as the reversal of previously recognized unrealized mark-to-market gains or losses as the underlying
transactions were realized.
(b)For 2020 and 2019, the balances relate to NEER. For 2018, approximately $421 million of favorable tax reform-related impacts, including the impact of tax rate change on
differential membership interests, relates to NEER and the balance relates to Corporate and Other.
(c)For 2020 and 2019, the balances relate to NEER. For 2018, approximately $2,885 million relates to NEER and the balance relates to Corporate and Other. See Note 1 -
Basis of Presentation and - Disposal of Businesses/Assets.
(d)See Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets for a discussion of the sale of two solar generation facilities in Spain (Spain projects).
(e)For 2020, 2019 and 2018, approximately $131 million of gains, $176 million of gains and $127 million of losses, respectively, are included in NEER's net income; the
balance for 2018 is included in Corporate and Other.
(f)For 2019, approximately $44 million, $20 million and $6 million of costs are included in Corporate and Other's, Gulf Power's and NEER's net income, respectively. For
2018, $9 million of costs are included in Corporate and Other's net income; the balance is included in NEER.
(g)See Note 4 - Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of the impairment charge related to the investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline.
NEE segregates into two categories unrealized mark-to-market gains and losses and timing impacts related to derivative transactions.
The first category , referred to as non-qualifying hedges, represents certain energy derivative, interest rate derivative and foreign
currency transactions entered into as economic hedges, which do not meet the requirements for hedge accounting, or for which hedge
accounting treatment is not elected or has been discontinued. Changes in the fair value of those transactions are marked to market and
reported in the consolidated statements of income, resulting in earnings volatility because the economic offset to certain of the positions
are generally  not marked to market. As a consequence, NEE's net income reflects only the movement in one part of economically-linked
transactions. For example, a gain (loss) in the non-qualifying hedge category for certain energy derivatives is offset by decreases
(increases) in the fair value of related physical asset positions in the portfolio or contracts, which  are not marked to market under GAAP .
For this reason, NEE's management views results expressed excluding the impact of the non-qualifying hedges as a meaningful
measure of current period performance. The second category , referred to as trading activities, which is included in adjusted earnings,
represents the net unrea lized effect of actively traded positions entered into to take advantage of expected market price movements and
all other commodity hedging activities. At FPL, substantially all changes in the fair value of energy derivative transactions are deferred
as a regulatory asset or liability until the contracts are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the fuel
clause. See Note 3.
2020 Summary
Net income attributable to NEE for 2020 was lower than 2019 by $850 million, or $0.46 per share, assuming dilution, due to lower results
at NEER, partly of fset by higher results at FPL, Gulf Power and Corporate and Other .
FPL's increase in net income in 2020 was primarily driven by continued investments in plant in service and other property .(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
35
Table of Contents
NEER's results decreased in 2020 primarily driven by an impairment charge related to its investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline,
unfavorable non-qualifying hedge activity , the absence of NEP investment gains recorded upon the sale of ownership interests to NEP in
June 2019 and unfavorable changes in the fair value of equity securities in NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds compared to 2019,
partly offset by the gain recognized on the sale of the Spain projects and higher earnings on new investments and existing generation
assets. In 2020, NEER added approximately 2,299 MW of new wind generating capacity , 1,412 MW of wind repowering generating
capacity and 625 MW of solar generating capacity in the U.S. and increased its backlog of contracted renewable development projects.
Gulf Power's increase in net income in 2020 is primarily related to lower operating expenses - net.
Corporate and Other's results in 2020 increased primarily due to lower net losses associated with non-qualifying hedge activity .
NEE and its subsidiarie s require funds to support and grow their businesses. These funds are primarily provided by cash flows from
operations, borrowings or issuances of short- and long-term debt, proceeds from differential membership investors, sales of assets to
NEP or third parties and, from time to time, issuances of equity securities. See Liquidity and Capital Resources - Liquidity .
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Net income attributable to NEE for 2020 was $2.92 billion compared to $3.77 billion in 2019. In 2020, net income attributable to NEE
decreased primarily due to lower  results at NEER, partly offset by higher results at FPL, Gulf Power and Corporate and Other . The
comparison of the results of operations for the years ended December 31, 2019  and 2018 are included in Management's Discussion in
NEE's and FPL's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019.
In 2019, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold ownership interests in three wind generation facilities and three solar
generation facilities with a total net generating capacity of approximately 611 MW to a NEP subs idiary . In February 2020, a subsidiary of
NextEra Energy Resourc es sold its ownership interest in two solar generation facilities located in Spain with a total generating capacity
of 99.8 MW. In December 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources sold a 90% noncontrolling ownership interest in a portfolio of
three wind generation facilities and four solar generation facilities representing a total net generating capacity of 900 MW. In addition, a
subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources sold its 100% ownership interest in a 100 MW solar generation facility and a 30 MW battery
storage facility under construction with an expected in service date in early 2021 to a NEP subsidiary . See Note 1 - Disposal of
Businesses/Assets and – Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interest.
In July 2019, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  acquired the outstanding membership interests of an entity that indirectly owns Trans
Bay Cable, LLC (Trans Bay), which owns and operates a 53-mile, high-voltage direct current underwater transmission cable system in
California. See Note 6 - Trans Bay Cable, LLC. In September 2020, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  entered into agreements to
acquire GridLiance, which owns and operates three FERC-regulated transmission utilities across six states, five in the Midwest and
Nevada. See Note 6 - GridLiance.
NEE's effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 were approximately 2% and 12%, respectively . The
rates for both years reflect the impact of PTCs and ITCs and, in 2020, also reflect the impact of lower pretax income and the gain on
sale of the Spain solar projects which was not taxable for federal nor state income tax purposes. See Note 5.
On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However , FPL will continue to be regulated as two
separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power until the FPSC approves consolidation of the FPL and
Gulf Power rates and tariffs. FPL and Gulf Power will continue to be separate operating segment s of NEE as well as FPL, through 2021.
See Note 6 - Merger of FPL  and Gulf Power .
NEE and FPL are closely monitoring the global  outbreak of COVID-19 and are taking steps intended to mitigate the potential risks to
NEE and FPL  posed by COVID-19. See Note 15 - Coronavirus Pandemic.
FPL: Results of Operations
FPL obtains  its operating revenues primarily from the sale of electricity to retail customers at rates established by the FPSC through
base rates and cost recovery clause mechanisms. FPL’s net income for 2020 and 2019 was $2,650 million and $2,334 million,
respectively , representin g an increase of $316 million. The increase was primarily driven by higher earnings from investments in plant in
service and other prope rty. Such investments grew FPL's average retail rate base by approximately $3.9 billion in 2020 and reflect,
among other things, solar generation additions and ongoing transmission and distribution additions.
36
Table of Contents
FPL’s servic e area was impacted by Hurricane Dorian in 2019 and by Hurricane Isaias and Tropical Storm Eta in 2020. FPL determined
that it would not seek recovery of the Hurricane Dorian, Hurricane Isaias and Tropical Storm Eta storm restoration costs through a storm
surcharge from customers and instead recorde d costs as storm restoration costs in NEE’ s and FPL’s consolidated statements of
income. FPL used available reserve amortization to offset all such storm restoration costs that were expensed for Hurricane Dorian,
Hurricane Isaias and Tropical Storm Eta. See Note 1 - Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
The use of reserve amortization is permitted by the 2016 rate agreement. See Item 1. Business - FPL - FPL Regulation - FPL Electric
Rate Regula tion - Base Rates - FPL Base Rates  Effective January 2017 for additional information on the 2016 rate agreement. In order
to earn a targeted regulatory ROE, subject to limitations associated with the 2016 rate agreement, reserve amortization is calculated
using a trailing thirteen-m onth average of retail rate base and capital structure in conjunction with the trailing twelve months regulatory
retail base net operating income, which primarily includes the retail base portion of base and other revenues, net of O&M, depreciation
and amortization, interest and tax expenses. In general, the net impact of these income stateme nt line items must be adjusted, in part,
by reserve amortization to earn the targeted regulatory ROE. In certain periods, reserve amortiza tion is reversed so as not to exceed the
targeted regulatory ROE . The drivers of FPL's net income not reflected in the reserve amortizatio n calculation typically include wholesale
and transmission service revenues and expenses, cost recovery clause revenues and expens es, AFUDC - equity and revenue and
costs not recoverable from retail customers. In 2020 and 2019, FPL recorded the reversal of reserve amortization of approximately
$1 million and $357 million, respectively . FPL's regulatory ROE for both 2020 and 2019 was approximately 11.60%.
During 2020 , FPL's operating revenues decrease d $530 million primarily related to lower fuel cost recovery revenues of $637 million and
$66 million in lower storm-related revenues, partly of fset by $244 million in higher retail base revenues.
Retail Base
FPL’s retail base revenues for 2020 and 2019  reflect the 2016 rate agreement. In Decembe r 2016, the FPSC issued a final order
approving the 2016 rate agreement which became effective January 2017 and will remain in effect until new base rates are approved by
the FPSC. The 2016 rate agreement establishes FPL's allowed regulatory ROE at 10.55%, with a range of 9.60% to 11.60%, and
allowed for retail rate base increases in 2017, 2018, and upon commencement of commercial operations at the Okeechobee Clean
Energy Center and certain solar projects. In January 2021, FPL filed a formal notification with the FPSC indicating its intent to initiate a
base rate proceeding. See Item 1. Business - FPL - FPL Regulation - FPL Electric Rate Regulation - Base Rates for additional
information on the 2016 rate agreement and details of FPL's formal notification.
The increase in retail base revenues in 2020 primarily reflects additional revenues of approximately $64 million related to retail base rate
adjustments associated with the addition of new solar generation and the Okeechobee Clean Energy Center which achieved commercial
operation at the end of the first quarter of 2019. In 2020, retail base revenues were also impacted  by an increase of 1.5% in the average
number of customer accounts. Although the weather in 2020 was favorable when compared to 2019, usage per retail customer
remained flat. See Note 1 - Rate Regulation.
Cost Recovery Clauses
Revenues from fuel and other cost recovery clauses and pass-through costs, such as franchise fees, revenue taxes and storm-related
surcharges, are largely a pass-through of costs. Such revenues also include a return on investme nt allowed to be recovered through the
cost recovery clauses on certain assets, primarily related to certain solar and environmental projects and the unamortized balance of the
regulatory asset associated with FPL's acquisiti on of certain generation facilities. See Item 1. Business - FPL - FPL Regulation - FPL
Electric Rate  Regulation  - Cost Recovery Clauses. Underrecovery or overrecovery of cost recove ry clause and other pass-through costs
(deferred clause and franchise expenses and revenues) can significantly affect NEE's and FPL's operating cash flows. The 2020 net
underrecovery impacting NEE's and FPL's operating cash flows was approximately $110 million.
Fuel cost recovery revenues decreased in 2020  primarily as a result of lower fuel and energy prices, including the flow back of lower
expected fuel costs to retail customers. Storm-related revenues decreased in 2020 primarily as a result of the conclusion of the storm-
recovery bond surcharge in the third quarter of 2019.
In 2020 and 2019, cost recovery clauses contributed approximately $111 million and $117 million, respectively , to FPL ’s net income.
Other Items Impacting FPL's Consolidated Statements of Income
Fuel, Purchase Power and Interchange Expense
Fuel, purchased power and interchange expense decreased $640 million in 2020 primarily related to lower fuel and energy prices.
37
Table of Contents
Depreciation and Amortization Expense
The major components of FPL ’s depreciation and amortization expense are as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019
(millions)
Reserve reversal recorded under the 2016 rate agreement $ 1 $ 357 
Other depreciation and amortization recovered under base rates (excluding reserve amortization) and other 2,017 1,876 
Depreciation and amortization primarily recovered under cost recovery clauses and securitized storm-recovery
cost amortization 228 291 
Total $ 2,246 $ 2,524 
Depreciation expense decreased $278 million during 2020 primarily reflecting a lower reversal of reserve amortization in 2020 compared
to 2019 and lower storm-recovery cost amortization primarily as a result of the final payment of the storm-recovery bonds in the third
quarter of 2019. The decreases in depreciation and amortization expense during 2020 were partly offset by increased depreciation
related to higher plant in service balances. Rese rve amortization, or reversal of such amortization, reflects adjustments to accrued asset
removal costs provided under the 2016 rate agreement in order to achieve the targeted regulatory ROE. Reserve amortization is
recorded as a reduction to (or when reversed as an increase to) accrued asset removal costs which is reflected in noncurrent regulatory
liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets. At December 31, 2020, approximately $894 million remains in accrued asset removal
costs related to reserve amortization.
Income T axes
During 2020, income taxes increased $169 millio n, primarily related to the absence of a 2019 income tax adjustment recorded pursuant
to the FPSC 's order in connection with its review of impacts associated with tax reform, as well as higher income before income taxes in
2020. See Note 5.
NEER: Results of Operations
NEER owns, develops, constructs, manages and operates electric generation facilities in wholesale energy markets primarily in the
U.S., as well as in Canada. NEER also provides full energy and capacity requirements services, engages in power and fuel marketing
and trading activities, owns and operates rate-re gulated transmission facilities and transmission lines and invests in natural gas, natural
gas liquids and oil produ ction and pipeline infrastructure assets. NEER’ s net income less net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests
for 2020 and 2019 was $531 million and $1,807 million, respectively , resulting in a decrease  in 2020 of $1,276 million. The primary
drivers, on an after-tax basis, of the change are in the following table.
Increase (Decrease)
From Prior Period
Year Ended December 31, 2020
(millions)
New investments $ 143 
Existing generation assets 65 
Gas infrastructure (6)
Customer supply and proprietary power and gas trading 3 
NEET 47 
Asset sales/abandonment 37 
Interest and other general and administrative expenses (34)
Other , including other investment income and income taxes 8 
Change in non-qualifying hedge activity (376)
Change in unrealized gains/losses on equity securities held in nuclear decommissioning funds and OTTI, net (45)
NEP investment gains, net (190)
Disposal of a business 274 
Acquisition-related 6 
Impairment charge related to investment in Mountain V alley Pipeline (1,208)
Decrease in net income less net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests $ (1,276)
______________________
(a)    Reflects after-tax project contributions, including the net effect of deferred income taxes and other benefits associated with PTCs and ITCs for wind and solar projects, as
applicable (see Note 1 - Income Taxes and - Sales of Differential Membership Interests and Note 5), but excludes allocation of interest expense or corporate general and
administrative expenses. Results from projects and pipelines are included in new investments during the first twelve months of operation or ownership. Project results are
included in existing assets and pipeline results are included in gas infrastructure beginning with the thirteenth month of operation or ownership.
(b)    Excludes allocation of interest expense and corporate general and administrative expenses.
(c)    Includes differential membership interest costs. Excludes unrealized mark-to-market gains and losses related to interest rate derivative contracts, which are included in
change in non-qualifying hedge activity.
(d)    See Overview - Adjusted Earnings for additional information.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(d)
(d)
(d)
(d)
(d)
38
Table of Contents
The discussion below describes changes in certain line items set forth in NEE's consolidated statements of income as they relate to
NEER.
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2020 decreased $593 million primarily due to:
•the impact of non-qualifying commodity hedges  (approximately $244 million of losses during 2020 compared to $342 million of
gains for 2019), and
•lower revenu es from existing generation assets of $260 million primarily related to lower nuclear revenues, due primarily to the
closure of Duane Arnold in August 2020 and a refueling outage at the Seabrook nuclear facilit y, as well as the sale of the Spain
projects,
partly of fset by ,
•revenues from new investments of $145 million, and
•higher revenues of $129 million from NEET  primarily related to the acquisition of Trans Bay in 2019.
Operating Expenses - net
Operating expenses - net for 2020 increased $88 million primarily due to increases of $156 million in O&M expenses primarily
associated with new investments and acquisitions, partly of fset by lower fuel costs of $89 million.
Gains on Disposal of Businesses/Assets - net
In 2020, gains on disposal of businesses/assets - net primarily related to the sale of the Spain projects in the first quarter of 2020; in
2019, the amount was primarily related to the sale of ownership interests in wind and solar projects to NEP. See Note 1 - Disposal of
Businesses/Assets.
Interest Expense
NEER's interest expense for 2020 decreased $214 million primarily reflecting lower losses of approximately $99 million related to
changes in the fair value of interest rate derivative instruments as compared to 2019, as well as lower interest rates in 2020, partly offset
by higher average debt balances.
Equity in Earnings (Losses) of Equity Method Investees
NEER recognized $1.4 billion of equity in losse s of equity method investees in 2020 compared  to $67 million of equity in earnings of
equity metho d investees for the prior year period . The change for 2020 primarily reflects an impairment charge related to the investment
in Mountain V alley Pipeline of approximately $1.5 billion. See Note 4 - Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements.
Tax Credits, Benefits and Expenses
PTCs from wind project s and ITCs from solar and certain wind projects are reflected in NEER ’s earnings. A portion of the PTCs and
ITCs have been allocat ed to investors in connection with sales of differential membership interests. PTCs are recognized as wind
energy is generated and sold based on a per kWh rate prescribed in applicable federal and state statutes. Reflected in income taxes in
NEE's consolidated statements of income are PTCs totaling approximately $150 million and $75 million and ITCs totaling approximately
$133 million and $199 million in 2020 and 2019, respectively . See Note 1 - Income Taxes for a discussion of PTCs and ITCs and Note 5.
Gulf Power: Results of Operations
Gulf Power's net income increased $58 million in 2020. During 2020, operating revenues decreased $89 million primarily related to lower
fuel revenue s. Operating  expenses - net decreased $135 million in 2020 primarily related to decreases in fuel, purchased power and
interchange expense and O&M expenses, as well as the absence of 2019 acquisition-related costs, partly offset by higher depreciation
and amortization as a result of increased investments in plant in service and other property .
In September 2020, Gulf Power's service area was impacted by Hurricane Sally and Gulf Power recorded estimated recoverable storm
restoration costs of approximately $206 million. See Note 1 - Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
Corporate and Other: Results of Operations
Corporate and Other is primarily comprised of the operating results of other business activities, as well as corporate interest income and
expenses. Corporate and Other allocates a portion of NEECH's corporate interest expense to NEER. Interest expense is allocated
based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and dif ferential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries.
Corporate and Other's results increased $52 million during 2020  primarily due to lower  net losses of approximately $130 million
associated with non-qualifying hedge activity as a result of changes in the fair value of interest rate derivative instruments and the
absence of acquisition and integration costs incurred in 2019, partly of fset by higher corporate interest and operating expenses .
39
Table of Contents
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
NEE and its subsidiaries  require funds to support and grow their businesses. These funds are used for, among other things, working
capital, capital expenditures (see Note 15 - Commitments), investments in or acquisitions of assets and businesses (see Note 6),
payment of maturing debt and related derivative obligations (see Note 13 and Note 3) and, from time to time, redemption or repurchase
of outstandin g debt or equity securities. It is anticipated that these requirements will be satisfied through a combination of cash flows
from operations, short- and long-term borrowing s, the issuance of short- and long-term debt and, from time to time, equity securities,
proceeds from differential membership investors and sales of assets to NEP or third parties, consistent with NEE’ s and FPL’s objective
of maintaining, on a long-term basis, a capital structure that will support a strong investment grade credit rating. NEE, FPL and NEECH
rely on access to credit and capital markets as significant sources of liquidity for capital requirem ents and other operations that are not
satisfied by operating cash flows. The inability of NEE, FPL and NEECH to maintain their current credit ratings could affect their ability to
raise short- and long-term capital, their cost of capital and the execution of their respective financing strategies, and could require the
posting of additional collateral under certain agreements.
In October 2015, NEE authorized a program to purchase, from time to time, up to $150 million of common units representing limited
partner interests in NEP. Under the program, purchases may be made in amounts, at prices and at such times as NEE or its subsidiaries
deem appropriate, all subject to market conditions and other considerations. The purchases may be made in the open market or in
privately negotiated transactions. Any purchases will be made in such quantities, at such prices, in such manner and on such terms and
conditions as determined by NEE or its subsidiaries in their discretion, based on factors such as market and business conditions,
applicable legal requirements and other factors . The common unit purchase program does not require NEE to acquire any specific
number of common units and may be modified or terminated by NEE at any time. The purpose of the program is not to cause NEP’ s
common units to be delisted from the New York Stock Exchange or to cause the common units  to be deregistered with the SEC. As of
December 31, 2020, NEE had purchased approximately $36 million of NEP common units under this program. At December 31, 2020,
NEE owned a noncontrolling general partner interest in NEP  and beneficially owned approximately 58.0% of NEP’ s voting power .
40
Table of Contents
Cash Flows
NEE's sources and uses of cash for 2020, 2019 and 2018 were as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
(millions)
Sources of cash:
Cash flows from operating activities $ 7,983 $ 8,155 $ 6,593 
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 12,404 13,905 4,391 
Proceeds from differential membership investors 3,522 1,604 1,841 
Sale of independent power and other investments of NEER 1,012 1,316 1,693 
Issuances of common stock/equity units - net — 1,494 718 
Net increase in commercial paper and other short-term debt — — 6,272 
Non-operating distributions from equity method investees — — 637 
Proceeds from sale of noncontrolling interests 501 99 — 
Other sources - net 83 121 47 
Total sources of cash 25,505 26,694 22,192 
Uses of cash:
Capital expenditures, acquisitions, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel purchases (14,610) (17,462) (13,004)
Retirements of long-term debt (6,103) (5,492) (3,102)
Net decrease in commercial paper and other short-term debt (907) (4,799) — 
Payments to related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net (2) (54) (21)
Issuances of common stock/equity units - net (92) — — 
Dividends (2,743) (2,408) (2,101)
Other uses - net (590) (628) (687)
Total uses of cash (25,047) (30,843) (18,915)
Effects of currency translation on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (20) 4 (7)
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 438 $ (4,145)$ 3,270 
______________________
(a)    2019 and 2018 amounts primarily relate to the acquisition of Gulf Power. See Note 6 - Gulf Power Company.
NEE's primary capital requirements are for expanding and enhancing FPL's and Gulf Power's electric system and generation facilities to
continue to provide reliable service to meet customer electricity demands and for funding NEER's investments in independent power and
other projects. See Note 15 - Commitments for estimated capital expenditures in 2021 through 2025. The following table provides a
summary of capital investments for 2020 , 2019  and 2018 .
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
(millions)
FPL:
Generation:
New $ 1,464 $ 1,242 $ 976 
Existing 1,063 1,215 1,142 
Transmission and distribution 3,150 2,893 2,456 
Nuclear fuel 203 195 123 
General and other 651 550 334 
Other, primarily change in accrued property additions and exclusion of AFUDC - equity 149 (340) 104 
Total 6,680 5,755 5,135 
Gulf Power 1,012 729 — 
NEER:
Wind 3,359 1,974 4,093 
Solar 1,920 1,741 698 
Battery storage 168 29 37 
Nuclear, including nuclear fuel 125 179 233 
Natural gas pipelines 269 687 873 
Other gas infrastructure 572 969 893 
Other (2019 primarily related to acquisitions, see Note 6) 480 926 362 
Total 6,893 6,505 7,189 
Corporate and Other (2019 primarily related to acquisitions, see Note 6) 25 4,473 680 
Total capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel purchases $ 14,610 $ 17,462 $ 13,004 
.(a)
(a)
41
Table of Contents
Liquidity
At December 31, 2020, NEE's total net available liquidity was approximately $10.9 billion. The table below provides the components of
FPL's, Gulf Power's and NEECH's net available liquidity at December 31, 2020.
Gulf Maturity Date
FPL Power NEECH Total FPL Gulf Power NEECH
(millions)
Syndicated revolving credit facilities $2,913 $ 900 $ 5,282 $ 9,095 2021 - 2025 2025 2021 - 2025
Issued letters of credit (3) — (484) (487)
2,910 900 4,798 8,608 
Bilateral revolving credit facilities 680 100 2,400 3,180 2021 - 2022 2021 2021 - 2023
Borrowings — — — — 
680 100 2,400 3,180 
Letter of credit facilities — — 950 950 2022 - 2023
Issued letters of credit — — (885) (885)
— — 65 65 
Subtotal 3,590 1,000 7,263 11,853 
Cash and cash equivalents 20 5 1,077 1,102 
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings
outstanding (1,526) (225) (258) (2,009)
Net available liquidity $2,084 $ 780 $ 8,082 $10,946 
______________________
(a)    See Note 6 - Merger of FPL and Gulf Power regarding FPL's assumption of Gulf Power's revolving credit facilities and debt on January 1, 2021.
(b)    Provide for the funding of loans up to the amount of the credit facility and the issuance of letters of credit up to $2,525 million ($575 million for FPL, $75 million for Gulf
Power and $1,875 million for NEECH). The entire amount of the credit facilities is available for general corporate purposes and to provide additional liquidity in the event
of a loss to the companies’ or their subsidiaries’ operating facilities (including, in the case of FPL, a transmission and distribution property loss). FPL’s syndicated
revolving credit facilities are also available to support the purchase of $948 million of pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue bonds (tax
exempt bonds) in the event they are tendered by individual bondholders and not remarketed prior to maturity, as well as, the repayment of approximately $556 million of
floating rate notes in the event an individual noteholder requires repayment prior to maturity. Gulf Power's syndicated revolving credit facilities are also available to
support the purchase of approximately $426 million of its tax exempt bonds in the event they are tendered by individual bondholders and not remarketed prior to maturity.
Approximately $2,314 million of FPL's and $4,062 million of NEECH's syndicated revolving credit facilities expire in 2025.
(c)    Approximately $300 million of NEECH's bilateral revolving credit facilities is available for costs incurred in connection with the development, construction and operations of
wind and solar power generation facilities.
(d)    Only available for the issuance of letters of credit.
At December 31, 2020, 73 banks participate in FPL’s, Gulf Power's and NEECH’ s revolving credit facilities, with no one bank  providing
more than 7% of the combined revolving credit facilities. European banks provide approximately 24% of the combined revolving credit
facilities. Pursuant to a 1998 guarantee agreement, NEE guarantees the payment of NEECH’ s debt obligations under its revolving credit
facilities. In order for FPL, Gulf Power or NEECH to borrow or to have letters of credit issued under the terms of their respective
revolving credit facilities and, also for NEECH, its letter of credit facilities, FPL, in the case of FPL, Gulf Power in the case of Gulf Power ,
and NEE, in the case of NEECH, are required, among other things, to maintain a ratio of funded debt to total capitalization that does not
exceed a stated ratio. The FPL, Gulf Power and NEECH revolving credit facilities also contain default and related acceleration
provisions relating to, among other things, failure of FPL, Gulf Power and NEE, as the case may be, to maintain the respective ratio of
funded debt to total capitalization at or below the specified ratio. At December 31, 2020, each of NEE, Gulf Power and FPL was in
compliance with its required ratio.
Capital Support
Guarantees, Letters of Credit, Surety Bonds and Indemnifications (Guarantee Arrangements)
Certain subs idiaries of NEE issue guarantees and obtain letters of credit and surety bonds, as well as provide indemnities, to facilitate
commercial transactions with third parties and financings. Substantially all of the guarantee arrangements are on behalf of NEE’ s
consolidated subsidiaries, as discussed in more detail below . NEE is not required to recogniz e liabilities associated with guarantee
arrangements issued on behalf of its consolida ted subsidiaries unless it becomes probable that they will be required to perform. At
December 31, 2020, NEE believes that there is no material exposure related to these guarantee arrangements.
NEE subsidiaries issue guarantees related to equity contribution agreements associated with the development, construction and
financing of certain power generation facilities, engineering, procurement and construction agreements and equity contributions
associated with natural gas pipeline projects under development and construction and a related natural gas transportation agreement.
Commitments associated with these activities are included in the contracts table in Note 15.(a) (a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
`
42
Table of Contents
In addition, at December 31, 2020, NEE subsidiaries had approximately $4.3 billion in guarantees related to obligations under
purchased power agreements, nuclear-related activities, payment obligations related to PTCs, as well as other types of contractual
obligations (see Note 6 - GridLiance and Note 15 - Commitments).
In some instances, subs idiaries of NEE elect to issue guarantees instead of posting other forms of collateral required under certain
financing arrangements, as well as for other project-level cash management activities. At December 31, 2020, these guarantees totaled
approximately $390 million and support, among  other things, cash management activities, including those related to debt service and
O&M service agreements, as well as other specific project financing requirements.
Subsidiaries of NEE also issue guarantees to support customer supply and proprietary power and gas trading activities, including the
buying and selling of wholesale and retail energy commodities. At December 31, 2020, the estimated mark-to-market exposure (the total
amount that these subsid iaries of NEE could be required to fund based on energy commodity market prices at December 31, 2020) plus
contract settlement net payables, net of collateral posted for obligations under these guarantees totaled approximately $616 million.
At December 31, 2020, subsidiaries of NEE also had approximately $1.8 billion of standby letters of credit and approximately $621
million of surety bonds to support certain of the commercial activities discussed above. FPL's and NEECH's credit facilities are available
to support the amount of the standby letters of credit.
In addition, as part of contract negotiations in the normal course of business, certain subsidiarie s of NEE have agreed and in the future
may agree to make paym ents to compensate or indemnify other parties, including those associa ted with asset divestitures, for possible
unfavorable financial consequences resulting from specified events. The specified events may include, but are not limited to, an adverse
judgment in a lawsuit, or the imposition of additional taxes due to a change in tax law or interpretations of the tax law, or the triggering of
cash grant recapture provisions under the Recovery Act. NEE is unable to estimate the maximum potential amount of future payments
under some of these contracts because events that would obligate them to make payments have not yet occurred or, if any such event
has occurred, they have not been notified of its occurrence.
NEECH, a 100% owned  subsidiary of NEE, provides funding for, and holds ownership interests  in, NEE's operating subsidiaries other
than FPL. NEE has fully and unconditionally guaranteed certain payment obligations of NEECH , including most of its debt and all of its
debentures registered pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933 and commercial paper issuances, as well as most of its payment
guarantees and indemnifications, and NEECH has guaranteed certain debt and other obligations of subsidiaries within the NEER
segment. Certain guarantee arrangements described above contain requirements for NEECH and FPL to maintain a specified credit
rating. For a discussion of credit rating downgrade triggers, see Credit Ratings below .
NEE fully and unconditionally guarantees NEECH debentures pursuant to a guarantee agreement, dated as of June 1, 1999 (1999
guarantee) and NEECH junior subordinated debe ntures pursuant to an indenture, dated as of September 1, 2006 (2006 guarantee). The
1999 guaran tee is an unsecured obligation of NEE and ranks equally and ratably with all other unsecured and unsubordinated
indebtedness of NEE. The 2006 guarantee is unsecured and subordinate and junior in right of payment to NEE senior indebtedness (as
defined therein). No payment on those junior subordinated debentures may be made under the 2006 guarantee until all NEE senior
indebtedness has been paid in full in certain circumstances. NEE’ s and NEECH’ s ability to meet their financial obligations are primarily
dependent on their subsidiaries’  net income, cash flows and their ability to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds to NEE and
NEECH. The dividend-paying ability of some of the subsidiaries is limited by contractual restricti ons which are contained in outstanding
financing agreements.
43
Table of Contents
Summarized financial information of NEE and NEECH is as follows:
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Issuer/Guarantor
CombinedNEECH
ConsolidatedNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ (1)$ 5,093 $ 17,997 
Operating income (loss) $ (269)$ 1,221 $ 5,116 
Net income (loss) $ (500)$ (551)$ 2,369 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE/NEECH $ (500)$ — $ 2,919 
December 31, 2020
Issuer/Guarantor
CombinedNEECH
ConsolidatedNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Total current assets $ 620 $ 4,571 $ 7,382 
Total noncurrent assets $ 2,069 $ 52,565 $ 120,302 
Total current liabilities $ 4,317 $ 9,991 $ 15,558 
Total noncurrent liabilities $ 22,854 $ 31,439 $ 67,197 
Noncontrolling interests $ — $ 8,416 $ 8,416 
————————————
(a)Excludes intercompany transactions, and investments in, and equity in earnings of, subsidiaries.
(b)Information has been prepared on the same basis of accounting as NEE's consolidated financial statements.
Shelf Registration
In July 2018 , NEE, NEECH and FPL filed a shelf registration statement with the SEC for an unspecified amount of securities, which
became effective upon filing. The amount of securities issuable by the companies is established from time to time by their respective
boards of directors. Securities that may be issued under the registration statement include, depending on the registrant, senior debt
securities, subordinated debt securities, junior subordinated debentures, first mortgage bonds, common stock, preferred stock, stock
purchase contracts, stock purchase units, warrants and guarantees related to certain of those securities.(a) (b) (b)
(a) (b) (b)
44
Table of Contents
Credit Ratings
NEE’ s liquidity , ability to access credit and capital markets, cost of borrowings and collater al posting requirements under certain
agreements is dependent on its and its subsidiaries credit ratings. At February 12, 2021, Moody’ s Investors Service, Inc. (Moody’ s), S&P
Global Ratings (S&P) and Fitch Ratings, Inc. (Fitch) had assigned the following credit ratings to NEE, FPL  and NEECH:
Moody's S&P Fitch
NEE:
Corporate credit rating Baa1 A- A-
FPL:
Corporate credit rating A1 A A
First mortgage bonds Aa2 A+ AA-
Senior unsecured notes A1 A A+
Pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue bonds VMIG-1/P-1 A-1 F1
Commercial paper P-1 A-1 F1
NEECH:
Corporate credit rating Baa1 A- A-
Debentures Baa1 BBB+ A-
Junior subordinated debentures Baa2 BBB BBB
Commercial paper P-2 A-2 F2
_________________________
(a)    A security rating is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold securities and should be evaluated independently of any other rating. The rating is subject to revision or
withdrawal at any time by the assigning rating organization.
(b)    The outlook indicated by each of Moody's, S&P and Fitch is stable.
(c)    Short-term ratings are presented as all bonds outstanding are currently paying a short-term interest rate. At FPL's election, a portion or all of the bonds may be adjusted to
a long-term interest rate.
NEE and its subsidiarie s have no credit rating downgrade triggers that would accelerate the maturity dates of outstanding debt. A
change in ratings is not an event of default under applicable debt instruments, and while there are conditions to drawing on the credit
facilities noted above, the maintenance of a specific minimum credit rating is not a condition to drawing on these credit facilities.
Commitment fees and interest rates on loans under these credit facilities’  agreements are tied to credit ratings. A ratings downgrade also
could reduce the accessibility and increase the cost of commercial paper and other short-ter m debt issuances and borrowings and
additional or replacement credit facilities. In addition, a ratings downgrade could result in, among other things, the requirement that NEE
subsidiaries post collateral under certain agreem ents and guarantee arrangements, including, but not limited to, those related to fuel
procurement, power sales and purchases, nuclear decommissioning funding, debt-related reserves and trading activities. FPL’s, Gulf
Power's and NEECH’ s credit facilities are available to support these potential requirements.
Covenants
NEE's charter does not limit the dividends that may be paid on its common stock. As a practical matter , the ability of NEE to pay
dividends on its common stock is dependent upon, among other things, dividends paid to it by its subsidiaries. For example, FPL pays
dividends to NEE in a manner consistent with FPL's long-term targeted capital structure. However , the mortgage securing FPL's first
mortgage bonds contains provisions which, under certain conditions, restrict the payment of dividends to NEE and the issuance of
additional first mortgage bonds. Additionally , in some circumstances, the mortgage restricts the amount of retained earnings that FPL
can use to pay cash dividends on its common stock. The restricted amount may change based on factors set out in the mortgage. Other
than this restriction on the payment of common stock dividends, the mortgage does not restrict FPL's use of retained earnings. At
December 31, 2020, no retained earnings were restricted by these provisions of the mortgage and, in light of FPL's current financial
condition and level of earnings, management does not expect that planned financing activities or dividends would be affected by these
limitations.
FPL may issue first mortgage bonds under its mortgage subject to its meeting an adjusted net earnings test set forth in the mortgage,
which generally  requires adjusted net earnings to be at least twice the annual interest requirements  on, or at least 10% of the aggregate
principal amount of, FPL’s first mortgage bonds including those to be issued and any other non-junior FPL indebtedness. At
December 31, 2020, coverage for the 12 months ended December 31, 2020 would have been approximately 8.2 times the annual
interest requirements and approximately 3.6 times the aggregate principal requirements. New first mortgage bonds are also limited to an
amount equal to the sum of 60% of unfunded property additions after adjustments to offset property retirements, the amount of retired
first mortgage bonds or qualified lien bonds and the amount of cash on deposit with the mortga ge trustee. At December 31, 2020, FPL
could have issued in excess of $25 billion of additional first mortgage bonds based on the unfun ded property additions and retired first
mortgage bonds. At December 31, 2020, no cash was deposited with the mortgage trustee for these purposes.(a) (a) (a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(b)
45
Table of Contents
In Septembe r 2006, NEE and NEECH executed a Replacement Capital Covenant (as amended , September 2006 RCC) in connection
with NEECH's offering of $350 million principal amount of Series B Enhanced Junior Subordi nated Debentures due 2066 (Series B
junior subord inated debe ntures). The September 2006 RCC is for the benefit of persons that buy, hold or sell a specified series of long-
term indebtedness (covered debt) of NEECH (other than the Series B junior subordinated debentures) or, in certain cases, of NEE.
NEECH's 3.625% Debentures, Series due June 15, 2023 have been designated as the covered debt under the September 2006 RCC.
The September 2006 RCC provides that NEECH may redeem, and NEE or NEECH may purchase, any Series B junior subordinated
debentures on or before October 1, 2036, only to the extent that the redemption or purchase price does not exceed a specified amount
of proceeds from the sale of qualifying securities, subject to certain limitations described in the September 2006 RCC. Qualifying
securities are securities  that have equity-like characteristics that are the same as, or more  equity-like than, the Series B junior
subordinated debentures at the time of redemption or purchase, which are sold within 365 days prior to the date of the redemption or
repurchase of the Series B junior subordinated debentures.
In June 2007 , NEE and NEECH executed a Replacement Capital Covenant (as amended, June 2007 RCC) in connection with NEECH's
offering of $400 million  principal amount of its Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (Series C junior subordinated
debentures). The June 2007 RCC is for the benefit of persons that buy, hold or sell a specified series of covered debt of NEECH (other
than the Series C junior subordinated debentures) or, in certain cases, of NEE. NEECH's 3.625% Debentures, Series due June 15, 2023
have been designated as the covered debt under the June 2007 RCC. The June 2007 RCC provides that NEECH may redeem or
purchase, or satisfy , discharge or defease (collectively , defease), and NEE and any majority-ow ned subsidiary of NEE or NEECH may
purchase, any Series C junior subordinated debentures on or before June 15, 2037, only to the extent that the principal amount
defeased or the applicab le redemption or purchase price does not exceed a specified amount raised from the issuance, during the 365
days prior to the date of that redemption, purchase or defeasance, of qualifying securities that have equity-like characteristics that are
the same as, or more equity-like than, the applicable characteristics of the Series C junior subordinated debentures at the time of
redemption, purchase or defeasance, subject to certain limitations described in the June 2007 RCC.
New Accounting Rules and Interpretations
Reference Rate Reform  - In March 2020, the FASB issued an accounting standards update which provides certain options to apply
GAAP  guida nce on contract modifications and hedge accounting as companies transition from the London Inter-Bank Offered Rate and
other interbank of fered rates to alternative reference rates. See Note 1 - Reference Rate Reform.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
NEE’ s significant accounting policies are described in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, which were prepared under
GAAP . Critical accounting policies are those that NEE believes are both most important to the portrayal of its financial condition and
results of operations, and require complex, subjective judgments, often as a result of the need to make estimates and assumptions
about the effect of matters that are inherently uncertain. Judgments and uncertainties affecting the application of those policies may
result in materially dif ferent amounts being reported under dif ferent conditions or using dif ferent assumptions.
NEE considers the following policies to be the most critical in understanding the judgme nts that are involved in preparing its
consolidated financial statements:
Accounting for Derivatives and Hedging Activities
NEE uses derivative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent in
the purchase and sale of fuel and electricity , as well as interest rate and foreign currency exch ange rate risk associated primarily with
outstanding and expected future debt issuances and borrowings. In addition, NEE, through NEER, uses derivatives to optimize the value
of its power generation and gas infrastructure assets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to take advantage
of expected future favorable price movements.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Accounting pronouncem ents require the use of fair value accounting if certain conditions are met, which may require significant
judgment to measure the fair value of assets and liabilities. This applies not only to traditional financial derivative instruments, but to any
contract having the accounting characteristics of a derivative. As a result, significant judgment must be used in applying derivatives
accounting guidance to contracts. In the event changes in interpretation occur , it is possible that contracts that currently are excluded
from derivati ves accounting rules would have to be recorded on the balance sheet at fair value, with changes in the fair value recorded
in the statement of income.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Derivative instruments, when required to be marked to market, are recorded on the balance sheet at fair value using a combination of
market and income approaches. Fair values for some of the longer-term contracts where liquid  markets are not available are derived
through the use of industry-standard valuation techniques, such as internally developed models which
46
Table of Contents
estimate the fair value of a contract by calculating the present value of the difference between the contract price and the forward prices.
Forward prices represen t the price at which a buyer or seller could contract today to purchase or sell a commodity at a future date. The
near-term forward market for electricity is gene rally liquid and therefore the prices in the early years of the forward curves reflect
observable market quotes. However , in the later years, the market is much less liquid and forward price curves must be developed using
factors including the forward prices for the commodities used as fuel to generate electricity , the expected system heat rate (which
measures the efficiency  of power plants in conv erting fuel to electricity) in the region where the purchase or sale takes place, and a
fundamental forecast of expected spot prices based on modeled supply and demand in the region. NEE estimates the fair value of
interest rate and foreign currency derivatives using an income approach based on a discounted cash flows valuation technique utilizing
the net amount of estimated future cash inflows and outflows related to the derivative agreements . The assumptions in these models are
critical since any changes therein could have a significant impact on the fair value of the derivative.
At FPL, subs tantially all changes in the fair value of energy derivative transactions are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability until the
contracts are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the  fuel clause . See Note 3.
In NEE’ s non-rate regulated operations, predominantly NextEra Energy Resources, essentially all changes in the derivatives’  fair value
for power purchases and sales, fuel sales and trading activities are recognized on a net basis in operating revenues; fuel purchases
used in the production of electricity are recognize d in fuel, purchased power and interchange expense; and the equity method investees’
related activity is recognized in equity in earnings of equity method investees in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income.
For interest rate and foreign currency derivative instruments, all changes in the derivatives' fair value are recognized in interest expense
and the equity method investees' related activity is recognized in equity in earnings of equity method investees in NEE's consolidated
statements of income. NEE estimates the fair value of these derivatives using an income appro ach based on a discounted cash flows
valuation technique utilizing observable inputs.
Certain derivative transactions at NEER are entered into as economic hedges but the transactions do not meet the requirements for
hedge accounting, hedge accounting treatment is not elected or hedge accounting has been discontinued. Changes in the fair value of
those transactions are marked to market and reported in the consolidated statements of incom e, resulting in earnings volatility . These
changes in fair value are reflected in the non-qualifying hedge category in computing adjusted earnings and could be significant to
NEER’ s results because the economic offset to the positions are not marked to market. As a consequence, NEE's net income reflects
only the movement in one part of economically-linked transactions. For example, a gain (loss) in the non-qualifying hedge category for
certain energy derivatives is offset by decreas es (increases) in the fair value of related physical asset positions in the portfolio or
contracts, which are not marked to market under GAAP . For this reason, NEE’ s management views results expressed excluding the
unrealized mark-to-market impact of the non-qualifying hedges as a meaningful measure of current period performance. For additional
information regarding derivative instruments, see Note 3, Overview and Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity .
Accounting for Pension Benefits
NEE sponsors a qualified noncontributory defined benefit pension plan for substantially all employees of NEE and its subsidiaries.
Management believes that, based on actuarial assumptions and the well-funded status of the pension plan, NEE will not be required to
make any cash contribu tions to the qualified pension plan in the near future. The qualified pension plan has a fully funded trust
dedicated to providing benefits under the plan. NEE allocates net periodic income associated with the pension plan to its subsidiaries
annually using specific criteria.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
For the pension plan, the benefit obligation is the actuarial present value, as of the December 31 measurement date, of all benefits
attributed by the pensio n benefit formula to employee service rendered to that date. The amou nt of benefit to be paid depends on a
number of future even ts incorporated into the pension benefit formula, including an estimate of the average remaining life of
employees/survivors as well as the average years of service rendered. The projected benefit obligation is measured based on
assumptions concerning future interest rates and future employee compensation levels. NEE derives pension income from actuarial
calculations based on the plan’ s provisions and various management assumptions including discount rate, rate of increase in
compensation levels and expected long-term rate of return on plan assets.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Accounting guidance requires recognition of the funded status of the pension plan in the balance sheet, with changes in the funded
status recognized in other comprehensive income within shareholders’  equity in the year in which the changes occur . Since NEE is the
plan sponso r, and its subsidiaries do not have separate rights to the plan assets or direct obligations to their employees, this accounting
guidance is reflected at NEE and not allocated to the subsidiaries. The portion of previously unrecognized actuarial gains and losses
and prior service costs or credits that are estim ated to be allocable to FPL as net periodic (income) cost in future periods and that
otherwise would be recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income are classified as regulatory assets and liabilities at NEE in
accordance with regulatory treatment.
47
Table of Contents
Net periodic pension income is calculated using a number of actuarial assumptions. Those assu mptions for the years ended December
31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 include:
 2020 2019 2018
Discount rate 3.22 % 4.26 % 3.59 %
Salary increase 4.40 % 4.40 % 4.10 %
Expected long-term rate of return, net of investment management fees 7.35 % 7.35 % 7.35 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.83 % 3.88 % 3.94 %
In developing these assumptions, NEE evaluated input, including other qualitative and quantitative factors, from its actuaries and
consultants, as well as information available in the marketplace. In addition, for the expected long-term rate of return on pension plan
assets, NEE considered different models, capital market return assumptions and historical returns for a portfolio with an equity/bond
asset mix similar to its pension fund, as well as its pension fund's historical compounded returns. NEE believe s that 7.35% is a
reasonable long-term rate of return, net of invest ment management fees, on its pension plan assets. NEE will continu e to evaluate all of
its actuarial assumptions, including its expected rate of return, at least annually , and will adjust them as appropriate.
NEE utilizes in its determination of pension income a market-related valuation of plan assets.  This market-related valuation reduces
year-to-year volatility and recognizes investme nt gains or losses over a five-year period following the year in which they occur .
Investment gains or losses for this purpose are the difference between the expected return calculated using the market-related value of
plan assets and the actual return realized on those plan assets. Since the market-related value of plan assets recognizes gains or
losses over a five-year period, the future value of plan assets will be affected as previously deferred gains or losses are recognized.
Such gains and losses together with other differences between actual results and the estimates used in the actuarial valuations are
deferred and recognized in determining pension income only to the extent they exceed 10% of the greater of projected benefit
obligations or the market-related value of plan assets.
The followin g table illustrates the effect on net periodic pension income of changing the critical actuarial assumptions discussed above,
while holding all other assumptions constant:
Increase (Decrease) in 2020
Net Periodic Pension Income
Change in
Assumption NEE FPL
(millions)
Expected long-term rate of return (0.5)% $ (22)$ (13)
Discount rate 0.5% $ 13 $ 8 
Salary increase 0.5% $ (4)$ (3)
NEE also utilizes actuarial assumptions about mortality to help estimate obligations of the pension plan. NEE has adopted the latest
revised mortality tables and mortality improvement scales released by the Society of Actuaries, which did not have a material impact on
the pension plan's obligation.
See Note 12.
Carrying Value of Long-Lived Assets
NEE evaluates long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may not be
recoverable.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
The amount  of future net cash flows, the timing of the cash flows and the determination of an appropriate interest rate all involve
estimates and judgments about future events. In particular , the aggregate amount of cash flows determines whether an impairment
exists, and the timing of the cash flows is critical in determining fair value. Because each assessment is based on the facts and
circumstances associated with each long-lived asset, the ef fects of changes in assumptions cannot be generalized.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
An impairment loss is required to be recognize d if the carrying value of the asset exceeds the undiscounted future net cash flows
associated with that asset. The impairment loss to be recognized is the amount by which the carrying value of the long-lived asset
exceeds the asset’ s fair value. In most instances, the fair value is determined by discounting estimated future cash flows using an
appropriate interest rate.
48
Table of Contents
Carrying Value of Equity Method Investments
NEE evaluates its equity  method investments for impairment when events or changes in circumstances indicate that the fair value of the
investment is less than the carrying value an d the investment may be other-than-temporarily impaired.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Indicators of a potential impairment include, but are not limited to, a series of operating losses of an investee, the absence of an ability to
recover the carrying amount of the investment, the inability of the investee to sustain an earnings capacity and a current fair value of an
investment that may be less than its carrying value. If indicators of impairment exist, an estima te of the investment’ s fair value will be
calculated. Approaches for estimating fair value include, among others, an income approach using a probability-weighted discounted
cash flows model and a market approach using an earnings before interest, taxes, depreciati on and amortization (EBITDA) multiple
model. The probability assigned to each scenario as well as the cash flows and EBITDA  multiple  identified are critical in determining fair
value.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
An impairme nt loss is required to be recognize d if the impairment is deemed to be other than temporary . Assessment of whether an
investment is other-than-temporarily impaired involves, among other factors, consideration of the length of time that the fair value is
below the carrying value, current expected perfo rmance relative to the expected performance when the investment was initially made,
performance relative to peers, industry performa nce relative to the economy , credit rating, regulatory actions and legal and permitting
challenges. If management is unable to reasona bly assert that an impairment is temporary or believes that there will not be full recovery
of the carryi ng value of its investment, then the impairment is considered to be other than temp orary . Investments that are other-than-
temporarily impaired are written down to their estimated fair value and cannot subsequently be written back up for increases in
estimated fair value. Impairment losses are recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees in NEE’ s consolidated
statements of income. See Note 4 - Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements.
Decommissioning an d Dismantlement
NEE accounts for asset retirement obligations  and conditional asset retirement obligations (collectively , AROs) under accounting
guidance that requires a liability for the fair value of an ARO to be recognized in the period in which it is incurred if it can be reasonably
estimated, with the offsetting associated asset retirement costs capitalized as part of the carrying amount of the long-lived assets. NEE's
AROs relate  primarily to decommissioning obligations of FPL's and NEER's nuclear units and to obligations for the dismantlement of
certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
The calculation of the future cost of retiring long-lived assets, including nuclear decommissioning and plant dismantlement costs,
involves estimating the amount and timing of future expenditures and making judgments concerning whether or not such costs are
considered a legal obligation. Estimating the amount and timing of future expenditures includes, among other things, making projections
of when assets will be retired and ultimately decommissioned and how costs will escalate with inflation. In addition, NEE also makes
interest rate and rate of return projections on its investments in determining recommended funding requirements for nuclear
decommissioning costs. Periodically , NEE is required to update these estimates and projections which can affect the annual expense
amounts recognized, the liabilities recorded and the annual funding requirements for nuclear decommissioning costs. For example, an
increase of 0.25% in the assumed escalation rates for nuclear decommissioning costs would increase NEE’ s AROs at December 31,
2020 by approximately  $128 million.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
FPL - For ratemaking purpos es, FPL accrues and funds for nuclear plant decommissioning costs over the expected service life of each
unit based on studies that are approved by the FPSC. The most recent studies, filed in 2020, reflect, among other things, the expiration
dates of the operating licenses for FPL’s nuclear units at the time of the studies. FPL’s portion of the future cost of decommissioning its
four nuclear units, including spent fuel storage above what is expected to be refunded by the DOE under a spent fuel settlement
agreement, is estimated to be approximately $7.0 billion, or $2.5 billion expressed in 2020 dollars.
FPL accrues the cost of dismantling its fossil and solar plants over the expected service life of each unit based on studies filed with the
FPSC. Unlike nuclear decommissioning, dismantlement costs are not funded. The most recent studies became effective January 1,
2017. At December 31, 2020, FPL’s portion of the ultimate cost to dismantle its fossil and solar units is approximately $1.2 billion, or
$541 million expressed in 2020 dollars. The majority of the dismantlement costs are not reported as AROs. FPL accrues for interim
removal costs over the life of the related assets based on depreciation studies approved by the FPSC. Any differences between the
amount of the ARO and the amount recorded  for ratemaking purpose s are reported as a regulatory liability in accordance with regulatory
accounting.
49
Table of Contents
The components of FPL’s decommissioning of nuclear plants, dismantlement of plants and other accrued asset removal costs are as
follows:
Nuclear
DecommissioningFossil/Solar
DismantlementInterim Removal
Costs and Other Total
December 31, December 31, December 31, December 31,
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
(millions)
AROs $ 1,604 $ 2,076 $ 194 $ 186 $ 6 $ 6 $ 1,804 $ 2,268 
Less capitalized ARO asset net of accumulated
depreciation — 225 26 48 1 1 27 274 
Accrued asset removal costs 408 368 145 144 462 645 1,015 1,157 
Asset retirement obligation regulatory expense
difference 3,690 2,904 (102) (72) (5) (4) 3,583 2,828 
Accrued decommissioning, dismantlement and other
accrued asset removal costs $ 5,702 $ 5,123 $ 211 $ 210 $ 462 $ 646 $ 6,375 $ 5,979 
______________________
(a)    See Note 11 - Asset Retirement Obligations.
(b)    Included in noncurrent regulatory liabilities on NEE’s and FPL’s consolidated balance sheets. See Note 1 - Rate Regulation.
(c)    Represents total amount accrued for ratemaking purposes.
NEER - NEER recor ds liabilities for the present value of its expected nuclear plant decommissioning costs which are determined using
various internal and external data and applying  a probability percentage to a variety of scenarios regarding the life of the plant and
timing of decommissioning. The liabilities are being accreted using the interest method through the date decommissioning activities are
expected to be complete. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the AROs for decommissioning of NEER’ s nuclear plants approximated
$637 million and $623 million, respectively . NEER’ s portion of the ultimate cost of decommissioning its nuclear plants, including costs
associated with spent fuel storage above what is expected to be refunded by the DOE under  a spent fuel settlement agreement, is
estimated to be approximatel y $9.5 billion, or $2.1 billion  expressed in 2020 dollars.
See Note 1 - Asset Retir ement Obligations and - Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlem ent of Plants and Other Accrued Asset
Removal Costs and Note 11.
Regulatory Accounting
Certain of NEE's businesses are subject to rate regulation which results in the recording of regulatory assets and liabilities. See Note 1 -
Rate Regulation for details regarding NEE’ s regulatory assets and liabilities.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Regulatory assets and liabilities represent probable future revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the
ratemaking process. Regulatory assets and liabilities are included in rate base or otherwise earn (pay) a return on investment during the
recovery period.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Accounting guidance allows regulators to create  assets and impose liabilities that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities.
If NEE's rate-regulated entities, primarily FPL, were no longer subject to cost-based rate regula tion, the existing regulatory assets and
liabilities would be written off unless regulators specify an alternative means of recovery or refun d. In addition, the regulators, including
the FPSC for FPL, have the authority to disallow recovery of costs that they consider excessive or imprudently incurred. Such costs may
include, among others, fuel and O&M expenses, the cost of replacing power lost when fossil and nuclear units are unavailable, storm
restoration costs and costs associated with the construction or acquisition of new facilities. The continued applicability of regulatory
accounting is assessed at each reporting period.
ENERGY MARKETING AND TRADING AND MARKET RISK SENSITIVITY
NEE and FPL are expo sed to risks associated with adverse changes in commodity prices, interest rates and equity prices. Financial
instruments and positions affecting the financial statements of NEE and FPL described below are held primarily for purposes other than
trading. Market risk is measured as the potential  loss in fair value resulting from hypothetical reasonably possible changes in commodity
prices, intere st rates or equity prices over the next year. Management has established risk management policies to monitor and manage
such market risks, as well as credit risks.(a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
50
Table of Contents
Commodity Price Risk
NEE and FPL use deriv ative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks
inherent in the purchase  and sale of fuel and electricity . In addition, NEE, through NEER, uses  derivatives to optimize the value of its
power gene ration and gas infrastructure assets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to take advantage of
expected future favorable price movements. See Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates - Accounting for Derivatives and Hedging
Activities and Note 3.
During 2019 and 2020, the changes in the fair value of NEE’ s consolidated subsidiaries’  energy contract derivative instruments were as
follows:
Hedges on Owned Assets
TradingNon-
QualifyingFPL Cost
Recovery
ClausesGulf Power
Cost Recovery
Clauses NEE Total
(millions)
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2018 $ 593 $ 794 $ (41) $ — $ 1,346 
Reclassification to realized at settlement of contracts (215) (154) 30 7 (332)
Value of contracts acquired 28 9 — (6) 31 
Net option premium purchases (issuances) 43 5 — — 48 
Changes in fair value excluding reclassification to realized 202 555 1 (2) 756 
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2019 651 1,209 (10) (1) 1,849 
Reclassification to realized at settlement of contracts (329) (253) 11 1 (570)
Value of contracts acquired 91 (36) — — 55 
Net option premium purchases (issuances) 10 4 — — 14 
Changes in fair value excluding reclassification to realized 283 72 (1) — 354 
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2020 706 996 — — 1,702  
Net margin cash collateral paid (received) (48)
Total mark-to-market energy contract net assets (liabilities) at
December 31, 2020 $ 706 $ 996 $ — $ — $ 1,654  
NEE’ s total mark-to-market energy contract net assets (liabilities) at December 31, 2020 shown above are included on the consolidated
balance sheets as follows:
December 31,
2020
(millions)
Current derivative assets $ 567 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,587 
Current derivative liabilities (240)
Noncurrent derivative liabilities (260)
NEE's total mark-to-market energy contract net assets $ 1,654 
51
Table of Contents
The sources of fair value estimates and maturity of energy contract derivative instruments at December 31, 2020 were as follows:
Maturity
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 Thereafter Total
(millions)
Trading:
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets $(195)$ 10 $ 29 $ 42 $ — $ — $(114)
Significant other observable inputs 11 18 (7) (27) 18 (68) (55)
Significant unobservable inputs 202 62 67 62 62 420 875 
Total 18 90 89 77 80 352 706 
Owned Assets - Non-Qualifying:       
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets 10 3 10 6 — — 29 
Significant other observable inputs 64 79 66 33 41 184 467 
Significant unobservable inputs 44 45 36 37 37 301 500 
Total 118 127 112 76 78 485 996 
Owned Assets - FPL Cost Recovery Clauses:       
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets — — — — — — — 
Significant other observable inputs 1 — — — — — 1 
Significant unobservable inputs — (1) — — — — (1)
Total 1 (1) — — — — — 
Total sources of fair value $137 $216 $201 $153 $158 $ 837 $1,702 
With respect to commodities, NEE’ s Exposure Management Committee (EMC), which is comprised of certain members of senior
management, and NEE's chief executive officer are responsible for the overall approval of market risk management policies and the
delegation of approval and authorization levels. The EMC and NEE's chief executive officer recei ve periodic updates on market positions
and related exposures, credit exposures and overall risk management activities.
NEE uses a value-at-ris k (VaR) model to measure commodity price market risk in its trading and mark-to-market portfolios. The VaR is
the estimated loss of market value based on a one-day holding period at a 95% confid ence level using historical simulation
methodology . The V aR figures are as follows:
TradingNon-Qualifying Hedges
and Hedges in FPL  Cost Recovery
Clauses Total
FPL NEER NEE FPL NEER NEE FPL NEER NEE
(millions)
December 31, 2019 $ — $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ 25 $ 25 $ — $ 26 $ 26 
December 31, 2020 $ — $ 3 $ 3 $ 1 $ 77 $ 78 $ 1 $ 84 $ 85 
Average for the year ended December 31, 2020 $ — $ 3 $ 3 $ 1 $ 51 $ 51 $ 1 $ 52 $ 52 
______________________
(a)    Non-qualifying hedges are employed to reduce the market risk exposure to physical assets or contracts which are not marked to market. The VaR figures for the non-
qualifying hedges and hedges in FPL cost recovery clauses category do not represent the economic exposure to commodity price movements.
Interest Rate Risk
NEE's and FPL's financi al results are exposed to risk resulting from changes in interest rates as a result of their respective outstanding
and expected future issuances of debt, investments in special use funds and other investments. NEE and FPL manage their respec tive
interest rate exposure by monitoring current interest rates, entering into interest rate contracts and using a combination of fixed rate and
variable rate debt. Interest rate contracts are used to mitigate and adjust interest rate exposure when deemed appropriate based upon
market conditions or when required by financing agreements.(a)
52
Table of Contents
The following are estimates of the fair value of NEE's and FPL's financial instruments that are exposed to interest rate risk:
 December 31, 2020  December 31, 2019
 Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value  Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value
 (millions)
NEE:      
Fixed income securities:      
Special use funds $ 2,134 $ 2,134 $ 2,099 $ 2,099 
Other investments, primarily debt securities $ 247 $ 247 $ 181 $ 181 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 46,082 $ 51,525 $ 39,667 $ 42,928 
Interest rate contracts - net unrealized losses $ (961)$ (961) $ (716)$ (716)
FPL:      
Fixed income securities - special use funds $ 1,617 $ 1,617 $ 1,574 $ 1,574 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 15,676 $ 19,470 $ 14,161 $ 16,448 
______________________
(a)    See Notes 3 and 4.
The special use funds of NEE and FPL consist of restricted funds set aside to cover the cost of storm damage for FPL and for the
decommissioning of NEE's and FPL's nuclear power plants. See Note 1 - Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery . A
portion of these funds is invested in fixed income debt securities primarily carried at estimated fair value. At FPL, changes in fair value,
including any credit losses, result in a correspo nding adjustment to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts based on current
regulatory treatment. The changes in fair value for NEE's non-rate regulated operations result in a corresponding adjustment to other
comprehensive income, except for credit losses  and unrealized losses on available for sale securities intended or required to be sold
prior to recovery of the amortized cost basis, which are reported in current period earnings. Because the funds set aside by FPL for
storm damage could be needed at any time, the related investments are generally more liquid and, therefore, are less sensitive to
changes in interest rates. The nuclear decommissioning funds, in contrast, are generally invested in longer-term securities.
At December 31, 2020, NEE had interest rate contracts with a net notional amount of approximately $10.5 billion related to expected
future and outstanding debt issuances and borrowings. The net notional amount consists of approximately $10.9 billion to manage
exposure to the variabili ty of cash flows associated with expected future and outstanding debt issuances at NEECH and NEER. This is
offset by approximately $400 million that ef fectively convert fixed-rate debt to variable-rate debt instruments at NEECH. See Note 3.
Based upon a hypothetical 10% decrease in interest rates, which is a reasonable near-term market change, the fair value of NEE’ s net
liabilities would increase by approxim ately $1,278 million ($541 million f or FPL) at December 31, 2020.
Equity Price Risk
NEE and FPL are exposed to risk resulting from changes in prices for equity securities. For example, NEE’ s nuclear decommissioning
reserve funds include marketable equity securi ties carried at their market value of approxima tely $4,726 million and $3,963 million
($3,012 million and $2,491 million for FPL) at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . NEE's and FPL’s investment strategy for
equity secur ities in their nuclear decommissioning reserve funds emphasizes marketable securities which are broadly diversified. At
December 31, 2020, a hypothetical 10% decrease in the prices quoted on stock exchanges, which is a reasonable near-term market
change, would result in a $434 million ($277 million for FPL) reduction in fair value. For FPL, a corresponding adjustment would be
made to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts based on current regulatory treatm ent, and for NEE’ s non-rate regulated
operations, a corresponding amount would be recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's
nuclear decommissioning funds - net in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
Credit Risk
NEE and its subsidiaries , including FPL, are also exposed to credit risk through their energy marketing and trading operations. Credit
risk is the risk that a financial loss will be incurred if a counterparty to a transaction does not fulfill its financial obligation. NEE manages
counterparty credit risk for its subsidiaries with energy marketing and trading operations through established policies, including
counterparty credit limits, and in some cases credit enhancements, such as cash prepayments, letters of credit, cash and other collateral
and guarantees.
Credit risk is also managed through the use of master netting agreements. NEE’ s credit departm ent monitors current and forward credit
exposure to counterparties and their affiliates,  both on an individual and an aggregate basis. For all derivative and contractual
transactions, NEE’ s energy marketing and trading operations, which include FPL's energy marketing and trading(a) (a)
53
Table of Contents
division, are exposed to losses in the event of nonperformance by counterparties to these transactions. Some relevant considerations
when assessing NEE’ s energy marketing and trading operations’  credit risk exposure include the following:
•Operations are primarily concentrated in the energy industry .
•Trade receivables and other financial instruments are predominately with energy , utility and financial services related companies, as
well as municipalities, cooperatives and other trading companies in the U.S.
•Overall credit risk is managed through established credit policies and is overseen by the EMC.
•Prospective and existing customers are reviewed for creditworthiness based upon established standards, with customers not
meeting minimum stand ards providing various credit enhancements or secured payment terms, such as letters of credit or the
posting of margin cash collateral.
•Master netting agreements are used to offset cash and noncash gains and losses arising from derivative instruments with the same
counterparty . NEE’ s policy is to have master netting agreements in place with significant counterparties.
Based on NEE’ s policies  and risk exposures related to credit, NEE and FPL do not anticipate a material adverse effect on their financial
statements as a result of counterparty nonperformance. At December 31, 2020, approximately 83% of NEE’ s and 100% of FPL's energy
marketing and trading counterparty credit risk exposure is associated with companies that have investment grade credit ratings.
Item 7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
See Management’ s Discussion – Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity .
54
Table of Contents
Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
NextEra Energy, Inc.'s (NEE) and Florida Power & Light Company's (FPL) management are responsible for establishing and maintaining
adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). The
consolidated financial statements, which in part are based on informed judgments and estimates made by management, have been prepared in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis.
To aid in carrying out this responsibility, we, along with all other members of management, maintain a system of internal accounting control
which is established after weighing the cost of such controls against the benefits derived. In the opinion of management, the overall system of
internal accounting control provides reasonable assurance that the assets of NEE and FPL and their subsidiaries are safeguarded and that
transactions are executed in accordance with management's authorization and are properly recorded for the preparation of financial statements.
In addition, management believes the overall system of internal accounting control provides reasonable assurance that material errors or
irregularities would be prevented or detected on a timely basis by employees in the normal course of their duties. Any system of internal
accounting control, no matter how well designed, has inherent limitations, including the possibility that controls can be circumvented or
overridden and misstatements due to error or fraud may occur and not be detected. Also, because of changes in conditions, internal control
effectiveness may vary over time. Accordingly, even an effective system of internal control will provide only reasonable assurance with respect to
financial statement preparation and reporting.
The system of internal accounting control is supported by written policies and guidelines, the selection and training of qualified employees, an
organizational structure that provides an appropriate division of responsibility and a program of internal auditing. NEE's written policies include a
Code of Business Conduct & Ethics that states management's policy on conflicts of interest and ethical conduct. Compliance with the Code of
Business Conduct & Ethics is confirmed annually by key personnel.
The Board of Directors pursues its oversight responsibility for financial reporting and accounting through its Audit Committee. This Committee,
which is comprised entirely of independent directors, meets regularly with management, the internal auditors and the independent auditors to
make inquiries as to the manner in which the responsibilities of each are being discharged. The independent auditors and the internal audit staff
have free access to the Committee without management's presence to discuss auditing, internal accounting control and financial reporting
matters.
Management assessed the effectiveness of NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, using the criteria
set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission in the Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013).
Based on this assessment, management believes that NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting was effective as of
December 31, 2020.
NEE's and FPL's independent registered public accounting firm, Deloitte & Touche LLP, is engaged to express an opinion on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated financial statements and an opinion on NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting. Their reports are based on
procedures believed by them to provide a reasonable basis to support such opinions. These reports appear on the following pages.
JAMES L. ROBO REBECCA J. KUJAWA
James L. Robo
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of NEE and
Chairman of FPLRebecca J. Kujawa
Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer
of NEE and FPL
JAMES M. MAY
James M. May
Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer
of NEE
ERIC E. SILAGY KEITH FERGUSON
Eric E. Silagy
President and Chief Executive Officer of FPLKeith Ferguson
Controller of FPL
55
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of
NextEra Energy , Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of NextEra Energy , Inc. and subsid iaries (NEE) and Florida Power & Light
Company and subsidiar ies (FPL) as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria establish ed in Internal Control — Integrated Framework
(2013)  issue d by the Committee of Sponsoring Orga nizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, NEE and FPL
maintained, in all mate rial respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria
established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB),
the consolidated financial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2020 of NEE and FPL and our report dated
February 12, 2021, expressed unqualified opinions on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
NEE's and FPL’s management are responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for their
assessments of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Report on
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on NEE’ s and FPL’s internal control over financial
reporting based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with
respect to NEE and FPL in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities
and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits  in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audits
to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness
exists, testing and evalu ating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and performing such
other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our
opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company's  internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonab le assurance regarding the reliability of
financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to perm it preparation of financial statements in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in
accordance with authorizations of managemen t and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that could have a material effect
on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of
any evaluati on of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may beco me inadequate because of changes in
conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Boca Raton, Florida
February 12, 2021
56
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of
    NextEra Energy , Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolida ted balance sheets of NextEra Energy , Inc. and subsidiaries (NEE) and the related
separate consolidated balance sheets of Florida  Power & Light Company and subsidiaries (FPL ) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
and NEE's and FPL's related consolidated statements of income and of cash flows, NEE's consolidated statements of comprehensive
income and of equity , and FPL’s consolidated statements of common shareholder ’s equity , for each of the three years in the period
ended Dece mber 31, 2020, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial
statements present fairly, in all material respect s, the consolidated financial position of NEE and the consolidated financial position of
FPL as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the three years in the period
ended December 31, 2020, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB),
NEE’ s and FPL’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control –
Integrated Framework (2013)  issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organiz ations of the Treadway Commission and our report dated
February 12, 2021, expressed unqualified opinions on NEE’ s and FPL ’s internal control over financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These financ ial stateme nts are the responsibility  of NEE’ s and FPL’s management. Our respon sibility is to express opinions on NEE’ s
and FPL’s financial state ments based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to NEE and FPL in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of
the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits  in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audits
to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error
or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence
regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used
and significant estimates made by management , as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe
that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements of NEE and
FPL that were communic ated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that
are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are
not, by communicating the critical audit matters below , providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or
disclosures to which they relate.
NEE - Operating Revenue - Unrealized Gains - Refer to Note 3 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
NEE enters into complex energy derivatives and transacts in certain markets that are thinly traded, which may result in subjective
estimates of fair value that include unobservable inputs. Changes in the derivatives’  fair value for power purchases and sales, fuel sales
and trading activities are primarily recognized on a net basis in operating revenues. For the year ended December 31, 2020, unrealized
gains associated with Level 3 transactions of $317 million are included in operating revenues in the consolidated statement of income of
NEE.
Given mana gement uses complex proprietary models and unobservable inputs to estimate the fair value of Level 3 derivative assets and
liabilities, performing audit procedures to evalua te the appropriateness of these models and inputs required a high degree of auditor
judgment and an increased extent of effort, including the need to involve our firm specialists who possess significant quantitative and
modeling expertise.
57
Table of Contents
How the Critical Audit Matter W as Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to operating revenue - unrealized gains included the following, among others:
•We tested the ef fectiveness of controls, including those relating to commodity valuation models, and market data validation.
•We selected a sample of transactions, obtained an understanding of the business rationale of transactions, and read the
underlying contractual agreements.
•We used personnel in our firm who specialize in energy transacting to assist in auditing NEE’ s energy transactions, including
testing certain inputs in management's fair value models.
•We used personnel in our firm who specialize in the valuation of energy products to independently value Level 3 transactions to
provide us with a benchmark for comparison to NEE's valuations.
•We evaluated NEE’ s disclosures related to the proprietary models and unobservable inputs to estimate the fair value of Level 3
derivative assets and liabilities, including the balances recorded and significant assumptions.
NEE – Equity Method Investment Impairment - Refer to Note 4 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
NEE tests its equity method investments for impairment whenever events or changes in circums tances indicate that the investment may
be impaired.
During the preparation of NEE's December 31, 2020 financial statements, it was determined that NextEra Energy Resources, LLC's
(NextEra Energy Resources') investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline, LLC (MVP) accounted for under the equity method of accounting
was other-th an-temporarily impaired. The impairment is the result of continued legal and regulatory challenges that have resulted in
substantial delays in achieving commercial opera tion and increased costs to complete construction. More specifically at the end of 2020
and into early 2021, developments in the current legal, regulatory and political environment have  caused NextEra Energy Resources to
consider the investment impaired and the impairment to be other than temporary . Accordingly , NextEra Energy Resources performed a
fair value analysis based on the market approach to determine the amount of the impairment. The current challenges to complete
construction and the resulting economic outlook for the pipeline were considered in determining the magnitude of the other-than-
temporary impairment. Based on the fair value analysis, the equity method investment with a carrying amount of approximately $1.9
billion was written down to its estimated fair value of approximately $400 million as of December 31, 2020, resulting in an impairment
charge of $1.5 billion (or $1.2 billion after-tax), which is recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees in NEE’ s
consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2020.
The fair value estimate was based on a probability-weighted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA)
multiple valuation technique using a market participant view of the potential different outcomes for the investment. As part of the
valuation, NextEra Energy Resources used observable inputs where available, including the EBITDA  multiples of recent pipeline
transactions. Significant unobservable inputs (Level 3), including the probabilities assigned to the different potential outcomes, the
forecasts of operating revenues and costs, and the projected capital expenditures to complete the project, were also used in the
estimation of fair value.
We identified the impairm ent of MVP  as a critical audit matter because of the significant estimate s and assumptions management made
related to the Level 3 inputs in the estimation of fair value. The audit procedures to evaluate the reasonableness of management’ s
estimates and assumptions related to the probabilities assigned to the potential different outcom es, the forecasts of operating revenues
and costs, and the projected capital expenditures to complete the project required a high degree  of auditor judgment and an increased
extent of ef fort, including the need to involve our fair value specialists.
How the Critical Audit Matter W as Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the Level 3 inputs included in the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of controls over the accounting for the assessment of the MVP  investment for impairment,
including those over the development of the fair value estimate.
•We evaluated the reasonableness of the probabilities related to the legal outcomes and environmental challenges by making
inquiries with legal counsel regarding the likely outcomes of future court rulings, and with operational and executive
management regarding the viability of the development options considered. We compared the results of these legal and
management inquiries to communications among management, to the NEE Board of Directors, and among the MVP  members.
We also read external information included in press releases and earnings releases of the MVP  members and others who are
or were pursuing the construction of interstate pipelines during 2020 and industry news reports.
58
Table of Contents
•We evaluated the reaso nableness of the key assumptions used to develop the potential different outcomes, the forecasts of
operating revenues and costs and the projected capital expenditures to complete the project by comparing key assumptions to:
◦Information included in NEE’ s and the MVP  members’  press releases
◦Industry news reports
◦Key assumptions used in other valuation models used by the Company
◦Historical capital expenditures
•With the assistance of fair value specialists, we evaluated the reasonableness of the valuation methodology used to develop
the fair value estimate by:
◦Comparing management’ s valuation methodology to generally accepted valuation practice
◦Testing the mathematical accuracy of the fair value estimate
FPL - Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Note 1 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
FPL is subject to rate regulation by the Florida Public Service Commission (the “FPSC”), which has jurisdiction with respect to the rates
of electric distribution companies. Managemen t has determined it meets the requirements under accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America to prepare its financial statements applying the specialized rules to account for the effects of
cost-based rate regulation. Accounting for the economics of rate regulation impacts multiple financial statement line items and
disclosures, such as property , plant, and equipment; regulatory assets and liabilities; operating revenues; operation and maintenance
expense; and depreciation expense.
Rates are determined and approved in regulator y proceedings based on an analysis of FPL’s costs to provide utility service and a return
on, and recovery of, FPL’s investment in the assets required to deliver utility service. Accounting guidance for FPL’s regulated operations
provides that rate-regulated entities report asse ts and liabilities consistent with the recovery of those incurred costs in rates, if it is
probable that such rates will be charged and collected. The FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery of costs that it considers
excessive or imprudently incurred. Future FPSC decisions will impact the accounting for regulated operations, including decisions about
the amount of allowable costs and any refunds that may be required. As a result of this cost-based regulation, FPL follows the
accounting guidance that allows regulators to create assets and impose liabilities, based on the probability of future cash flows, that
would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities. Regulatory assets and liabilities represen t probable future revenues that will be
recovered from or refunded to customers through the ratemaking process.
We identified the impact  of rate regulation as a critical audit matter due to the requirement to have auditors with deep knowledge of and
significant experience with accounting for rate regulation and the rate setting process due to its inherent complexities.
How the Critical Audit Matter W as Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the impact of rate regulation included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiven ess of management’ s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of (1) the recovery in future rates of
costs incurre d as property , plant, and equipment and deferred as regulatory assets, and (2) a refund or a future reduction in
rates that should be reported as regulatory liabilities. We also tested the effectiveness of manage ment’ s controls over the initial
recognition of amounts as property , plant, and equipment and regulatory assets or liabilities; the depreciation and amortization
of such amounts in accordance with FPSC orders; and the monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may
affect the likelihood of recovering costs recognized as property , plant and equipment and regulatory assets in future rates or of
a refund or future reduction in rates that should be recognized as a regulatory liability .
•We evaluated FPL’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
•We assessed the likeliho od of (1) recovery of recorded regulatory assets and (2) obligations requiring future reductions in rates
by reading relevant regulatory orders issued by the FPSC to FPL or considering precedents established by the FPSC’ s
treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We also evaluated the regulatory orders approved by the FPSC and
compared them to management’ s recorded regulatory asset and liability balances for completeness.
DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Boca Raton, Florida
February 12, 2021
We have served as NEE’ s and FPL ’s auditor since 1950.
59
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(millions, except per share amounts)
 Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
OPERA TING REVENUES $17,997  $19,204  $ 16,727  
OPERA TING EXPENSES    
Fuel, purchased power and interchange 3,539  4,363  3,732  
Other operations and maintenance 3,751  3,640  3,330  
Storm restoration costs 183 234 3 
Depreciation and amortization 4,052  4,216  3,911  
Taxes other than income taxes and other - net 1,709  1,804  1,551  
Total operating expenses - net 13,234  14,257  12,527  
GAINS ON DISPOSAL  OF BUSINESSES/ASSETS - NET 353 406 80 
OPERA TING INCOME 5,116  5,353  4,280  
OTHER INCOME (DEDUCTIONS)    
Interest expense (1,950 ) (2,249 ) (1,498 )
Equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees (1,351 ) 66 358 
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 93 67 96 
Interest income 38 54 51 
Gain on NEP  deconsolidation — — 3,927  
Gains on disposal of investments and other property - net 50 55 111 
Change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear
decommissioning funds - net 163 238 (189)
Other net periodic benefit income 200 185 168 
Other - net 54 67 48 
Total other income (deductions) - net (2,703 ) (1,517 ) 3,072  
INCOME BEFORE INCOME TAXES 2,413  3,836  7,352  
INCOME TAXES 44 448 1,576  
NET INCOME 2,369  3,388  5,776  
NET LOSS ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS 550 381 862 
NET INCOME ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NEE $ 2,919  $ 3,769  $ 6,638  
Earnings per share attributable to NEE:    
Basic $ 1.49 $ 1.95 $ 3.51 
Assuming dilution $ 1.48 $ 1.94 $ 3.47 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
60
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
NET INCOME $ 2,369  $ 3,388  $ 5,776  
OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS), NET  OF TAX
Reclassification of unrealized losses on cash flow hedges from accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) to net income (net of $4 tax benefit, $8 and $8 tax
expense, respectively) 12 29 26 
Net unrealized gains (losses) on available for sale securities:  
Net unrealized gains (losses) on securities still held (net of $4 and $8 tax expense
and $5 tax benefit, respectively) 12 20 (12)
Reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to net income
(net of $1 tax expense, $1 and less than $1 tax benefit, respectively) (3) (2) 1 
Defined benefit pension and other benefits plans:
Net unrealized gain (loss) and unrecognized prior service benefit (cost) (net of $11
tax expense, $14 and $5 tax benefit, respectively) 37 (46) (14)
Reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to net income
(net of $1, $1 and $1 tax benefit, respectively) 2 (3) (3)
Net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency translation 13 22 (31)
Other comprehensive income related to equity method investees (net of less than $1, $0
and $1 tax expense, respectively) 1 1 4 
Total other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 74 21 (29)
IMPACT OF NEP  DECONSOLIDA TION (NET  OF $15 TAX EXPENSE) — — 58 
IMPACT OF DISPOSAL  OF A BUSINESS (NET  OF $19 TAX BENEFIT) 10 —  —  
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME 2,453  3,409  5,805  
COMPREHENSIVE LOSS ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS 543 380 862 
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NEE $ 2,996  $ 3,789  $ 6,667  
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
61
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(millions, except par value)
December 31,
2020 2019
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,105 $ 600 
Customer receivables, net of allowances of $67 and $19, respectively 2,263 2,282 
Other receivables 711 525 
Materials, supplies and fossil fuel inventory 1,552 1,328 
Regulatory assets 377 335 
Derivatives 570 762 
Other 804 1,576 
Total current assets 7,382 7,408 
Other assets:   
Property, plant and equipment - net ($18,084 and $11,893 related to VIEs, respectively) 91,803 82,010 
Special use funds 7,779 6,954 
Investment in equity method investees 5,728 7,453 
Prepaid benefit costs 1,707 1,437 
Regulatory assets 3,712 3,287 
Derivatives 1,647 1,624 
Goodwill 4,254 4,204 
Other 3,672 3,314 
Total other assets 120,302 110,283 
TOTAL ASSETS $ 127,684 $ 117,691 
LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Commercial paper $ 1,551 $ 2,516 
Other short-term debt 458 400 
Current portion of long-term debt ($27 and $27 related to VIEs, respectively) 4,138 2,124 
Accounts payable ($1,433 and $468 related to VIEs, respectively) 4,615 3,631 
Customer deposits 474 499 
Accrued interest and taxes 519 558 
Derivatives 311 344 
Accrued construction-related expenditures 991 1,152 
Regulatory liabilities 245 320 
Other 2,256 2,309 
Total current liabilities 15,558 13,853 
Other liabilities and deferred credits:   
Long-term debt ($493 and $498 related to VIEs, respectively) 41,944 37,543 
Asset retirement obligations 3,057 3,457 
Deferred income taxes 8,020 8,361 
Regulatory liabilities 10,735 9,936 
Derivatives 1,199 863 
Other 2,242 1,831 
Total other liabilities and deferred credits 67,197 61,991 
TOTAL LIABILITIES 82,755 75,844 
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS — 487 
EQUITY   
Common stock ($0.01 par value, authorized shares - 3,200; outstanding shares - 1,960 and 1,956, respectively) 20 20 
Additional paid-in capital 11,222 11,955 
Retained earnings 25,363 25,199 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (92) (169)
Total common shareholders' equity 36,513 37,005 
Noncontrolling interests ($8,413 and $4,350 related to VIEs, respectively) 8,416 4,355 
TOTAL EQUITY 44,929 41,360 
TOTAL LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY $ 127,684 $ 117,691 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
62
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 2,369 $ 3,388 $ 5,776 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by (used in) operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 4,052 4,216 3,911 
Nuclear fuel and other amortization 263 262 236 
Unrealized losses (gains) on marked to market derivative contracts – net 533 (108) 54 
Foreign currency transaction losses 45 17 16 
Deferred income taxes (78) 258 1,463 
Cost recovery clauses and franchise fees (121) 155 (225)
Equity in losses (earnings) of equity method investees 1,351 (66) (358)
Distributions of earnings from equity method investees 456 438 328 
Gains on disposal of businesses, assets and investments – net (403) (461) (191)
Gain on NEP deconsolidation — — (3,927)
Recoverable storm-related costs (69) (180) — 
Other - net 189 (141) 115 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:    
Current assets (364) 123 (631)
Noncurrent assets (234) (93) (220)
Current liabilities (6) 116 163 
Noncurrent liabilities — 231 83 
Net cash provided by operating activities 7,983 8,155 6,593 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures of FPL (6,477) (5,560) (5,012)
Acquisition and capital expenditures of Gulf Power (1,012) (5,165) — 
Independent power and other investments of NEER (6,851) (6,385) (7,045)
Nuclear fuel purchases (245) (315) (267)
Other capital expenditures, acquisitions and other investments (25) (37) (680)
Sale of independent power and other investments of NEER 1,012 1,316 1,693 
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities in special use funds and other investments 3,916 4,008 3,410 
Purchases of securities in special use funds and other investments (4,100) (4,160) (3,733)
Distributions from equity method investees — — 637 
Other - net 83 121 47 
Net cash used in investing activities (13,699) (16,177) (10,950)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 12,404 13,905 4,391 
Retirements of long-term debt (6,103) (5,492) (3,102)
Proceeds from differential membership investors 3,522 1,604 1,841 
Net change in commercial paper (965) (234) 1,062 
Proceeds from other short-term debt 2,158 200 5,665 
Repayments of other short-term debt (2,100) (4,765) (455)
Payments to related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net (2) (54) (21)
Issuances of common stock/equity units - net (92) 1,494 718 
Proceeds from sale of noncontrolling interests 501 99 — 
Dividends on common stock (2,743) (2,408) (2,101)
Other - net (406) (476) (364)
Net cash provided by financing activities 6,174 3,873 7,634 
Effects of currency translation on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (20) 4 (7)
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 438 (4,145) 3,270 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 1,108 5,253 1,983 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 1,546 $ 1,108 $ 5,253 
SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURES OF CASH FLOW INFORMATION    
Cash paid for interest (net of amount capitalized) $ 1,432 $ 1,799 $ 1,209 
Cash paid for income taxes - net $ 235 $ 184 $ 200 
SUPPLEMENTAL SCHEDULE OF NONCASH INVESTING AND FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Accrued property additions $ 4,445 $ 3,573 $ 2,138 
Increase in property, plant and equipment related to an acquisition $ 68 $ — $ — 
Decrease in joint venture investments related to an acquisition $ 145 $ — $ — 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
63
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(millions)
Common Stock
Additional
Paid-In
CapitalAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Retained
EarningsTotal
Common
Shareholders'
EquityNon-
controlling
InterestsTotal
EquityRedeemable
Non-
controlling
Interests SharesAggregate
Par Value
Balances, December 31, 2017 1,883 $ 19 $ 9,086 $ 111 $19,020 $ 28,236 $ 1,295 $29,531 $ — 
Net income (loss) — — — — 6,638 6,638 (862) — — 
Issuances of common stock - net 24 — 700 — — 700 —  — 
Share-based payment activity 4 — 121 — — 121 —  — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (2,101) (2,101) —  — 
Other comprehensive loss — — — (29) — (29) — — 
Impact of NEP deconsolidation — — — 58 — 58 (2,700) — 
Sales of differential membership
interests to NEP — — — — — — (941) — 
Adoption of accounting standards
update — — 590 (328) 280 542 5,303 — 
Other differential membership
interest activity — — (21) — — (21) 1,243 477 
Other 1 — — — — — (69) (9)
Balances, December 31, 2018 1,912 19 10,476 (188) 23,837 34,144 3,269 $37,413 468 
Net income (loss) — — — — 3,769 3,769 (371) (9)
Issuances of common
stock/equity units - net 40 — 1,470 — — 1,470 — — 
Share-based payment activity 4 — 164 — — 164 — — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (2,408) (2,408) — — 
Other comprehensive income — — — 20 — 20 1  — 
Premium on equity units — — (120) — — (120) — — 
Other differential membership
interests activity — — (20) — — (20) 1,270 29 
Other — 1 (15) (1) 1 (14) 186 (1)
Balances, December 31, 2019 1,956 20 11,955 (169) 25,199 37,005 4,355 $41,360 487 
Net income (loss) — — — — 2,919 2,919 (546) (4)
Issuances of common
stock/equity units - net — — (92) — — (92) —  — 
Share-based payment activity 4 — 153 — — 153 —  — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (2,743) (2,743) —  — 
Other comprehensive income — — — 67 — 67 7  — 
Impact of disposal of a business — — — 10 — 10 — — 
Adoption of accounting standards
update — — — — (11) (11) — — 
Premium on equity units — — (587) — — (587) — — 
Other differential membership
interests activity — — (36) — — (36) 3,809 (483)
Sale of noncontrolling interests — — (169) — — (169) 689 — 
Other — — (2) — (1) (3) 102 — 
Balances, December 31, 2020 1,960 $ 20 $11,222 $ (92)$25,363 $ 36,513 $ 8,416 $44,929 $ — 
__________________________
(a)Dividends per share were $1.40, $1.25 and $1.11 for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(b)See Note 1 - Basis of Presentation.
(c)See Note 1 - Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
(b)
(a)
(a)
(c)
64
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(millions)
 Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
OPERA TING REVENUES $ 11,662  $ 12,192  $ 11,862  
OPERA TING EXPENSES (INCOME)    
Fuel, purchased power and interchange 2,616  3,256  3,250  
Other operations and maintenance 1,464  1,519  1,514  
Storm restoration costs 183 234 3 
Depreciation and amortization 2,246  2,524  2,633  
Taxes other than income taxes and other - net 1,353  1,357  1,308  
Total operating expenses - net 7,862  8,890  8,708  
OPERA TING INCOME 3,800  3,302  3,154  
OTHER INCOME (DEDUCTIONS)    
Interest expense (600) (594) (541)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 61 62 90 
Other - net (1) 5 7 
Total other deductions - net (540) (527) (444)
INCOME BEFORE INCOME TAXES 3,260  2,775  2,710  
INCOME TAXES 610 441 539 
NET INCOME $ 2,650  $ 2,334  $ 2,171  
______________________
(a)FPL's comprehensive income is the same as reported net income.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
65
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(millions, except share amount)
 December 31,
2020 2019
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 20 $ 77 
Customer receivables, net of allowances of $29 and $3, respectively 991 1,024  
Other receivables 362 333 
Materials, supplies and fossil fuel inventory 777 722 
Regulatory assets 235 227 
Other 129 136 
Total current assets 2,514  2,519  
Other assets:   
Electric utility plant and other property - net 48,933  45,074  
Special use funds 5,347  4,771  
Prepaid benefit costs 1,554  1,477  
Regulatory assets 2,396  2,549  
Goodwill 301 300 
Other 565 498 
Total other assets 59,096  54,669  
TOTAL ASSETS $ 61,610  $ 57,188  
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Commercial paper $ 1,526  $ 1,482  
Current portion of long-term debt 54 30 
Accounts payable 730 768 
Customer deposits 430 459 
Accrued interest and taxes 279 266 
Accrued construction-related expenditures 385 426 
Regulatory liabilities 206 284 
Other 614 510 
Total current liabilities 4,224  4,225  
Other liabilities and deferred credits:   
Long-term debt 15,622  14,131  
Asset retirement obligations 1,783  2,268  
Deferred income taxes 5,790  5,415  
Regulatory liabilities 10,052  9,296  
Other 399 455 
Total other liabilities and deferred credits 33,646  31,565  
TOTAL LIABILITIES 37,870  35,790  
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
EQUITY   
Common stock (no par value, 1,000 shares authorized, issued and outstanding) 1,373  1,373  
Additional paid-in capital 12,753  10,851  
Retained earnings 9,614  9,174  
TOTAL EQUITY 23,740  21,398  
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND EQUITY $ 61,610  $ 57,188  
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
66
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 2,650 $ 2,334 $ 2,171 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by (used in) operating
activities:    
Depreciation and amortization 2,246 2,524 2,633 
Nuclear fuel and other amortization 164 175 144 
Deferred income taxes 513 44 180 
Cost recovery clauses and franchise fees (112) 177 (225)
Other - net 54 6 (45)
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:    
Current assets (99) (48) 97 
Noncurrent assets (94) (67) (64)
Current liabilities 90 32 (509)
Noncurrent liabilities (31) 4 40 
Net cash provided by operating activities 5,381 5,181 4,422 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures (6,477) (5,560) (5,012)
Nuclear fuel purchases (203) (195) (123)
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities in special use funds 2,484 2,729 2,232 
Purchases of securities in special use funds (2,565) (2,854) (2,402)
Other - net 64 10 239 
Net cash used in investing activities (6,697) (5,870) (5,066)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 2,952 2,493 1,742 
Retirements of long-term debt (1,427) (95) (1,591)
Net change in commercial paper 44 226 (431)
Repayments of other short-term debt — — (250)
Capital contributions from NEE 1,900 250 1,785 
Dividends to NEE (2,210) (2,200) (500)
Other - net (42) (44) (31)
Net cash provided by financing activities 1,217 630 724 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (99) (59) 80 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 195 254 174 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 96 $ 195 $ 254 
SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURES OF CASH FLOW INFORMATION    
Cash paid for interest (net of amount capitalized) $ 580 $ 561 $ 520 
Cash paid for income taxes - net $ 126 $ 544 $ 415 
SUPPLEMENTAL SCHEDULE OF NONCASH INVESTING AND FINANCING
ACTIVITIES   
Accrued property additions $ 592 $ 680 $ 549 
NEE's noncash contribution of a consolidated subsidiary - net $ — $ — $ 526 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
67
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMMON SHAREHOLDER'S EQUITY
(millions)
Common
StockAdditional
Paid-In CapitalRetained
EarningsCommon
Shareholder's
Equity
Balances, December 31, 2017 $ 1,373  $ 8,291  $ 7,376  $ 17,040  
Net income — — 2,171   
Capital contributions from NEE — 1,785  — 
Dividends to NEE — — (500)  
NEE's contribution of a consolidated subsidiary — 526 — 
Other — (1) (7)  
Balances, December 31, 2018 1,373  10,601  9,040  $ 21,014  
Net income — — 2,334   
Capital contributions from NEE — 250 — 
Dividends to NEE — — (2,200 )  
Balances, December 31, 2019 1,373  10,851  9,174  $ 21,398  
Net income — — 2,650   
Capital contributions from NEE — 1,900  —  
Dividends to NEE — — (2,210 )  
Other — 2 — 
Balances, December 31, 2020 $ 1,373  $ 12,753  $ 9,614  $ 23,740  
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
68
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
1. Summary of Significant Accounting and Reporting Policies
Basis of Presentation  - The opera tions of NextEra Energy , Inc. (NEE) are conducted primarily through Florida Power & Light Company
(FPL), a wholly owned  subsidiary , and NextEra Energy Resources, LLC (NextEra Energy Resources) and NextEra Energy
Transmission, LLC (NEET) (collectively , NEER), wholly owned indirect subsidiaries that are combined for segment reporting purposes.
On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company (Gulf Power) merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However , FPL will continue to
be regulated  as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power until the FPSC approves
consolidation of the FPL and Gulf Power rates and tariffs (see Rate Regulation - FPL 2021 Base  Rate Proceeding below). FPL and Gulf
Power will continue to be separate operating segments of NEE as well as FPL, through 2021. FPL's principal business is a rate-
regulated electric utility which supplies electric service to more than 5.6 million customer accoun ts throughout most of the east and lower
west coasts of Florida and eight  count ies throughout northwest Florida. NEER invests in independent power projects through  both
controlled and consolidated entities and noncontrolling owner ship interests in joint ventures. NEER participates in natural gas, natural
gas liquids and oil production primarily through operating and non-operating ownership interests and in pipeline infrastructure through
either wholly owned subsidiaries or noncontrolling or joint venture interests. NEER also invests in rate-regulated transmission facilities
and transmission lines that connect its electric generation facilities to the electric grid through controlled and consolidated entities.
The consolidated financial statements of NEE and FPL include the accounts of their respective controlled subsidiaries. They also include
NEE's and FPL's share  of the undivided interest in certain assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Amounts representing NEE's
interest in entities it does not control, but over which it exercises significant influence, are included in investment in equity method
investees; the earnings/losses of these entities  is included in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees. Intercompany
balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation. Prior years' share and share-based data have been retrospectively
adjusted to reflect the four-for-one stock split of NEE common stock effective October 26, 2020 (2020 stock split). See Note 14 -
Earnings Per Share. Certain amounts included in prior years' consolidated financial statements have been reclassified to conform to the
current year's presentation. The preparation of financial statements requires the use of estim ates and assumptions that affect the
reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses and the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. Actual results
could dif fer from those estimates.
NEP was formed in 2014 to acquire, manage and own contracted clean energy projects with stable long-term cash flows through a
limited partner interest in NextEra Energy Operating Partners, LP (NEP  OpCo). NEP owns or has an ownership interest in a portfolio of
wind and solar projects and long-term contracted natural gas pipelines. NEP was deconsolidated from NEE for financial reporting
purposes in January 2018 as a result of change s made to NEP's governance structure. Subsequent to deconsolidation, NEE owns a
noncontrolling interest in NEP and began reflecting its ownership interest in NEP as an equity method investment with its
earnings/losses from NEP as equity in earnings  (losses) of equity method investees and accounting for NextEra Energy Resources'
asset sales to NEP as third-party sales in its consolidated financial statements. NEER continues to operate the projects owned by NEP
and provide services to NEP under various related party operations and maintenance, administrative and management services
agreements.
In connectio n with the deconsolidation, NEE recorded an initial investment in NEP of approxima tely $4.4 billion based on the fair value
of NEP OpCo and NEP common units that were held by subsidiaries of NEE on the deconsolidation date, which investment is included
in the investment in equity method investees on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. See Note 8. The fair value was based on the
market price  of NEP common units as of January 1, 2018, which resulted in NEE recording a gain of approximately $3.9 billion ($3.0
billion after tax) for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Operating Revenues - FPL and NEER gener ate substantially all of NEE’ s operating revenues, which primarily includ e revenues from
contracts with customers as further discussed in Note 2, as well as, at NEER, derivative and lease transactions. FPL's operating
revenues include amoun ts resulting from base rates, cost recovery clauses (see Rate Regulatio n below), franchise fees, gross receipts
taxes and surcharges related to storms (see Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery below). Franchise fees and gross
receipts taxes are impo sed on FPL; however , the Florida Public Service Commission (FPSC)  allows FPL to include in the amounts
charged to customers the amount of the gross receipts tax for all customers and the franchise  fee for those customers located in the
jurisdiction that imposes the amount. Accordingly , franchise fees and gross receipts taxes are reported gross in operating revenues and
taxes other than income  taxes and other in NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of income and were approximately $725 million,
$763 million and $738 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively . FPL also collects municipal utility taxes which are reported gross in
customer receivables and accounts payable on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. Certain NEER commodity contracts for
the purchase and sale of power that meet the definition of a derivative are recorded at fair value with subsequent changes in fair value
recognized as revenue. See Energy Trading below and Note 3.
69
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Rate Regulation  - FPL, the most significant of NEE's rate-regulated subsidiaries, is subject to rate regulation  by the FPSC and the
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC). Its rates are designed to recover the cost of providing service to its customers
including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital. As a result of this cost-based regulatio n, FPL follows the accounting guidance
that allows regulators to create assets and impose liabilities that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities. Regulatory assets
and liabilities represent probable future revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the ratemaking process.
NEE's and FPL's regulatory assets and liabilities are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2020 2019 2020 2019
(millions)
Regulatory assets:
Current:
Early retirement of generation facilities $ 36 $ 31 $ 32 $ 27 
Acquisition of purchased power agreements 161 165 161 165 
Other 180 139 42 35 
Total $ 377 $ 335 $ 235 $ 227 
Noncurrent:     
Early retirement of generation facilities $ 1,438 $ 1,004 $ 932 $ 956 
Acquisition of purchased power agreements 473 634 473 634 
Other 1,801 1,649 991 959 
Total $ 3,712 $ 3,287 $ 2,396 $ 2,549 
Regulatory liabilities:     
Current:
Deferred clause revenues $ 215 $ 309 $ 197 $ 284 
Other 30 11 9 — 
Total $ 245 $ 320 $ 206 $ 284 
Noncurrent:     
Asset retirement obligation regulatory expense difference $ 3,583 $ 2,826 $ 3,583 $ 2,828 
Accrued asset removal costs 1,206 1,346 1,015 1,157 
Deferred taxes 4,698 4,862 4,237 4,397 
Other 1,248 902 1,217 914 
Total $ 10,735 $ 9,936 $ 10,052 $ 9,296 
Cost recovery clauses, which are designed to permit full recovery of certain costs and provide a return on certain assets allowed to be
recovered through various clauses, include substantially all fuel, purchased power and interchange expense, certain costs associated
with the acquisition and retirement of several electric generation facilities, certain construction-related costs for certain of FPL's solar
generation facilities, and conservation and certain environmental-related costs.  Revenues from cost recovery clauses are recorded
when billed ; FPL achieves matching of costs and related revenues by deferring the net underrecovery or overrecovery . Any
underrecovered costs or overrecovered revenues are collected from or returned to customers in subsequent periods.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, FPL had regulatory assets, net of amortization, of approx imately $634 million and $799 millio n,
respectively , (included in current and noncurrent regulatory assets on NEE's and FPL’s consolidated balance sheets) related to
acquisitions during 2015, 2017 and 2018 associated with three  coal-fired electric gener ation facilities located in Florida with which FPL
had long-term purchased power agreements. The majority of these regulatory assets are being amortized over approximately nine
years . All three  facilities have been retired.
In 2018, FPL early retired three  of its generation facilities. As a result of the retirements, FPL reclassified the net book value of these
units (appro ximately $883 million) from plant in service and other propert y to current and noncurrent regulatory assets.  Recovery of
$736 million of these regulatory assets has been deferred until FPL’s base rates are next reset in a general base rate proceeding. The
remainder of these regulatory assets are being amortized over 15 years. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the regulatory assets, net of
amortization, totaled approximately $859 million and $851 million, respectively , and are included in current and noncurrent regulatory
assets on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
70
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
In October 2020, as a result of significant dama ge from the impacts of Hurricane Sally (see Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm
Cost Recovery below), Gulf Power accelerated the planned mid-2021 retirement of all coal-fired  generation capability at Plant Crist. In
November 2020, Gulf Power filed a petition with the FPSC to establish a regulatory asset for the underrecovered investment in Plant
Crist and to defer the recovery of the regulatory asset until base rates are reset in the next general base rate proceeding. An FPSC
decision is expected in March 2021. At December 31, 2020, the remaining net book value of the coal generating assets totaling
approximately $ 462 million is reclassified to a noncurrent regulatory asset on NEE’ s consolidated balance sheet.
If FPL were no longer subject to cost-based rate regulation, the existing regulatory assets and liabilities would be written off unless
regulators specify an alternative means of recovery or refund. In addition, the FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery of costs that it
considers excessive or imprudently incurred. The continued applicability of regulatory accounting is assessed at each reporting period.
Other regulatory assets and liabilities are discussed within various subsections in Note 1 below . 
FPL Base Rates Effective January 2017 - In December 2016, the FPSC issued a final order approving a stipulation and settlement
between FPL and severa l intervenors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2016 rate agreement). Key elements of the 2016 rate agreement,
which became ef fective in January 2017, include, among other things, the following:
•New retail base rates and charges were established resulting in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$400 million beginning January 1, 2017;
◦$211 million beginning January 1, 2018; and
◦$200 million beginning April 1, 2019 for a new approximately 1,720  megawatts (MW) natural gas-fired combined-cycle
unit in Okeechobee County , Florida that achieved commercial operation on March 31, 2019.
•In addition, FPL received  base rate increases in 2018 through 2020 associated with the addition of approximately 1,200  MW of new
solar generating capacity that became operational during that timeframe.
•FPL's allowe d regulatory return on common equity (ROE) is 10.55 %, with a range of 9.60% to 11.60 %. If FPL's earned regulatory
ROE falls below 9.60%, FPL may seek retail  base rate relief. If the earned regulatory ROE rises above 11.60 %, any party with
standing, other than FPL, may seek a review of FPL's retail base rates.
•Subject to certain condit ions, FPL may amortize, over the term of the 2016 rate agreement, up to $1.0 billion of depreciation reserve
surplus plus the reserve  amount that remained under FPL's previous rate agreement (approxima tely $250 million), provided that in
any year of the 2016 rate agreement FPL must amortize at least enough reserve to maintain a 9.60% earned regulatory ROE but
may not amortize any reserve that would result in an earned regulatory ROE in excess of 11.60 %.
•Future storm  restoration costs would be recoverable on an interim basis beginning 60 days from the filing of a cost recovery
petition, but capped at an amount that could produce a surcharge of no more than $4 for every 1,000  kilowatt-hou r (kWh) of usage
on residential bills durin g the first 12 months of cost recovery . Any additional costs would be eligible for recovery in subsequent
years. If storm restoration costs exceed $800 million in any given calendar year, FPL may request an increase to the $4 surch arge
to recover amounts above $ 400 million. See Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery below .
FPL 2021 Base Rate Proceeding  - On Januar y 11, 2021, FPL filed a formal notification with the FPSC indicating its intent to initiate a
base rate proceeding by submitting a four-year rate plan that would begin in January 2022 replacing the 2016 rate agreement. As Gulf
Power legally merged with FPL on January 1, 2021, the notification indicates that the plan will include the total revenue requirements of
the combined utility system, reflecting the legal and operational consolidation of Gulf Power into FPL. The notification also states that,
based on preliminary estimates, FPL expects to request a general base annual revenue requirement increase of approximately
$1.1 billion effective January 2022 and a subsequen t annual increase of approximately $615 million effective January 2023. The plan is
also expecte d to request authority for a Solar Base Rate Adjustment (SoBRA) mechanism to recover , subject to FPSC review , the
revenue requirements of up to 900 MW of solar projects in 2024 and up to 900 MW in 2025. If the full amount of new solar capacity
allowed under the proposed SoBRA  mechanis m were constructed, FPL’s preliminary estimate is that it would result in base rate
adjustments of approximately $140 million in 2024 and $140 million in 2025. The proposed SoBRA  mechani sm adjustments would be
offset, in part, by a reduction in FPL’s fuel costs. Under the filing, FPL does not expect to request further adjustments to general base
annual revenue requirements to be effective before January 2026. In addition, FPL expects to propose an allowed regulatory ROE
midpoint of 11.50 %, which includes a 50 basis point incentive for superior performance. FPL expects to file its formal request to initiate a
base rate proceeding in March 2021.
Electric Plant, Depreciation and Amortization  - The cost of additions to units of property of FPL and NEER is added to electric plant in
service and other proper ty. In accordance with regulatory accounting, the cost of FPL's units of utility property retired, less estimated net
salvage value, is charge d to accumulated depreciation. Maintenance and repairs of property as well as replacements and renewals of
items determined to be less than units of utility property are charged to other operations and maintenance (O&M) expenses. The
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, as amended (Recovery Act), provided for an option to elect a cash grant (convertible
investment tax credits (ITCs)) for certain renewa ble energy property (renewable property). Conve rtible ITCs are recorded as a reduction
in property , plant and equipment on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets and are amortized as a reduction to depreciation and
amortization expense over the estimated life of the related
71
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
property . At December 31, 2020 and 2019, convertible ITCs, net of amortization, were approxim ately $791 million ($122 million at FPL)
and $824 million ($128 million at FPL). At December 31, 2020 and 2019 , approximately $10 million and $10 million, respectively , of such
convertible ITCs are included primarily in other receivables on NEE's consolidated balance sheets.
Depreciation of FPL's electric property is provided on a straight-line basis, primarily over its average remaining useful life. FPL includes
in depreciation expense a provision for fossil and solar plant dismantlement, interim asset removal costs, accretion related to asset
retirement obligations (see Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal Costs
below), storm  recovery amortization and amortization of pre-construction costs associated with planned nuclear units recovered through
a cost recovery clause. For substantially all of FPL's property , depreciation studies are typically performed and filed with the FPSC every
four years. As part of FPL's 2016 rate agreement, the FPSC approved new depreciation rates which became effective January 1, 2017
and which will remain in effect until FPL's base rates are next reset in a general base rate proceeding. Reserve amortization is recorded
as a reductio n to (or when reversed as an increase to) accrued asset removal costs which is reflected in noncurrent regulatory liabilities
on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance shee ts. FPL used available reserve amortization to offset all of the storm restoration costs
that were expensed for Hurricane Dorian, Hurricane Isaias and Tropical Storm Eta. See Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost
Recovery below . FPL files a twelve-month forecast with the FPSC each year which contains a regulatory ROE intended to be earned
based on the best information FPL has at that time assuming normal weather . This forecast establishes a fixed targeted regulatory ROE.
In order to earn the targe ted regulatory ROE in each reporting period under the 2016 rate agreem ent, reserve amortization is calculated
using a trailing thirteen-m onth average of retail rate base and capital structure in conjunction with the trailing twelve months regulatory
retail base net operating income, which primarily includes the retail base portion of base and other revenues, net of O&M, depreciation
and amortization, interest and tax expenses. In general, the net impact of these income statement line items is adjusted, in part, by
reserve amortization or its reversal to earn the targeted regulatory ROE.
NEER's electric plant in service and other prope rty less salvage value, if any, are depreciated primarily using the straight-line method
over their estimated useful lives. NEER reviews  the estimated useful lives of its fixed assets on an ongoing basis. NEER's oil and gas
production assets are accounted for under the successful efforts method. Depletion expenses for the acquisition of reserve rights and
development costs are recognized using the unit of production method.
Nuclear Fuel - FPL and NEER have several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of
nuclear fuel. See Note 15 - Contracts. FPL's and NEER's nuclear fuel costs are charged to fuel expense on a unit of production method.
Construction Activity  - Allowance for funds used during construction (AFUDC) is a noncash item which represents the allowed cost of
capital, including an ROE, used to finance const ruction projects. FPL records the portion of AFUDC attributable to borrowed funds as a
reduction of interest expense and the remainde r as other income. FPSC rules limit the recording of AFUDC to projects that have an
estimated cost in excess of 0.5% of a utility's plant in service balance and require more than one year to complete. FPSC rules allow
construction projects below the 0.5% threshold as a component of rate base.
FPL's const ruction work  in progress includes construction materials, progress payments on major equipment contracts, engineering
costs, AFUDC and other  costs directly associated with the construction of various projects. Upon  completion of the projects, these costs
are transferr ed to electric utility plant in service and other property . Capitalized costs associated  with construction activities are charged
to O&M expenses when recoverability is no longer probable.
NEER capita lizes project development costs once it is probable that such costs will be realized through the ultimate construction of the
related asset or sale of development rights. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, NEER's capitalized development costs totaled
approximately $571 million and $651 million, respectively , which are included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balan ce
sheets. These costs include land rights and other third-party costs directly associated with the development of a new project. Upon
commencement of construction, these costs either are transferred to construction work in progress or remain in other assets, depending
upon the nature of the cost. Capitalized develop ment costs are charged to O&M expenses when it is probable that these costs will not
be realized.
NEER's construction work in progress includes  construction materials, progress payments on major equipment contracts, third-party
engineering costs, capitalized interest and other costs directly associated with the construction and development of various projects.
Interest expense allocated from NextEra Energ y Capital Holdings, Inc. (NEECH) to NEER is based on a deemed capital structure of
70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiarie s. Upon commencement of project
operation, costs associated with construction work in progress are transferred to electric plant in service and other property . In 2019,
NEER determined it was no longer moving forward with the construction of a 220 MW wind facility due to unresolved permitting issues.
NEE recorde d charges of approximately $72 million ($54 million after tax), which  are included in taxes other than income taxes and
other - net in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2019, primarily related to the write-of f of
capitalized construction costs .
Asset Retire ment Obliga tions  - NEE and FPL each account for asset retireme nt obligations and conditional asset retirement obligations
(collectively , AROs) under accounting guidance that requires a liability for the fair value of an ARO to be recognized in
72
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
the period in which it is incurred if it can be reasonably estimated, with the offsetting associated asset retirement costs capitalized as
part of the carrying amount of the long-lived assets. NEE's AROs relate primarily to decommissioning obligations of FPL's and NEER's
nuclear units and to obligations for the dismantl ement of certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities. See Decommissioning of Nuclear
Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal Costs below and Note 11.
For NEE's rate-regulated operations, including FPL, the asset retirement cost is subsequently allocated to a regulatory liability or
regulatory asset using a systematic and rational method over the asset's estimated useful life. Changes in the ARO resulting from the
passage of time are recognized as an increase in the carrying amount of the ARO and a decreas e in the regulatory liability or regulatory
asset. Changes resulting from revisions to the timing or amount of the original estimate of cash flows are recognized as an increase or a
decrease in the ARO and asset retirement cost, or regulatory liability when asset retirement cost is depleted.
For NEE's non-rate regulated operations, the asset retirement cost is subsequently allocated to expense using a systematic and rational
method over the asset's estimated useful life. Changes in the ARO resulting from the passage of time are recognized as an increase in
the carrying amount of the liability and as accretion expense, which is included in depreciation and amortization expense in NEE's
consolidated statements of income. Changes resulting from revisions to the timing or amount of the original estimate of cash flows are
recognized as an increase or a decrease in the asset retirement cost, or income when asset retirement cost is depleted.
Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal Costs  - For ratema king purposes, FPL
accrues for the cost of end of life retirement and disposal of its nuclear , fossil and solar plants over the expected service life of each unit
based on nuclear decommissioning and fossil and solar dismantlement studies periodically filed with the FPSC. In addition, FPL accrues
for interim removal costs  over the life of the related assets based on depreciation studies appro ved by the FPSC. As approved by the
FPSC, FPL previously suspended its annual decommissioning accrual. Any differences between expense recognized for financial
reporting purposes and the amount recovered  through rates are reported as a regulatory liability in accordance with regulatory
accounting. See Rate Regulation, Electric Plant, Depreciation and Amortization, and Asset Retirement Obligations above and Note 11.
Nuclear decommissionin g studies are performed at least every five years and are submitted to the FPSC for approval. FPL filed updated
nuclear decommissioning studies with the FPSC  in December 2020. These studies reflect, among other things, the expiration dates of
the operating licenses for FPL's nuclear units at the time of the studies. The 2020 studies provide for the dismantlement of Turkey Point
Units Nos. 3 and 4 follow ing the end of plant operation with decommissioning activities commenc ing in 2052 and 2053, respectively , and
provide for St. Lucie Unit No. 1 to be mothballed beginning in 2036 with decommissionin g activities to be integrated with the
dismantlement of St. Lucie Unit No. 2 in 2043. These studies also assume that FPL will be storin g spent fuel on site pending removal to
a Unite d States (U.S.) government facility . FPL's portion of the ultimate costs of decommissioning its four nucle ar units, including costs
associated with spent fuel storage above what is expected to be refunded by the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) under a spent fuel
settlement agreement, is estimated to be approximately $ 7.0 billion, or $ 2.5 billion expressed in 2020 dollars.
Restricted funds for the payment of future expen ditures to decommission FPL's nuclear units are included in nuclear decommissioning
reserve funds, which are included in special use funds on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balanc e sheets. Marketable securities held in
the decomm issioning funds are primarily carried at fair value. See Note 4. Fund earnings, consisting of dividends, interest and realized
gains and losses, net of taxes, are reinvested in the funds. Fund earnings, as well as any changes in unrealized gains and losses and
estimated credit losses on debt securities, are not recognized in income and are reflected as a corresponding offset in the related
regulatory asset or liability accounts. FPL does not currently make contributions to the decommissioning funds, other than the
reinvestment of fund earnings. During 2020, 2019 and 2018 fund earnings on decommissioning funds were approximately $132 million,
$125 million and $94 million, respectively . The tax effects of amounts not yet recognized for tax purposes are included in deferred
income taxes.
Fossil and solar plant dismantlement studies are typically performed at least every four years  and are submitted to the FPSC for
approval. As part of the 2016 rate agreement, the FPSC approved an annual expense of $26 million based on FPL's 2016 fossil and
solar dismantlement studies, which became effective January 1, 2017, and is recorded in depreciation and amortization expense in
NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of income, and which will remain in effect until FPL's base rates are next reset in a general
base rate proceeding. At December 31, 2020, FPL's portion of the ultimate cost to dismantle its fossil and solar units is approximately
$1.2 billion, or $ 541 million expressed in 2020 dollars.
NEER's AROs primarily include nuclear decommissioning liabilities for Seabrook Station (Seabrook), Duane Arnold Energy Center
(Duane Arno ld) and Point Beach Nuclear Power Plant (Point Beach) and dismantlement liabilities for its wind and solar facilities. The
liabilities are being accre ted using the interest method through the date decommissioning or dism antlement activities are expected to be
complete. See Note 11. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, NEER's ARO was approximately $1,232  millio n and $1,097  millio n,
respectively , and was primarily determined using various internal and external data and applying a probability percentage to a variety of
scenarios regarding the life of the plant and timing of decommissioning or dismantlement. NEER's portion of the ultimate cost of
decommissioning its nuclear plants, including costs associated with spent fuel storage
73
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
above what is expected to be refunded by the DOE under a spent fuel settlement agreement, is estimated to be approximately $9.5
billion, or $2.1 billion expressed in 2020 dollars. The ultimate cost to dismantle NEER's wind and solar facilities is estimated to be
approximately $ 2.4 billion.
Seabrook files a comp rehensive nuclear decommissioning study with the New Hampshire  Nuclear Decommissioning Financing
Committee (NDFC) every four years; the most recent study was filed in 2019. Seabrook's decommissioning funding plan is also subject
to annual review by the NDFC. Currently , there are no ongoing decommissioning funding require ments for Seabrook, Duane Arnold and
Point Beach , however , the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC), and in the case of Seabrook, the NDFC, has the authority to
require additional fundin g in the future. NEER's portion of Seabrook's, Duane Arnold's and Point Beach's restricted funds for the
payment of future expenditures to decommission  these plants is included in nuclear decommissio ning reserve funds, which are included
in special use funds on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. Marketable securities held in the decommissioning funds are primarily
carried at fair value. See Note 4. Market adjustments for debt securities result in a corresponding adjustment to other comprehensive
income (OCI), except for estimated credit losses and unrealized losses on debt securities intended or required to be sold prior to
recovery of the amortized cost basis, which are recognized in other - net in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Market
adjustments for equity securities are recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear
decommissioning funds - net in NEE's consolida ted statements of income. Fund earnings, consisting of dividends, interest and realized
gains and losses are recognized in income and are reinvested in the funds. The tax effects of amounts not yet recognized for tax
purposes are included in deferred income taxes.
Major Maintenance Costs  - FPL expenses costs associated with planned fossil maintenance as incurred. FPL recognizes costs
associated with planned major nuclear maintenance in accordance with regulatory treatment. FPL defers nuclear maintenance costs for
each nuclear unit’s planned outage to a regulatory asset as the costs are incurred and amortizes the costs to O&M expense over the
period from the end of the current outage to the end of the next planned outage. 
NEER uses  the deferral method to account for certain planned major maintenance costs. NEER's major maintenance costs for its
nuclear generation units and combustion turbines are capitalized (included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance
sheets) and amortized to O&M expenses using the straight-line method over the period from the end of the last outage to the beginning
of the next planned outage.
Cash Equivalents  - Cash equivalents consist of short-term, highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or less.
Restricted Cash  - At December 31, 2020 and 2019, NEE had approximately $441 million ($76 million for FPL) and $508 million ($118
million for FPL), respect ively, of restricted cash, of which approximately $374 million ($58 million for FPL) and $411 million ($54 million
for FPL), respectively , is included in current other assets and the remaining balance is included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's and
FPL's consolidated balance sheets. Restricted cash is primarily related to debt service payments, bond proceeds held for construction at
FPL and margin cash collateral requirements. In addition, where offsetting positions exist, restricted cash related to margin cash
collateral of $183 million is netted against derivative assets and $136 million is netted against derivative liabilities at December 31, 2020
and $139 million is netted against derivative assets and $66 million is netted against derivative liabilities at December 31, 2019. See
Note 3.
Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments  - Effective January 1, 2020, NEE and FPL adopted an accounting standards
update that provides for a new methodology , the current expected credit loss (CECL) model, to account for credit losses for certain
financial assets measur ed at amortized cost. On January 1, 2020, NEE recorded a reduction to retained earnings of approximately
$11 million representing the cumulative effect of adopting the new standards update, which primarily related to the impact of applying
the CECL  model to NEER's receivables. The impact of adopting the new standards update was not material to FPL. See also Note 4 -
Special Use Funds.
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts  - FPL maintains an accumulated provision for uncollectible customer accounts receivable that is
estimated using a percentage, derived from histo rical revenue and write-of f trends, of the previou s four months of revenue, and includes
estimates of credit and other losses based on both current events and forecasts. NEER regularly reviews collectibility of its receivables
and establishes a provis ion for losses estimated as a percentage of accounts receivable based on the historical bad debt write-of f trends
for its retail electricity provider operations, as well as includes estimates for credit and other losses based on both current events and
forecasts. When necessary , NEER uses the specific identification method for all other receivables.
Inventory  - FPL value s materials, supplies and fossil fuel inventory using a weighted-average cost metho d. NEER's materials, supplies
and fossil fuel inventorie s, which include emiss ions allowances and renewable energy credits , are carried at the lower of weighted-
average cost and net realizable value, unless evidence indicates that the weighted-average cost will be recovered with a normal profit
upon sale in the ordinary course of business.
74
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Energy Trading - NEE provides full energy and capacity requirements services primarily to distribution utilities, which include load-
following services and various ancillary services, in certain markets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to
optimize the value of electricity and fuel contrac ts, generation facilities and gas infrastructure assets, as well as to take advantage of
projected favorable commodity price movements . Trading contracts that meet the definition of a derivative are accounted for at fair value
and realized  gains and losses from all trading contracts, including those where physical delivery is required, are recorded net for all
periods presented. See Note 3.
Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery  - The storm and prope rty insurance reserve funds (storm funds) provide
coverage toward FPL's storm damage costs. Marketable securities held in the storm funds are carried at fair value. See Note 4. Fund
earnings, consisting of dividends, interest and realized gains and losses, net of taxes, are reinvested in the funds. Fund earnings, as
well as any changes in unrealized gains and losses, are not recognized in income and are reflected as a corresponding adjustment to
the storm and property insurance reserves (storm reserves). The tax effects of amounts not yet recognized for tax purposes are included
in deferred income taxes . The storm funds are included in special use funds and the storm reserves in noncurrent regulatory liabilities,
or in the case of a deficit, in regulatory assets on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
FPL’s servic e area was impacted by Hurricane Dorian in 2019 and by Hurricane Isaias and Tropical Storm Eta in 2020, which resulted in
incremental storm restoration costs of approximately $239 million and a total of approximately $200 million, respectively . FPL
determined that it would not seek recovery of such costs through a storm surcharge from customers and instead recorded such costs as
storm restoration costs in NEE's and FPL’s consolidated statements of income. FPL used available reserve amortization to offset all
such storm restoration costs that were expensed for Hurricane Dorian, Hurricane Isaias and Tropical Storm Eta.
In September 2020, Hurricane Sally made landfall near the Florida panhandle causing damage to much of Gulf Power ’s service area
and approxi mately 285,000  customers experienced  electrical outages. Gulf Power experienced damage to its transm ission and
distribution systems, as well as certain power generation equipment (see Rate Regulation above). Storm restoration costs eligible for
recovery totaled approximately $206 million. As provided under the terms of Gulf Power’s current base rate settlement agreement, in
November 2020, Gulf Power filed a petition with the FPSC for interim recovery of the recoverable storm restoration costs through a
surcharge. An FPSC decision is expected in March 2021. The accrued storm restoration costs eligible for recovery have been deferred
and are recorded as a regulatory asset, primarily noncurrent, on NEE’ s consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2020.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets  - NEE evalua tes long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in circumstances indicate
that the carrying amount  may not be recoverable. The impairment loss to be recognized is the amount by which the carrying value of the
long-lived asset exceeds the asset's fair value. In most instances, the fair value is determined by discounting estimated future cash flows
using an appropriate interest rate.
Impairment of Equity Method Investments  - NEE evaluates its equity method investments  for impairment when events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the fair value of the investment is less than the carrying value and the investment may be other-than-
temporarily impaired. An impairment loss is required to be recognized if the impairment is deemed to be other than temporary .
Investments that are other-than-temporarily impaired are written down to their estimated fair value and cannot subsequently be written
back up for increases in estimated fair value. Impairment losses are recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees in
NEE’ s consolidated statements of income. See Note 4 - Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements.
75
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets  - NEE's goodwill and other intangible assets are as follows:
Weighted-
Average
Useful LivesDecember 31,
2020 2019
(years) (millions)
Goodwill (by reporting unit):
FPL segment:
Florida City Gas $ 292 $ 291 
Other 9 9 
NEER segment:
Rate-regulated transmission (see Note 6 - Trans Bay Cable, LLC) 614 610 
Gas infrastructure 487 487 
Customer supply and trading 93 93 
Generation assets 60 28 
Corporate and Other:
  Gulf Power (see Note 6 - Gulf Power Company) 2,688 2,686 
  Other 11 — 
Total goodwill $ 4,254 $ 4,204 
Other intangible assets not subject to amortization, primarily land easements $ 135 $ 135 
Other intangible assets subject to amortization:
Purchased power agreements 14 $ 453 $ 401 
Other, primarily transportation contracts and customer lists 17 166 72 
Total 619 473 
Accumulated amortization (61) (56)
Total other intangible assets subject to amortization - net $ 558 $ 417 
NEE's, including FPL's, goodwill relates to various acquisitions which were accounted for using the purchase method of accounting.
Other intang ible assets are primarily included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. NEE's other intangible
assets subject to amortization are amortized, primarily on a straight-line basis, over their estim ated useful lives. Amortization expense
was approximately $27 million, $18 million and $19 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively , and is
expected to be approximately $32 million, $17 million, $16 million, $18 million and $17 million for 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024 and 2025,
respectively .
Goodwill and other intan gible assets not subject to amortization are assessed for impairment at least annually by applying a fair value-
based analysis. Other intangible assets subject to amortization are periodically reviewed when impairment indicators are present to
assess recoverability from future operations using undiscounted future cash flows.
Pension Plan - NEE records the service cost component of net periodic benefit income to O&M expense and the non-service cost
component to other net periodic benefit income in NEE's consolidated statements of income. NEE allocates net periodic pension income
to its subsidiaries based on the pensionable earnings of the subsidiaries' employees. Accounting guidance requires recognition of the
funded status of the pension plan in the balance sheet, with changes in the funded status recognized in other comprehensive income
within shareholders' equity in the year in which  the changes occur . Since NEE is the plan sponsor , and its subsidiaries do not have
separate rights to the plan assets or direct obligations to their employees, this accounting guidance is reflected at NEE and not allocated
to the subsidiaries. The portion of previously unrecognized actuarial gains and losses and prior service costs or credits that are
estimated to be allocable to FPL as net periodic (income) cost in future periods and that otherwise would be recorded in accumulated
other comprehensive income (AOCI) are classified as regulatory assets and liabilities at NEE in accordance with regulatory treatment.
Stock-Based Compensation  - NEE accounts for stock-based payment transactions based on grant-date fair value. Compens ation costs
for awards with graded vesting are recognized on a straight-line basis over the requisite service  period for the entire award. Forfeitures
of stock-based awards are recognized as they occur . See Note 14 - Stock-Based Compensation.
Retirement of Long-T erm Debt  - For NEE's rate-regula ted subsidiaries, including FPL, gains and losses that result from differences in
reacquisition cost and the net book value of long-term debt which is retired are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability and amortized
to interest expense ratably over the remaining life of the original issue, which is consistent with their treatment in the ratemaking
process. NEE's non-rate regulated subsidiaries recognize such dif ferences in interest expense at the time of retirement.
76
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Reference Rate Reform  - In March 2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued an accounting standards update
which provides certain options to apply GAAP  guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting as companies transition from
the London Inter-Bank Offered Rate (LIBOR) and other interbank offered rates to alternative reference rates that are yet to be
determined or finalized. NEE’ s and FPL’s contr acts that reference LIBOR or other interbank offered rates mainly relate to debt and
derivative instruments. The standards update was ef fective upon issuance but can be applied prospectively through December 31, 2022.
NEE and FPL are currently evaluating whether to apply the options provided by the standards update with regard to their contracts that
reference LIBOR or other interbank of fered rates as an interest rate benchmark.
Income Taxes  - Deferred income taxes are recognized on all significant temporary differences between the financial statement and tax
bases of assets and liabilities, and are presented  as noncurrent on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. In connection with the
tax sharing agreement between NEE and certain of its subsidiaries, the income tax provision at each applicable subsidiary reflects the
use of the "separate return method," except that tax benefits that could not be used on a separate return basis, but are used on the
consolidated tax return, are recorded by the applicable subsidiary that generated the tax benefits. Any remaining consolidated income
tax benefits or expenses  are recorded at the corporate level. Included in other regulatory assets and other regulatory liabilities on NEE's
and FPL's consolidated balance sheets is the revenue equivalent of the difference in deferred income taxes computed under accounting
rules, as compared to regulatory accounting rules. The net regulatory liability totaled $3,949  million ($3,567  million for FPL) and $4,141
million ($3,745  million for FPL) at Dece mber 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively , and is being amortized in accord ance with the regulatory
treatment over the estimated lives of the assets or liabilities for which the deferred tax amount was initially recognized.
Production tax credits (PTCs) are recognized as wind energy is generated and sold based on a per kWh rate prescribed in applicable
federal and state statutes and are recorded as a reduction of current income taxes payable, unless limited by tax law in which instance
they are recorded as deferred tax assets. NEER recognizes ITCs as a reduction to income tax expense when the related energy
property is placed into service. FPL recognizes ITCs as a reduction to income tax expense over the depreciable life of the related energy
property . At December 31, 2020 and 2019, FPL’s accumulated deferred ITCs were approximately $729 million and $412 million,
respectively , and are included in noncurrent regulatory liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidate d balance sheets. NEE and FPL record
a deferred income tax benefit created by the convertible ITCs on the difference between the financial statement and tax bases of
renewable property . For NEER, this deferred income tax benefit is recorded in income tax expense in the year that the renewable
property is placed in service. For FPL, this deferred income tax benefit is offset by a regulatory liability , which is amortized as a reduction
of depreciation expense over the approximate lives of the related renewable property in accordance with the regulatory treatment. At
December 31, 2020 and 2019, the net deferred income tax benefits associated with FPL's convertible ITCs were approximately $38
million and $40 million, respectively , and are included in noncurrent regulatory assets and noncurrent regulatory  liabilities on NEE's and
FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
A valuation allowance is recorded to reduce the carrying amounts of deferred tax assets when it is more likely than not that such assets
will not be realized. NEE recognizes interest income (expense) related to unrecognized tax benefits (liabilities) in interest income and
interest expense, respectively , net of the amount deferred at FPL. At FPL, the offset to accrued interest receivable (payable) on income
taxes is classified as a regulatory liability (regulatory asset) which will be amortized to income (expense) over a five-year period upon
settlement in accordance with regulatory treatm ent. All tax positions taken by NEE in its income  tax returns that are recognized in the
financial statements must satisfy a more-likely-t han-not threshold. NEE and its subsidiaries file income tax returns in the U.S. federal
jurisdiction and various states, the most signific ant of which is Florida, and certain foreign jurisdictions. Federal tax liabilities, with the
exception of certain refund claims, are effectively settled for all years prior to 2017. State and foreign tax liabilities, which have varied
statutes of limitations regarding additional assessments, are generally effectively settled for years prior to 2016. At December 31, 2020,
NEE had unrecognized tax benefits of approxim ately $129 million that, if recognized, could impact the annual effective income tax rate.
The amounts of unrecog nized tax benefits and related interest accruals may change within the next 12 months; however , NEE and FPL
do not expect these changes to have a significant impact on NEE’ s or FPL ’s financial statements. See Note 5.
Sales of Differential Membership Interests  - Certain subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Reso urces sold Class B membership interests in
entities that have ownership interests in wind and solar facilities, with generating capacity totaling approximately 10,913  MW and 1,377
MW, respectively , at December 31, 2020 , to third-par ty investors. NEE retains a controlling interest in the entities and therefore presents
the Class B member interests as noncontrolling interests. Noncontrolling interests represents the portion of net assets in consolidated
entities that are not owned by NEE and are reported as a component of equity in NEE’ s consolidated balance sheet. The third-party
investors are allocated earnings, tax attributes and cash flows in accordance with the respectiv e limited liability company agreements.
Those econo mics are allocated primarily to the third-party investors until they receive a targeted  return (the flip date) and thereafter to
NEE. NEE has the right to call the third-party interests at specified amounts if and when the flip date occurs. NEE has determined the
allocation of economics between the controlling party and third-party investor should not follow the respective ownership percentages for
each wind and solar project but rather the hypothetical liquidation of book value (HLBV) method based on the governing provisions in
each respective limited liability company agree ment. Under the HLBV method, the amounts of income and loss attributable to the
noncontrolling interest reflects changes in the amount the owners would hypothetically receive at each balance sheet date under the
respective liquidation provisions, assuming the net assets of these entities were liquidated at the recorded amounts, after taking into
account any capital transactions, such as contributions and distributions, between the entities and the owners. At the point in time that
the
77
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
third-party investor , in hypothetical liquidation, would achieve its targeted return, NEE attributes the additional hypothetical proceeds to
the Class B membership interests based on the call price. A loss attributable to noncontrolling interest on NEE’ s consolidated statements
of income represents earnings attributable to NEE. Additionally , net (income) loss attributable to noncontrolling interests in NEE's
consolidated statement of income for the year ended December 31, 2018 includes a benefit to NEE of approximately $497 million ($373
million after tax) related to a reduction of differential membership interests as a result of a change in the federal corporate income tax
rate ef fective January 1, 2018.
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests  - Certain subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold Class B membership interests in entities
that have ownership interests in wind facilitie s to third-party investors. As specified in the respective limited liability company
agreements, if, subject to certain contingencies,  certain events occur , including, among others, those that would delay construction or
cancel any of the underlying projects, an investor has the option to require NEER to return all or part of its investment. As these potential
redemptions were outside of NEER’ s control,  these balances were classified as redeemable noncontrolling interests on NEE's
consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2019. During 2020, certain contingencies were resolved resulting in $423 million of the
December 31, 2019 balance being reclassified to noncontrolling interests.
Variable Interest Entities (VIEs)  - An entity is considered to be a VIE when its total equity investment at risk is not sufficient to permit the
entity to finance its activities without additional subordinated financial support, or its equity investors, as a group, lack the characteristics
of having a controlling financial interest. A reporting company is required to consolidate a VIE as its primary beneficiary when it has both
the power to direct the activities of the VIE that most significantly impact the VIE's economic performance, and the obligation to absorb
losses or the right to receive benefits from the VIE that could potentially be significant to the VIE. NEE and FPL evaluate whether an
entity is a VIE whenever reconsideration events as defined by the accounting guidance occur . See Note 9.
Leases  - NEE and FPL determi ne if an arrangement is a lease at inception. NEE and FPL recognize a right-of-use (ROU) asset and a
lease liability  for operating and finance leases by recognizing and measuring leases at the commencement date based on the present
value of lease payments  over the lease term. For sales-type leases, the book value of the leased asset is removed from the balance
sheet and a net investment in sales-type lease is recognized based on fixed payments under the contract and the residual value of the
asset being leased. NEE and FPL have elected not to apply the recognition requirements to short-term leases and not to separate
nonlease components from associated lease components for all classes of underlying assets except for purchased power agreements.
ROU assets  are includ ed primarily in noncurrent other assets, lease liabilities are included in current and noncurrent other liabilities  and
net investments in sales -type leases are includ ed in current and noncurrent other assets on NEE’ s and FPL's consolidated balance
sheets. Operating lease  expense is included in fuel, purchased power and interchange or O&M expenses, interest and amortization
expenses associated with finance leases is included in interest expense and depreciation and amortization expense, respectively , and
interest income associated with sales-type leases is included in operating revenues in NEE’ s and FPL’s consolidated statements of
income. See Note 10.
Disposal of Businesses/ Assets - In February 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale of its ownership
interest in two solar generation faciliti es located in Spain with a total generating capacity of 99.8 MW, which resulted in net cash
proceeds of approximately €111 million (approximately $121 million). In connection with the sale, a gain of approximately $270 million
(pretax and after tax) was recorded in NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2020 and is included
in gains on disposal of businesses/assets - net. The carrying amounts of the major classes of assets related to the facilities that were
classified as held for sale, which are included in current other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets, were approximately $440
million at December 31, 2019 and primarily represent property , plant and equipment. Liabilities associated with assets held for sale,
which are included in current other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheets, were approximately $647 million  at December 31,
2019 and primarily represent long-term debt and interest rate derivatives.
In 2019, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale of ownership interests  in three  wind generation facilitie s and
three  solar generation facilitie s, including noncontrolling interests in two of the solar facilities, located in the Midwest and West regions of
the U.S. with a total net ownership interest in plant capacity (net generating capacity) of 611 MW to a NEP subsidiar y for cash proceeds
of approximately $1.0 billion , plus working capital of $12 million. A NEER affiliate  will continue to operate the facilities included in the
sale. In connection with the sale, a gain of approximately $341 millio n ($259 millio n after tax) was recorded in NEE's consolidated
statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2019, which is included in gains on disposal of businesses/assets - net, and
noncontrolling interests of approximately $ 118 million were recorded on NEE's consolidated balance sheet.
In 2018, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale of its ownership interests in ten wind generation facilities and
one solar generation facility located in the Midwest, South and West regions of the U.S. with a total net generating capacity of 1,388  MW
to a subsidia ry of NEP for net cash proceeds of approximately $1.3 billion, after transaction  costs and working capital adjustments and
NEP's assumption of approximately $941 million in existing noncontrolling interests related to differential membership investors. In
connection with the sale and the related consolid ating state income tax effects, a gain of approximately $36 million  ($32 million  after tax)
was recorded in NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2018 and is included in gains on disposal
of businesses/assets - net.
78
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests  - In December 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources sold a 90% noncontrolling
ownership interest, comprised of a 50% ownership  interest to a third party and a 40% ownership  interest to a NEP subsidiary , in a
portfolio of three  wind generation facilities and four solar generation facilities in geographically diverse locations throughout the U.S.
representing a total net generating capacity of 900 MW. In addition, in December 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources also
sold its 100% ownership  interest in a 100 MW solar generation facility and a 30 MW battery storage facility (solar-plus-storage facility)
under construction in Arizona with an expected  in service date in early 2021 to a NEP subsidiary . Total cash proceeds for these two
separate transactions totaled approximately $656 million, subject to working capital and other adjustments. NEER will continue to
consolidate the projects for accounting purposes , see Note 9 - NEER. A NEER affiliate will continue to operate the facilities included in
the sale. In connection with the 90% sale, noncontrolling interests of approximatel y $689 million and a reduction to additional paid-in
capital of approximately $188 million ($165 million after tax) were recorded on NEE's conso lidated balance sheet at December 31, 2020.
In connection with the solar-plus-storage facility transaction, approximately $155 millio n of cash received  was recorded as a contract
liability , which is included in current other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheet. If the solar-plus-storage facility achieves
commercial operation by June 2021, the contrac t liability will be reversed and the sale recognized for accounting purposes. Otherwise,
NextEra Energy Resources is required to repurchase the facility for approximately $ 155 million.
2. Revenue from Contracts with Customers
Revenue is recognized when control of the promised goods or services is transferred to customers at an amount that reflects the
consideration to which the entity expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods and services. The promised goods or services in the
majority of NEE’ s contracts with customers is, at FPL, for the delivery of electricity based on tariff rates approved by the FPSC and, at
NEER, for the delivery of energy commodities and the availability of electric capacity and electric transmission.
FPL and NEER generate substantially all of NEE’ s operating revenues, which primarily include revenues from contracts with customers,
as well as derivative and lease transactions at NEER. For the vast majority of contracts with customers, NEE believes that the obligation
to deliver energy , capacity or transmission is satisfied over time as the customer simultaneously receives and consumes benefits as
NEE performs. In 2020, 2019 and 2018, NEE’ s revenue from contracts with customers was approximately $17.0 billion ($11.6 billion at
FPL), $17.5 billion ($12.1 billion at FPL) and $15.4 billion ($11.8 billion at FPL), respectively . NEE's and FPL's receivables are primarily
associated with revenues earned from contracts  with customers, as well as derivative and lease transactions at NEER, and consist of
both billed and unbilled amounts, which are recorded in customer receivables and other receivables on NEE's and FPL's consolidated
balance sheets. Receivables represent unconditional rights to consideration and reflect the differences in timing of revenue recognition
and cash collections. For substantially all of NEE's and FPL's receivables, regardless of the type of revenue transaction from which the
receivable originated, customer and counterparty credit risk is managed in the same manner and the terms and conditions of payment
are similar .
FPL - FPL’s revenues are derived primarily from tariff-based sales that result from providing electricity to retail customers in Florida with
no defined contractual term. Electricity sales to retail customers account for approximately 90% of FPL’s 2020 operati ng revenues, the
majority of which are to residential customers. FPL’s retail customers receive a bill monthly base d on the amount of monthly kWh usage
with payment due month ly. For these types of sales, FPL recognizes revenue as electricity is delivered and billed to customers, as well
as an estimate for electricity delivered and not yet billed. The billed and unbilled amounts represent the value of electricity delivered to
the customer . At December 31, 2020 and 2019 , FPL's unbilled revenues amounted to approximately $392 millio n and $389 millio n,
respectively , and are included in customer receivables on NEE’ s and FPL’s consolidated balance sheets. Certain contracts with
customers contain a fixed price which primarily relate to certain power purchase agreements with maturity dates through 2041. As of
December 31, 2020, FPL expects to record approximately $415 million of revenues related to the fixed capacity price components of
such contracts over the remaining terms of the related contracts as the capacity is provided. These contracts also contain a variable
price component for energy usage which FPL recognizes as revenue as the energy is delivered based on rates stipulated in the
respective contracts.
NEER  - NEER’ s revenue from contracts with custome rs is derived primarily from the sale of energy commodities, electric capacity and
electric trans mission. For these types of sales, NEER recognizes revenue as energy commoditie s are delivered and as electric capacity
and electric transmission are made available, consistent with the amounts billed to customers based on rates stipulated in the respective
contracts as well as an accrual for amounts earned but not yet billed. The amounts billed and accrued represent the value of energy or
transmission delivered and/or the capacity of energy or transmission available to the customer . Revenues yet to be earned under these
contracts, which have maturity dates ranging from 2021 to 2053, will vary based on the volume of energy or transmission delivered
and/or availa ble. NEER’ s customers typically receive bills monthly with payment due within 30 days. Certain contracts with customers
contain a fixed price which primarily relate to electric capacity sales associated with independent system operator annual auctions
through 2024 and certain power purchase agree ments with maturity dates through  2034. As of December 31, 2020, NEER expects to
record approximately $825 million of revenues related to the fixed price components of such contracts over the remaining terms of the
related contracts as the capacity is provided.
79
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
3. Derivative Instruments
NEE and FPL use deriv ative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks
inherent in the purchase  and sale of fuel and electricity , as well as interest rate and foreign currency exchange rate risk associated
primarily with outstanding and expected future debt issuances and borrowings, and to optimize the value of NEER's power generation
and gas infrastructure assets. NEE and FPL  do not utilize hedge accounting for their cash flow and fair value hedges.
With respect to commod ities related to NEE's competitive energy business, NEER employs risk management procedures to conduct its
activities related to optimizing the value of its power generation and gas infrastructure asse ts, providing full energy and capacity
requirements services primarily to distribution utilities, and engaging in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to take advantage
of expected future favorable price movements  and changes in the expected volatility of prices in the energy markets. These risk
management activities involve the use of deriva tive instruments executed within prescribed limits to manage the risk associated with
fluctuating commodity prices. Transactions in derivative instruments are executed on recognized  exchanges or via the over-the-counter
(OTC) markets, depending on the most favorab le credit terms and market execution factors. For NEER's power generation and gas
infrastructure assets, derivative instruments are used to hedge all or a portion of the expected output of these assets. These hedges are
designed to reduce the effect of adverse changes in the wholesale forward commodity markets associated with NEER's power
generation and gas infrastructure assets. With regard to full energy and capacity requirements services, NEER is required to vary the
quantity of energy and related services based on the load demands of the customers served.  For this type of transaction, derivative
instruments are used to hedge the anticipated electricity quantities required to serve these customers and reduce the effect of
unfavorable changes in the forward energy markets. Additionally , NEER takes positions in energy markets based on differences
between actual forward market levels and management's view of fundamental market conditions, including supply/demand imbalances,
changes in traditional flows of energy , changes  in short- and long-term weather patterns and anticipated regulatory and legislative
outcomes. NEER uses derivative instruments to realize value from these market dislocations, subject to strict risk management limits
around market, operational and credit exposure.
Derivative instruments, when required to be marked to market, are recorded on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets as either
an asset or liability measured at fair value. At FPL, substantially all changes in the derivatives' fair value are deferred as a regulatory
asset or liability until the contracts are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the fuel and purchased
power cost recovery clause (fuel clause). For NEE's non-rate regulated operations, predominantly NEER, essentially all changes in the
derivatives' fair value for power purchases and sales, fuel sales and trading activities are recognized on a net basis in operating
revenues; fuel purchases used in the production of electricity are recognized in fuel, purchased power and interchange expense; and the
equity method investees' related activity is recog nized in equity in earnings of equity method investees in NEE's consolidated statements
of income. Settlement gains and losses are included within the line items in the consolidated statements of income to which they relate.
Transactions for which physical delivery is deemed not to have occurred are presented on a net basis in the consolidated statements of
income. For commodity  derivatives, NEE believes that, where offsetting positions exist at the same location for the same time, the
transactions are considered to have been netted and therefore physical delivery has been deemed not to have occurred for financial
reporting purposes. Settlements related to deriva tive instruments are primarily recognized in net cash provided by operating activities in
NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of cash flows.
For interest rate and foreign currency derivative instruments, all changes in the derivatives' fair value, as well as the transaction gain or
loss on foreign denominated debt, are recognized in interest expense and the equity method investees' related activity is recognized in
equity in earnings (losse s) of equity method investees in NEE's consolidated statements of income.  In addition, for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, NEE recla ssified from AOCI approximately $26 million ($6 million after tax), of which $23 million
was reclassified to gains on disposal of businesses/assets - net (see Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets) with the balance to
interest expense, and $11 million ($8 million after tax) and $3 million ($2 million after tax) to interest expense, respective ly, because it
became probable that related future transactions being hedged would not occur . At December 31, 2020, NEE's AOCI included amounts
related to discontinued interest rate cash flow hedges with expiration dates through March 2035 and foreign currency cash flow hedges
with expiration dates through September 2030. Approximately $7 millio n of net losses included in AOCI at December 31, 2020 are
expected to be reclassified into earnings within the next 12 months as the principal and/or interest payments are made. Such amounts
assume no change in scheduled principal payments.
80
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Fair Value Measurement of Derivative Instrume nts - The fair value of assets and liabilities are determined using either unadjusted
quoted price s in active markets (Level 1) or pricing inputs that are observable (Level 2) whenever that information is available and using
unobservable inputs (Level 3) to estimate fair value only when relevant observable inputs are not available. NEE and FPL use several
different valuation techniques to measure the fair value of assets and liabilities, relying primarily on the market approach of using prices
and other market information for identical and/or comparable assets and liabilities for those assets and liabilities that are measured at
fair value on a recurring basis. NEE's and FPL's assessment of the significance of any particu lar input to the fair value measurement
requires judgment and may affect placement within the fair value hierarchy levels. Non-performan ce risk, including the consideration of a
credit valuation adjustment, is also considered in the determination of fair value for all assets and liabilities measured at fair value.
NEE and FPL measure the fair value of comm odity contracts using a combination of market and income approaches utilizing prices
observed on commodities exchanges and in the OTC markets, or through the use of industry-s tandard valuation techniques, such as
option mode ling or discounted cash flows techniques, incorporating both observable and unobservable valuation inputs. The resulting
measurements are the best estimate of fair value as represented by the transfer of the asset or liability through an orderly transaction in
the marketplace at the measurement date.
Most exchange-traded derivative assets and liabilities are valued directly using unadjusted quoted prices. For exchange-traded
derivative assets and liabilities where the principal market is deemed to be inactive based on average daily volumes and open interest,
the measure ment is established using settlem ent prices from the exchanges, and therefore considered to be valued using other
observable inputs.
NEE, throug h its subsidiaries, including FPL, also enters into OTC commodity contract derivatives. The majority of these contracts are
transacted at liquid trading points, and the prices for these contracts are verified using quoted prices in active markets from exchanges,
brokers or pricing services for similar contracts.
NEE, throug h NEER, also enters into full requirements contracts, which, in most cases, meet the definition of derivatives and are
measured at fair value. These contracts typically have one or more inputs that are not observab le and are significant to the valuation of
the contract. In addition, certain exchange and non-exchange traded derivative options at NEE have one or more significant inputs that
are not observable, and are valued using industry-standard option models.
In all cases where NEE and FPL use significant unobservable inputs for the valuation of a comm odity contract, consideration is given to
the assump tions that market participants would  use in valuing the asset or liability . The primary input to the valuation models for
commodity contracts is the forward commodity curve for the respective instruments. Other inputs include, but are not limited to,
assumptions about market liquidity , volatility , correlation and contract duration as more fully described below in Significant Unobservable
Inputs Used in Recurring  Fair Value Measureme nts. In instances where the reference markets are deemed to be inactive or do not have
transactions for a simila r contract, the derivativ e assets and liabilities may be valued using significant other observable inputs and
potentially significant unobservable inputs. In such instances, the valuation for these contracts is established using techniques including
extrapolation from or interpolation between actively traded contracts, or estimated basis adjustme nts from liquid trading points. NEE and
FPL regularl y evaluate and validate the inputs used to determine fair value by a number of methods, consisting of various market price
verification procedures, including the use of pricing services and multiple broker quotes to support the market price of the various
commodities. In all cases where there are assumptions and models used to generate inputs for valuing derivative assets and liabilities,
the review and verificatio n of the assumptions, models and changes to the models are undertake n by individuals that are independent of
those responsible for estimating fair value.
NEE uses interest rate contracts and foreign currency contracts to mitigate and adjust interest rate and foreign currency exchange
exposure related primarily to certain outstanding and expected future debt issuances and borrowings when deemed appropriate based
on market conditions or when required by financing agreements. NEE estimates the fair value  of these derivatives using an income
approach based on a discounted cash flows valuation technique utilizing the net amount of estimated future cash inflows and outflows
related to the agreements .
The tables below presen t NEE's and FPL's gross derivative positions at December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, as required by
disclosure rules. Howeve r, the majority of the underlying contracts are subject to master netting agreements and generally would not be
contractually settled on a gross basis. Therefore, the tables below also present the derivative positions on a net basis, which reflect the
offsetting of positions of certain transactions within the portfolio, the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting
arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral, as well as the location of the net derivati ve position on the consolidated balance
sheets.
81
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Netting Total
(millions)
Assets:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 919 $ 1,881 $ 1,679 $ (2,325)$ 2,154 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 81 $ — $ (41) 40 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 57 $ — $ (34) 23 
Total derivative assets $ 2,217 
FPL - commodity contracts $ — $ 1 $ 2 $ — $ 3 
Liabilities:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 1,004 $ 1,468 $ 305 $ (2,277)$ 500 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 1,042 $ — $ (41) 1,001 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 43 $ — $ (34) 9 
Total derivative liabilities $ 1,510 
FPL - commodity contracts $ — $ — $ 3 $ — $ 3 
Net fair value by NEE balance sheet line item:
Current derivative assets $ 570 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,647 
Total derivative assets $ 2,217 
Current derivative liabilities $ 311 
Noncurrent derivative liabilities 1,199 
Total derivative liabilities $ 1,510 
Net fair value by FPL balance sheet line item:
Current other assets $ 3 
Current other liabilities $ 2 
Noncurrent other liabilities 1 
Total derivative liabilities $ 3 
______________________
(a)Includes the effect of the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral payments and receipts. NEE
and FPL also have contract settlement receivable and payable balances that are subject to the master netting arrangements but are not offset within the consolidated
balance sheets and are recorded in customer receivables - net and accounts payable, respectively.
(b)Reflects the netting of approximately $184 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(c)Reflects the netting of approximately $136 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.(a)
(b)
(c)
82
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2019
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Netting Total
(millions)
Assets:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 1,229 $ 2,082 $ 1,739 $ (2,700)$ 2,350 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 24 $ 2 $ (17) 9 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 26 $ — $ 1 27 
Total derivative assets $ 2,386 
FPL - commodity contracts $ — $ 3 $ 1 $ (1)$ 3 
Liabilities:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 1,365 $ 1,446 $ 390 $ (2,625)$ 576 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 598 $ 144 $ (17) 725 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 38 $ — $ 1 39 
Total derivative liabilities $ 1,340 
FPL - commodity contracts $ — $ 5 $ 9 $ (1)$ 13 
Net fair value by NEE balance sheet line item:
Current derivative assets $ 762 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,624 
Total derivative assets $ 2,386 
Current derivative liabilities $ 344 
Current other liabilities 133 
Noncurrent derivative liabilities 863 
Total derivative liabilities $ 1,340 
Net fair value by FPL balance sheet line item:
Current other assets $ 3 
Current other liabilities $ 12 
Noncurrent other liabilities 1 
Total derivative liabilities $ 13 
______________________
(a)Includes the effect of the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral payments and receipts. NEE
and FPL also have contract settlement receivable and payable balances that are subject to the master netting arrangements but are not offset within the consolidated
balance sheets and are recorded in customer receivables - net and accounts payable, respectively.
(b)Reflects the netting of approximately $2 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(c)Reflects the netting of approximately $139 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(d)Reflects the netting of approximately $66 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.
(e)See Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets.
At Decembe r 31, 2020 and 2019, NEE had approximately $6 million and $10 million (none at FPL), respectively , in margin cash
collateral received from counterparties that was not offset against derivative assets in the above presentation. These amounts are
included in current other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. Additionally , at December 31, 2020 and 2019, NEE had
approximately $315 million and $360 million (none at FPL), respectively , in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties that was not
offset against derivative assets or liabilities in the above presentation. These amounts are included in current other assets on NEE's
consolidated balance sheets.
Significant Unobservable Inputs Used in Recurrin g Fair Value Measurements  - The valuation of certain commodity contracts requires the
use of significant unobservable inputs. All forward price, implied volatility , implied correlation  and interest rate inputs used in the
valuation of such contra cts are directly based on third-party market data, such as broker quotes  and exchange settlements, when that
data is available. If third-party market data is not available, then industry standard methodologies are used to develop inputs that
maximize the use of relevant observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs. Observable inputs, including some
forward prices, implied volatilities and interest rates used for determining fair value are updated daily to reflect the best available market
information. Unobservab le inputs which are related to observable inputs, such as illiquid portions of forward price or volatility curves, are
updated daily as well, using industry standard techniques such as interpolation and extrapolation, combining observable forward inputs
supplemented by historical market and other relevant data. Other unobservable inputs, such as implied correlations, block-to-hourly
price shaping, customer migration rates from full(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
83
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
requirements contracts and some implied volatility curves, are modeled using proprietary models based on historical data and industry
standard techniques.
The significa nt unobservable inputs used in the valuation of NEE's commodity contracts categorized as Level 3 of the fair value
hierarchy at December 31, 2020 are as follows:
Transaction TypeFair V alue at
December 31, 2020Valuation
Technique(s)Significant
Unobservable Inputs RangeWeighted-
average
Assets Liabilities
(millions)
Forward contracts - power $ 792 $ (1)Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh) $— — $137 $29
Forward contracts - gas 305 25 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MMBtu) $1 — $8 $3
Forward contracts - congestion 27 7 Discounted cash flow Forward price (various) $(6)— $30 $—
Options - power 35 10 Option models Implied correlations 40% — 84% 55%
Implied volatilities 5% — 357% 84%
Options - primarily gas 128 131 Option models Implied correlations 40% — 96% 55%
Implied volatilities 16% — 310% 36%
Full requirements and unit
contingent contracts363 121 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh) $5 — $330 $46
Customer migration rate —% — 122% 2%
Forward contracts - other 29 12 
Total $ 1,679  $ 305 
______________________
(a)Unobservable inputs were weighted by volume.
(b)Applies only to full requirements contracts.
The sensitivity of NEE's fair value measurements to increases (decreases) in the significant unobservable inputs is as follows:
Significant Unobservable Input PositionImpact on
Fair Value Measurement
Forward price Purchase power/gas Increase (decrease)
Sell power/gas Decrease (increase)
Implied correlations Purchase option Decrease (increase)
Sell option Increase (decrease)
Implied volatilities Purchase option Increase (decrease)
Sell option Decrease (increase)
Customer migration rate Sell power Decrease (increase)
————————————
(a)Assumes the contract is in a gain position.(a)
(b)
(a)
84
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The reconciliation of changes in the fair value of derivatives that are based on significant unobservable inputs is as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
NEE FPL NEE FPL NEE FPL
(millions)
Fair value of net derivatives based on significant unobservable inputs at
December 31 of prior year $ 1,207 $ (8)$ 647 $ (36)$ 566 $ — 
Realized and unrealized gains (losses):
Included in earnings 547 — 923 — 35 (1)
Included in other comprehensive income (loss) 1 — 5 — 7 — 
Included in regulatory assets and liabilities 2 2 1 1 (18) (18)
Purchases 191 — 141 — 152 (16)
Sales 114 — — — — — 
Settlements (562) 6 (356) 25 28 (2)
Issuances (123) — (87) — (115) — 
Impact of adoption of revenue standard — — — — (30) — 
Transfers in 18 (1) (5) — — — 
Transfers out (21) — (62) 2 22 1 
Fair value of net derivatives based on significant unobservable inputs at
December 31 $ 1,374 $ (1)$ 1,207 $ (8)$ 647 $ (36)
Gains (losses) included in earnings attributable to the change in unrealized gains
(losses) relating to derivatives held at the reporting date $ 317 $ — $ 611 $ — $ 100 $ (1)
______________________
(a)For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, realized and unrealized gains of approximately $569 million, $956 million and $48 million are included in the
consolidated statements of income in operating revenues and the balance is included in interest expense.
(b)Included in net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency translation in the consolidated statements of comprehensive income.
(c)See Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets.
(d)Transfers into Level 3 were a result of decreased observability of market data. Transfers from Level 3 to Level 2 were a result of increased observability of market data.
(e)For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, unrealized gains of approximately $317 million, $638 million and $112 million are included in the consolidated
statements of income in operating revenues and the balance is included in interest expense.
Income Statement Impact of Derivative Instruments  - Gains (losses) related to NEE's derivatives are recorded in NEE's consolidated
statements of income as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2020  2019  2018
(millions)
Commodity contracts:      
Operating revenues $ 352 $ 762 $ 377 
Fuel, purchased power and interchange — — (2)
Foreign currency contracts - interest expense 8 (7) 19 
Interest rate contracts - interest expense (421) (699) (280)
Losses reclassified from AOCI:
Interest rate contracts (35) (32) (30)
Foreign currency contracts - interest expense (3) (4) (4)
Total $ (99) $ 20  $ 80 
______________________
(a)For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, FPL recorded gains (losses) of approximately $6 million, $9 million and $(31) million, respectively, related to
commodity contracts as regulatory liabilities (assets) on its consolidated balance sheets.
(b)For the year ended December 31, 2020, approximately $23 million was reclassified to gains on disposal of businesses/assets - net (see Note 1 - Disposal of
Businesses/Assets); remaining balances were reclassified to interest expense on NEE's consolidated statements of income.
Notional Volumes of Derivative Instruments  - The following table represents net notional volumes associated with derivative instruments
that are required to be reported at fair value in NEE's and FPL's consolidated financial statements. The table includes significant
volumes of transactions that have minimal expo sure to commodity price changes because they are variably priced agreements. These
volumes are only an indication of the commodity exposure that is managed through the use of derivatives. They do not represent net
physical asset positions or non-derivative positions and the related hedges, nor do they represent NEE's and FPL's net economic
exposure, but only the net notional derivative positions that fully or partially hedge the relate d asset positions. NEE and FPL had
derivative commodity contracts for the following net notional volumes:(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(d)
(e)
(a)
(b)
85
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Commodity Type NEE FPL NEE FPL
(millions)
Power (90)MWh — (81)MWh 1 MWh
Natural gas (607)MMBtu 87 MMBtu (1,723)MMBtu 161 MMBtu
Oil (6)barrels — (13)barrels — 
______________________
(a)Megawatt-hours
(b)One million British thermal units
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, NEE had interest rate contracts with a net notional amount of approximately $10.5 billion and $8.9
billion, respectively , and foreign currency contracts with a net notional amount of approximately $ 1.0 billion and $ 1.0 billion, respectively .
Credit-Risk-Related Contingent Features  - Certain derivative instruments contain credit-risk-related contingent features including, among
other things, the require ment to maintain an investment grade credit rating from specified credit rating agencies and certain financial
ratios, as well as credit-r elated cross-default and material adverse change triggers. At Decembe r 31, 2020 and 2019, the aggregate fair
value of NEE's derivativ e instruments with credi t-risk-related contingent features that were in a liability position was approximately $1.9
billion ($ 3 million for FPL) and $ 1.7 billion ($ 12 million for FPL), respectively .
If the credit -risk-related contingent features underlying these derivative agreements were triggered, certain subsidiaries of NEE,
including FPL, could be required to post collateral or settle contracts according to contractual terms which generally allow netting of
contracts in offsetting positions. Certain derivative contracts contain multiple types of credit-related triggers. To the extent these
contracts contain a credit ratings downgrade trigger , the maximum exposure is included in the following credit ratings collateral posting
requirements. If FPL's and NEECH's credit ratings were downgraded to BBB/Baa2 (a three level downgrade for FPL and a one level
downgrade for NEECH from the current lowest applicable rating), applicable NEE subsidiaries would be required to post collateral such
that the total posted collateral would be approxim ately $80 million (none  at FPL) and $215 million (none  at FPL) at December 31, 2020
and 2019, respectively . If FPL's and NEECH's credit ratings were downgraded to below investment grade, applicable NEE subsidiaries
would be required to post additional collateral such that the total posted collateral would be approximately $1.2 billion ($75 million at
FPL) and $1.2 billion ($35 million at FPL) at December 31, 2020 and 2019 , respectively . Some derivative contracts do not contain credit
ratings downgrade triggers, but do contain provisions that require certain financial measures be maintained and/or have credit-related
cross-default triggers. In the event these provis ions were triggered, applicable NEE subsidiarie s could be required to post additional
collateral of up to approximately $880 million ($75 million at FPL) and $590 million ($75 million at FPL) at December 31, 2020 and 2019 ,
respectively .
Collateral related to derivatives may be posted in the form of cash or credit support in the normal course of business. At December 31,
2020 and 2019, applicable NEE subsidiaries have posted approximately $2 million (none  at FPL) and $2 million (none  at FPL),
respectively , in cash and $66 million (none  at FPL) and $88 million (none  at FPL), respectively , in the form of letters of credit each of
which could be applied toward the collateral requirements described above. FPL and NEECH have capacity under their credit facilities
generally in excess of the collateral requirements described above that would be available to support, among other things, derivative
activities. Under the terms of the credit facilities, maintenance of a specific credit rating is not a condition to drawing on these credit
facilities, although there are other conditions to drawing on these credit facilities.
Additionally , some contracts contain certain adequate assurance provisions whereby a counter party may demand additional collateral
based on subjective events and/or conditions. Due to the subjective nature of these provisions, NEE and FPL are unable to determine
an exact value for these items and they are not included in any of the quantitative disclosures above.
4. Non-Derivative Fair Value Measurements
Non-derivative fair value measurements consist of NEE’ s and FPL’s cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents, special use funds
and other investments. The fair value of these financial assets is determined by using the valuation techniques and inputs as described
in Note 3 – Fair V alue Measurements of Derivative Instruments as well as below .
Cash Equivalents  and Restricted Cash Equivalents - NEE and FPL hold investments in money market funds. The fair value of these
funds is estimated using a market approach based on current observable market prices.
Special Use Funds and Other Investments - NEE and FPL hold primarily debt and equity securities directly , as well as indirectly through
commingled funds. Substantially all directly held equity securities are valued at their quoted market prices. For directly held debt
securities, multiple prices and price types are obtained from pricing vendors whenever possible, which enables cross-provider
validations. A primary price source is identified based on asset type, class or issue of each security . Commingled funds, which are
similar to mutual funds, are maintained by banks or investment companies and hold certain investments in accordance with a stated set
of objectives . The fair value of commingled funds is primarily derived from the quoted prices in active markets of the underlying
securities. Because the fund shares are of fered to a limited group of investors, they are not considered to be traded in an active market.(a) (a) (a)
(b) (b) (b) (b)
86
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Recurring Non-Derivative Fair Value Measurements  - NEE's and FPL's financial assets and other fair value measurements made on a
recurring basis by fair value hierarchy level are as follows:
 December 31, 2020
 Level 1 Level 2  Level 3 Total
 (millions)
Assets:      
Cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents:      
NEE - equity securities $ 742 $ —  $ — $ 742 
FPL - equity securities $ 78 $ —  $ — $ 78 
Special use funds:   
NEE:   
Equity securities $ 2,237 $ 2,489 $ — $ 4,726 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 590 $ 127  $ — $ 717 
Corporate debt securities $ 1 $ 870  $ — $ 871 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 422  $ — $ 422 
Other debt securities $ — $ 124  $ — $ 124 
FPL:   
Equity securities $ 752 $ 2,260 $ — $ 3,012 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 449 $ 87  $ — $ 536 
Corporate debt securities $ — $ 627  $ — $ 627 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 335  $ — $ 335 
Other debt securities $ — $ 119  $ — $ 119 
Other investments:   
NEE:   
Equity securities $ 62 $ —  $ — $ 62 
Debt securities $ 91 $ 127  $ — $ 218 
______________________
(a) Includes restricted cash equivalents  of approximately $111 million ($56 million for FPL) in current other assets and $42 million ($17 million for FPL) in noncurrent other assets on the consolidated
balance sheets.
(b) Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis. See Fair Value of Financial Instruments Recorded at Other than Fair Value
below .
(c) Primarily invested in commingled funds whose underlying securities would be Level 1 if those securities were held directly by NEE or FPL.
(d) Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheet.
December 31, 2019
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
(millions)
Assets:      
Cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents:      
NEE - equity securities $ 363 $ — $ — $ 363 
FPL - equity securities $ 156 $ — $ — $ 156 
Special use funds:      
NEE:      
Equity securities $ 1,875 $ 2,088 $ — $ 3,963 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 567 $ 150  $ — $ 717 
Corporate debt securities $ — $ 748  $ — $ 748 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 517  $ — $ 517 
Other debt securities $ — $ 117  $ — $ 117 
FPL:      
Equity securities $ 596 $ 1,895 $ — $ 2,491 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 429 $ 106  $ — $ 535 
Corporate debt securities $ — $ 533  $ — $ 533 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 395  $ — $ 395 
Other debt securities $ — $ 111  $ — $ 111 
Other investments:      
NEE:      
Equity securities $ 34 $ 12 $ — $ 46 
Debt securities $ 82 $ 69 $ — $ 151 
______________________
(a) Includes restricted  cash equivalents of approximately $60 million ($54 million for FPL) in current other assets and $64 million ($64 million for FPL) in noncurrent other assets on the consolidated
balance sheets.
(b) Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis. See Fair Value of Financial Instruments Recorded at Other than Fair Value
below .
(c) Primarily invested in commingled funds whose underlying securities would be Level 1 if those securities were held directly by NEE or FPL.
(d) Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheet.(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
87
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Fair Value of Financial Instruments Recorded at Other than Fair Value - The carrying  amounts of commercial paper and other short-term
debt approxi mate their fair values. The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of other financial instruments recorded at other than
fair value are as follows:
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair ValueCarrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value
 (millions)  
NEE:
Special use funds $ 919 $ 920 $ 892 $ 891 
Other investments $ 29 $ 29 $ 30 $ 30 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 46,082 $ 51,525 $ 39,667 $ 42,928 
FPL:
Special use funds $ 718 $ 719 $ 706 $ 705 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 15,676 $ 19,470 $ 14,161 $ 16,448 
______________________
(a)Primarily represents investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis (Level 2).
(b)Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets.
(c)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, substantially all is Level 2 for NEE and all is Level 2 for FPL.
(d)Excludes debt totaling approximately $463 million classified as held for sale, which is included in current other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheet at
December 31, 2019, for which the carrying amount approximates fair value. See Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets.
Special Use Funds  - The spec ial use funds noted above and those carried at fair value (see Recurring Non-D erivative Fair Value
Measurements above) consist of NEE's nuclear decommissioning fund assets of approximately $7,703  million and $6,880  million at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively , ($5,271  million and $4,697  million, respectively , for FPL) and FPL's storm fund assets of
$76 millio n and $74 millio n at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . The investments held in the special use funds consist of
equity and available for sale debt securities which are primarily carried at estimated fair value. The amortized cost of debt securities is
approximately $2,009  million and $2,030  million at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively ($1,521  million and $1,523  million,
respectively , for FPL). Debt securities includ ed in the nuclear decommissioning funds have a weighted-average maturity at
December 31, 2020 of approximately eight years  at NEE and nine years  at FPL. FPL's storm fund primarily consists of debt securities
with a weighted-average  maturity at December 31, 2020 of approximately one year. The cost of securities sold is determined using  the
specific identification method.
Effective January 1, 2020, NEE and FPL adopted an accounting standards update that provides a modified version of the other-than-
temporary impairment model for debt securiti es. The new available for sale debt security impairment model no longer allows
consideration of the length of time during which the fair value has been less than its amortized cost basis when determining whether a
credit loss exists. Credit losses are required to be presented as an allowance rather than as a write-down on securities not intended to
be sold or required to be sold. NEE and FPL adopted this model prospectively . See Note 1 - Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial
Instruments.
For FPL's special use funds, changes in fair value of debt and equity securities, including any estimated credit losses of debt securities,
result in a corresponding  adjustment to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts, consiste nt with regulatory treatment. For NEE's
non-rate regulated operations, changes in fair value of debt securities result in a corresponding adjustment to OCI, except for estimated
credit losses  and unrealized losses on debt securities intended or required to be sold prior to recovery of the amortized cost basis, which
are recognized in other - net in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Changes in fair value of equity securities are recorded in
change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds - net in NEE’ s consolidated
statements of income.
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities held at December 31, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2020 2019
 (millions)  
Unrealized gains (losses) $ 627 $ 780 $ 444 $ 510 (a)
(b)
(c) (d) (c)(d)
(a)
(c) (c)
88
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Realized gains and losses and proceeds from the sale or maturity of available for sale debt securities are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
(millions)
Realized gains $ 110 $ 68 $ 51 $ 83 $ 44 $ 31 
Realized losses $ 70 $ 48 $ 75 $ 56 $ 29 $ 49 
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities$ 2,541 $ 3,005 $ 2,551 $ 2,162 $ 2,539 $ 2,100 
The unrealized gains and unrealized losses on available for sale debt securities and the fair value of available for sale debt securities in
an unrealized loss position are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2020 2019 2020 2019
 (millions)  
Unrealized gains $ 134 $ 75 $ 104 $ 58 
Unrealized losses $ 9 $ 7 $ 9 $ 7 
Fair value $ 201 $ 314 $ 150 $ 240 
______________________
(a)Unrealized losses on available for sale debt securities in an unrealized loss position for greater than twelve months at December 31, 2020 and 2019 were not material to
NEE or FPL.
Regulations issued by the FERC and the NRC provide general risk management guidelines to protect nuclear decommissioning funds
and to allow such funds to earn a reasonable return. The FERC regulations prohibit, among other investments, investments in any
securities of NEE or its subsidiaries, affiliates or associates, excluding investments tied to market indices or mutual funds. Similar
restrictions applicable to the decommissioning funds for NEER's nuclear plants are included in the NRC operating licenses for those
facilities or in NRC regulations applicable to NRC licensees not in cost-of-service environments . With respect to the decommissioning
fund for Seabrook, deco mmissioning fund contributions and withdrawals are also regulated by the NDFC pursuant to New Hampshire
law.
The nuclear decommissioning reserve funds are managed by investment managers who must comply with the guidelines of NEE and
FPL and the rules of the applicable regulatory authorities. The funds' assets are invested giving consideration to taxes, liquidity , risk,
diversification and other prudent investment objectives.
Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements - NEE tests its equity method investments for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the investment may be impaired. During the preparation of NEE's December 31, 2020 financial statements,
it was deter mined that NextEra Energy Resources' investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline accounted for under the equity method of
accounting was other-than-temporarily impaired. The impairment is the result of continued legal and regulatory challenges that have
resulted in substantial delays in achieving comm ercial operation and increased costs to complete construction. More specifically at the
end of 2020 and into early 2021, developments in the current legal, regulatory and political environment have caused NextEra Energy
Resources to consider the investment impaired and the impairment to be other than temporary . The challenges include legal challenges
to the various permits needed to complete construction and the regulatory approvals received, regulatory challenges related to
alternative construction plans and the extended construction period, and the current political and environmental challenges with the
construction of an interstate pipeline. Accordingly , NextEra Energy Resources performed a fair value analysis based on the market
approach to determine the amount of the impa irment. The current challenges to complete construction and the resulting economic
outlook for the pipeline were considered in determining the magnitude of the other-than-temporary impairment. Based on the fair value
analysis, the equity meth od investment with a carrying amount of approximately $1.9 billion was written down to its estimated fair value
of approxima tely $400 million as of December 31, 2020, resulting in an impairment charge of $1.5 billion (or $1.2 billion after tax), which
is recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income for the year ended
December 31, 2020.
The fair value estimate was based on a probability-weighted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA)
multiple valuation technique using a market participant view of the potential different outcomes for the investment. As part of the
valuation, NextEra Energy Resources used observable inputs where available, including the EBITDA  multiples of recent pipeline
transactions. Significant unobservable inputs (Level 3), including the probabilities assigned to the different potential outcomes, the
forecasts of operating revenues and costs, and the projected capital expenditures to complete the project, were also used in the
estimation of fair value. An increase in the revenue forecasts, a decrease in the projected operating or capital expenditures or an
increase in the probability assigned to the full pipeline being completed would result in an(a)
89
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
increased fair market value. Changes in the opposite direction of those unobservable inputs would result in a decreased fair market
value.
5. Income Taxes
The components of income taxes are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
(millions)
Federal:
Current $ 105 $ 167 $ 30 $ 53 $ 348 $ 251 
Deferred (148) 115 1,153 388 (29) 134 
Total federal (43) 282 1,183 441 319 385 
State:       
Current 18 23 63 44 49 91 
Deferred 69 143 330 125 73 63 
Total state 87 166 393 169 122 154 
Total income taxes $ 44 $ 448 $ 1,576 $ 610 $ 441 $ 539 
A reconciliation between the ef fective income tax rates and the applicable statutory rate is as follows:
 NEE FPL
 Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Statutory federal income tax rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
Increases (reductions) resulting from:       
State income taxes - net of federal income
tax benefit 2.8 3.4 4.2 4.1 3.5 4.5 
Taxes attributable to noncontrolling interests 4.8 2.1 2.5 — — — 
PTCs and ITCs - NEER (11.8) (7.2) (3.0) — — — 
Amortization of deferred regulatory credit (7.2) (6.2) (1.8) (5.0) (8.1) (5.0)
Foreign operations (2.4) — (0.8) — — — 
Other - net (5.4) (1.4) (0.7) (1.4) (0.5) (0.6)
Effective income tax rate 1.8 % 11.7 % 21.4 % 18.7 % 15.9 % 19.9 %
_________________________
(a)2019 reflects a valuation allowance of approximately $48 million related to deferred state tax credits.
(b)2019 reflects an adjustment of approximately $83 million recorded by FPL to reduce income tax expense for the cumulative amortization of excess deferred income taxes
from January 1, 2018 as a result of the FPSC's order in connection with its review of impacts associated with tax reform. One of the provisions of the order requires FPL
to amortize approximately $870 million of its excess deferred income taxes over a period not to exceed ten years.
(c)The 2020 gain on sale of the Spain solar projects was not taxable for federal and state income tax purposes (see Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets).(a)
(b)
(c)
90
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The income tax ef fects of temporary dif ferences giving rise to consolidated deferred income tax liabilities and assets are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2020 2019 2020 2019
(millions)
Deferred tax liabilities:
Property-related $ 10,065 $ 10,133 $ 6,791 $ 6,394 
Pension 437 417 394 374 
Investments in partnerships and joint ventures 2,238 2,019 3 — 
Other 1,730 1,618 672 685 
Total deferred tax liabilities 14,470 14,187 7,860 7,453 
Deferred tax assets and valuation allowance:
Decommissioning reserves 290 317 290 286 
Net operating loss carryforwards 299 380 2 2 
Tax credit carryforwards 3,859 3,406 — — 
ARO and accrued asset removal costs 347 368 226 273 
Regulatory liabilities 1,380 1,335 1,259 1,219 
Other 755 515 293 258 
Valuation allowance (289) (285) — — 
Net deferred tax assets 6,641 6,036 2,070 2,038 
Net deferred income taxes $ 7,829 $ 8,151 $ 5,790 $ 5,415 
______________________
(a)Reflects valuation allowances related to deferred state tax credits and state operating loss carryforwards, and, in 2019, also reflects valuation allowances related to the
solar projects in Spain that completely offset the related deferred taxes.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are included on the consolidated balance sheets as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2020 2019 2020 2019
(millions)
Noncurrent other assets $ 191 $ 210 $ — $ — 
Deferred income taxes - noncurrent liabilities (8,020) (8,361) (5,790) (5,415)
Net deferred income taxes $ (7,829)$ (8,151)$ (5,790)$ (5,415)
The components of NEE's deferred tax assets relating to net operating loss carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards at December 31,
2020 are as follows:
AmountExpiration
Dates
(millions)
Net operating loss carryforwards:
Federal $ 2 2033-2037
State 280 2021-2040
Foreign 17 2021-2040
Net operating loss carryforwards $ 299 
Tax credit carryforwards:  
Federal $ 3,508 2029-2040
State 348 2021-2045
Foreign 3 2034-2040
Tax credit carryforwards $ 3,859 
______________________
(a)Includes $191 million of ITC carryforwards with an indefinite expiration period.(a)
(a)
91
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
6. Acquisitions
Gulf Power Company - On January 1, 2019, NEE acquired the outstanding common shares of Gulf Power , a rate-regulat ed electric utility
under the jurisdiction of the FPSC. Gulf Power serves approximately 470,000  customers in eight  counties throughout northwest Florida,
has approximately 9,500  miles of transmission and distribution lines and owns approximately 2,300  MW of net generating capacity . The
purchase price included approximately $4.44 billion in cash consideration and the assumpt ion of approximately $1.3 billion of Gulf
Power debt.  The cash purchase price was funde d through $4.5 billion of borrowings by NEECH in December 2018 under certain short-
term bi-lateral term loan agreements; the proceeds of which borrowings were restricted and included in noncurrent other assets on
NEE's consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2018. Such borrowings were repaid in April 2019.
Under the acquisition method, the purchase price was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed on January 1, 2019
based on their fair value . The approval by the FPSC of Gulf Power's rates, which is intended to allow Gulf Power to collect from retail
customers total revenues equal to Gulf Power's  costs of providing service, including a reasonab le rate of return on invested capital, is
considered a fundamental input in measuring the fair value of Gulf Power's assets and liabilities and, as such, NEE concluded that the
carrying values of all assets and liabilities recoverable through rates are representative of their fair values. As a result, NEE acquired
assets of approximately $5.2 billion, primarily relating to property , plant and equipment of $4.0 billion and regulatory assets of $494
million, and assumed liabilities of approximately $3.4 billion, including $1.3 billion of long-term debt, $635 million of regulatory liabilities
and $562 million of deferred income taxes. The excess  of the purchase price over the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities
assumed resulted in approximately $2.7 billion of goodwill which has been recognized on NEE's consolidated balance sheet. Goodwill
associated with the Gulf Power acquisition is reflected within Corporate and Other and, for impairment testing, is included in the Gulf
Power reporting unit. The goodwill arising from the transaction represents expected benefits from continued expansion of NEE's
regulated businesses and the indefinite life of Gulf Power's service area franchise.
Merger of FPL and Gulf Power  - On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However , FPL will
continue to be regulated  as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power until the FPSC approves
consolidation of the FPL and Gulf Power rates and tariffs (see Note 1 - Rate Regulation - FPL 2021 Base Rate Proceeding). FPL and
Gulf Power will continue  to be separate operating segments of NEE as well as FPL, through 2021. See Note 16. As a result of the
merger , FPL acquired assets of approximately $6.7 billion , primarily relating to property , plant and equipment, net of approximately $4.9
billion and regulatory assets of $1.2 billion, and assumed liabilities of approximately $3.9 billion, including $1.8 billion of debt, primarily
long-term debt (see Note 13), $729 million of deferred income taxes and $566 million of regulatory liabilities. Additionally , goodwill of
approximately $2.7 billion and purchase accounting adjustments associated with the 2019 Gulf Power acquisition by NEE were
transferred to FPL from Corporate and Other . Also in connection with the merger , FPL assum ed Gulf Power's obligations under its
revolving credit facilities. The assets acquired and liabilities assumed by FPL were at carrying amounts as the merger was between
entities under common control.
Trans Bay Cable, LLC - On July 16, 2019, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  acquired the membership interests of Trans Bay Cable,
LLC (Trans Bay), which owns and operates a 53-mile, high-v oltage direc t current underwater transmission cable system in California
extending from Pittsburg to San Francisco, with utility rates set by the FERC and revenues paid by the California Independent System
Operator . The purchase price included approximately $670 million in cash consideration and the assumption of debt of approximately
$422 million.
Under the acquisition method, the purchase price was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on their fair value.
The approval by the FERC of Trans Bay’s rates, which is intended to allow Trans Bay to collect total revenues equal to Trans Bay's costs
for the development, financing, construction, operation and maintenance of Trans Bay, including  a reasonable rate of return on invested
capital, is considered a fundamental input in measuring the fair value of Trans Bay's assets and liabilities and, as such, NEE concluded
that the carrying values  of all assets and liabilit ies recoverable through rates are representative of their fair values. As a result, NEE
acquired assets of approximately $703 million, primarily relating to property , plant and equipment, and assumed liabilities of
approximately $643 million, primarily relating  to long-term debt. The excess of the purchase price over the fair value  of assets acquired
and liabilities  assumed resulted in approximately $610 million of goodwill which has been recognized on NEE's consolidated balance
sheet at December 31, 2020, of which approxim ately $572 million is expected to be deductible for tax purposes. Goodwill associated
with the Trans Bay acquisition is reflected within NEER and, for impairment testing, is included in the rate-regulated transmission
reporting unit. The goodwill arising from the transaction represents expected benefits from continued expansion of NEE's regulated
businesses.
GridLiance - On September 29, 2020, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  entered into agreements to acquire GridLiance Holdco, LP
and GridLian ce GP, LLC (GridLiance) for approximately $660 million, including the assumption of approxima tely $160 million of debt,
excluding post-closing adjustments. The agreements are subject to earn-out provisions for additional payments upon completion of
certain development projects. GridLiance owns and operates three  FERC-regulated transmission utilities with approximately 700 miles
of high-volta ge transmission lines across six states, five in the Midw est and Nevada. The acquisition is expected to close in the first half
of 2021, and is subject to, among other things, approval of the FERC and utility
92
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
commissions of certain states in which GridL iance operates. NEECH guarantees the payment obligations under the acquisition
agreements.
Other - In July 2018, NEE acquired the outstanding common shares of the entity that owns Florida City Gas (FCG), which serves
approximately 110,000  residential and commercial natural gas customers in Florida's Miami-Dade, Brevard, St. Lucie and Indian River
counties with 3,700  miles of natural gas pipeline, for approximately $530 million in cash subject to certain adjustments. Upon closing,
NEE transferred FCG to FPL.
In December 2018, NEE acquired a 100% interest in an entity that indirectly owns Oleander Power Project, an approximately 791 MW
natural gas-fired, simple-cycle combustion turbine electric generation facility located near Cocoa, Florida, and a 100% interest in an
entity that owns a 65% interest in Stanton Energy Center Unit A, an approximately 660 MW combined-cycle electric generation facility
located near Orlando, Florida for approximately $ 200 million in cash, subject to certain adjustments.
7. Property, Plant and Equipment
Property , plant and equipment consists of the following at December 31:
NEE FPL
2020 2019 2020 2019
(millions)
Electric plant in service and other property $ 105,860 $ 96,093 $ 57,749 $ 54,523 
Nuclear fuel 1,604 1,755 1,143 1,153 
Construction work in progress 10,639 9,330 4,338 3,351 
Property, plant and equipment, gross 118,103 107,178 63,230 59,027 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (26,300) (25,168) (14,297) (13,953)
Property, plant and equipment - net $ 91,803 $ 82,010 $ 48,933 $ 45,074 
FPL - At Decem ber 31, 2020, FPL's gross investment in electric plant in service and other property for the electric generation,
transmission, distribution and general facilities of FPL represented approximately 47%, 12%, 35% and 6%, respectively; the respective
amounts at December 31, 2019 were 46%, 12%, 35% and 7%. Substant ially all of FPL's properties are subject to the lien of FPL's
mortgage, which secures most debt securities issued by FPL. The weighted annual composite  depreciation and amortization rate for
FPL's electric plant in service, including capitalized software, but excluding the effects of decommissioning, dismantlement and the
depreciation adjustments discussed in the following sentence, was approximately 3.7%, 3.9% and 3.8% for 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively . In accordance with the 2016 rate agreement (see Note 1 - Rate Regulation - FPL Base Rates Effective January 2017), FPL
recorded the reversal of reserve amortization of approximately $1 million, $357 million and $541 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively . During 2020, 2019 and 2018, FPL capitalized AFUDC at a rate of 6.22%, 6.22% and 5.97%, respectively , which amounted
to approximately $ 79 million, $ 80 million and $ 114 million , respectively .
NEER  - At December 31, 2020 , wind, solar and nuclear plants represented approximately 55%, 13% and 8%, respectively , of NEER 's
depreciable electric plant in service and other property; the respective amounts at December 31, 2019 were 54%, 12% and 10%. The
estimated useful lives of NEER's plants range primarily from 30 to 35 years for wind plants, 25 to 30 years for solar plants and 23 to 47
years for nuclear plants. NEER's oil and gas production assets represented approximately 14% and 15% of NEER's  depreciable electric
plant in service and other property at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . A number of NEER's generation, regulated
transmission and pipeline facilities are encumbered by liens securing various financings. The net book value of NEER's assets serving
as collateral was approximately $11.0 billion at December 31, 2020. Interest capitalized on construction projects amounted to
approximately $ 168 million, $ 135 million and $ 94 million during 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
Jointly-Owned Electric Plants - Certain NEE subsidiarie s own undivided interest s in the jointly-owned facilities described below , and are
entitled to a proportionat e share of the output from those facilities. The subsidiaries are responsible for their share of the operating costs,
as well as providing their own financing. Accordingly , each subsidiary's proportionate share of the facilities and related revenues and
expenses is included in the appropriate balance sheet and statement of income captions. NEE' s and FPL's respective shares of direct
expenses for these facilities are included in fuel, purchased power and interchange expense, O&M expenses, depreciation and
amortization expense and taxes other than income taxes and other - net in NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of income.
93
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE's and FPL's proportionate ownership interest in jointly-owned facilities is as follows:
 December 31, 2020
 Ownership
InterestGross
InvestmentAccumulated
DepreciationConstruction
Work
in Progress
  (millions)
FPL:     
St. Lucie Unit No. 2 85 %$ 2,260 $ 999 $ 47 
Scherer Unit No. 4 76 %$ 1,300 $ 502 $ 2 
Gulf Power:
Daniel Units Nos. 1 and 2 50 %$ 718 $ 241 $ 39 
Scherer Unit No. 3 25 %$ 445 $ 168 $ 2 
NEER:     
Seabrook 88.23 %$ 1,290 $ 412 $ 53 
Wyman Station Unit No. 4 91.19 %$ 30 $ 9 $ 1 
Stanton 65 %$ 138 $ 13 $ — 
Transmission substation assets located in Seabrook, New Hampshire 88.23 %$ 114 $ 9 $ 11 
______________________
(a)Excludes nuclear fuel.
(b)Together with its joint interest owner, and subject to certain approvals from the FPSC, FPL intends to retire this unit in early 2022.
(c)NEER also owns an approximately 70% interest in Duane Arnold, a nuclear facility that ceased operations in August 2020.
8. Investments in Partnerships and Joint Ventures
Certain subs idiaries of NEE have noncontrolling interests in various partnerships and joint ventur es, essentially all of which own or are in
the process of developin g natural gas pipelines or own electric generation facilities. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, NEE's investments
in partnerships and joint ventures totaled approximately $5,728  million and $7,453  million, respectively , which are included in inves tment
in equity method invest ees on NEE's consolida ted balance sheets. NEE's interest in these partnerships and joint ventures primarily
range from approximately 31% to 57%. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the principal entities included in NEE's investments in
partnerships and joint ventures were NEP OpCo, Sabal Trail Transmission, LLC (Sabal Trail), Mountain Valley Pipeline, LLC, and Silver
State South Solar , LLC.
Summarized combined information for these principal entities is as follows:
 2020 2019
 (millions)
Net income $ 516 $ 128 
Total assets $ 22,717 $ 20,659 
Total liabilities $ 6,612 $ 6,956 
Partners'/members' equity $ 16,105 $ 13,703 
NEE's share of underlying equity in the principal entities $ 3,927 $ 3,723 
Difference between investment carrying amount and underlying equity in net assets 1,312 3,153 
NEE's investment carrying amount for the principal entities $ 5,239 $ 6,876 
______________________
(a)Reflects NEE's interest, as well as third-party interests, in NEP OpCo.
(b)Approximately $2.8 billion in 2020 and $3.0 billion in 2019 is associated with NEP OpCo; of which approximately 70% relates to goodwill and is not being amortized; the
remaining balance is being amortized primarily over a period of 20 to 28 years. The 2020 difference is net of an approximately $1.5 billion impairment charge related to
NextEra Energy Resources' investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline.
NextEra Energy Resources provides management, administrative and transportation and fuel management services to NEP and its
subsidiaries under various agreements (service  agreements). NextEra Energy Resources is also party to a cash sweep and credit
support (CSCS) agreem ent with a subsidiary of NEP. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the cash sweep amounts (due to NEP and its
subsidiaries) held in accounts belonging to NextEra Energy Resources or its subsidiaries were approximately $10 million and $12
million, respectively , and are included in accounts payable. Fee income related to the CSCS agreement and the service agreements
totaled approximately $120 million, $101 million and $94 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively ,
and is included in operat ing revenues in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Amounts due from NEP of approximately $68 million
and $53 million  are included in other receivables and $32 million  and $33 million  are included in noncurrent other assets at December
31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . Under the CSCS agreement, NEECH or NextEra Energy Resources guaranteed or provided
indemnifications, letters of credit or surety bonds totaling approximately $640 million at December 31, 2020 primarily related to
obligations on behalf of NEP's subsidiaries with maturity dates ranging from(a) (a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(b)
94
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
2021 to 2059 and included certain project perfo rmance obligations, obligations under financing and interconnection agreements and
obligations related to the sale of differential membership interests. Payment guarantees and related contracts with respect to
unconsolidated entities for which NEE or one of its subsidiaries are the guarantor are recorded on NEE’ s consolidated balance sheets at
fair value. At December  31, 2020, approximate ly $31 million related to the fair value of the credit support provided under the CSCS
agreement is recorded as noncurrent other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheet.
9. Variable Interest Entities (VIEs)
NEER  - At December 31, 2020, NEE consolidates 40 VIEs within  the NEER segment. Subsidiaries within the NEER segment are
considered the primary beneficiary of these VIEs  since they control the most significant activities of these VIEs, including operations and
maintenance, and they have the obligation to absorb expected losses of these VIEs.
NextEra Energy Resources consolidates two VIEs which own and operate natural gas electric generation facilities with the capability of
producing 1,450  MW. These  entities sell their electric output to third parties under power sales contracts with expiration dates in 2021
and 2031. The power sales contracts provide the offtaker the ability to dispatch the facilities and require the offtaker to absorb the cost of
fuel. The assets and liabilities of these VIEs were approximately $188 million and $22 million, respectively , at December 31, 2020 and
$216 million and $25 million, respectively , at December 31, 2019. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the assets of these consolidated
VIEs consisted primarily of property , plant and equipment.
Three  indirect subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources have an approximately 50% ownership interest in five entities which own and
operate solar photovoltaic (PV) facilities with the capability of producing a total of approximately 409 MW. Each of the three  subsidiaries
is cons idered a VIE since the non-managing members have no substantive rights over the managing members, and is consolidated by
NextEra Energy Resources. These five entities sell their electric output to third parties under power sales contracts with expiration dates
ranging from 2035 throu gh 2042. The five entities have third-party  debt which is secured by liens against the assets of the entities. The
debt holders  have no recourse to the general credit of NextEra Energy Resources for the repaym ent of debt. The assets and liabilities of
these VIEs were approximately $751 million and $607 million, respectively , at December 31, 2020 and $776 million and $598 million,
respectively , at December 31, 2019. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the assets and liabili ties of the VIEs consisted primarily of
property , plant and equipment and long-term debt.
NEE consolidates a NEET  VIE that is construc ting an approximately 280-mile electricity transmission line. A NEET  subsidiary is the
primary beneficiary and controls the most significant activities during the construction period, including controlling the construction
budget. NEET  is entitled to receive 50% of the profits and losses of the entity . The assets and liabilities of the VIE were approximatel y
$423 million and $68 million, respectively , at December 31, 2020, and $173 million and $29 million, respectively , at December 31, 2019.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the assets and liabilities of this VIE consisted primarily of property, plant and equipment and accounts
payable.
Beginning in the fourth quarter of 2020, NextEra Energy Resources consolidates a VIE which has a 10% direct ownership interest in
wind generation facilities and solar PV facilities (see Note 1 - Sale of Noncontrolling Ownershi p Interests) which have the capacity of
producing approximately 400 MW and 599 MW, respectively . These  entities sell their electric output under power sales contracts to third
parties with expiration dates ranging from 2025 through 2040. These entities are also cons idered a VIE because the holders of
differential membership interests in these entities do not have substantive rights over the significant activities of these entities. The
assets and liabilities of the VIE were approximately $1.6 billion and $0.4 billion, respectively , at December 31, 2020 and consisted
primarily of property , plant and equipment and accounts payable.
The other 33 NextEra Energy Reso urces VIEs that are consolidated relate to certain subsidiaries which have sold differential
membership interests in entities which own and operate wind electric generation and solar PV facilities with the capability of producing a
total of approximately 10,513  MW and 778 MW, respectively . These entities sell their electric output either under power sales contracts
to third parties with expiration dates ranging from 2024 through 2053 or in the spot market. These entities are considered VIEs because
the holders of differentia l membership interests do not have substantive rights over the signific ant activities of these entities. NextEra
Energy Resources has financing obligations with respect to these entities, including third-party debt which is secured by liens against
the generation facilities and the other assets of these entities or by pledges of NextEra Energy Resources' ownership interest in these
entities. The debt holders have no recourse to the general credit of NEER for the repayment of debt. The assets and liabilities of these
VIEs totaled  approximately $16.2 billion and $1.7 billion, respectively , at December 31, 2020. There were 26 of these consolidated VIEs
at December 31, 2019, and the assets and liabilities of those VIEs at such date totaled approximately $11.3 billion and $0.8 billion,
respectively . At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the assets and liabilities of these VIEs consisted primarily of property , plant and
equipment and accounts payable.
Other  - At Decemb er 31, 2020 and 2019, several NEE subsidiaries had investments totaling approxima tely $3,704  million ($3,124  million
at FPL) and $3,247  million ($2,717  million at FPL), respectively , which are included  in special use funds and noncurrent other assets on
NEE's consolidated balance sheets and in special use funds on FPL's consolidated balance sheets. These investments represented
primarily commingled funds and mortgage-backed securities. NEE subsidiaries, including FPL, are not the primary beneficiaries and
therefore do not consolidate any of these entities because they do not control any of the
95
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
ongoing activities of these entities, were not involved in the initial design of these entities and do not have a controlling financial interest
in these entities.
Certain subsidiaries of NEE have noncontrolling interests in entities accounted for under the equity method, including NEE's
noncontrolling interest in NEP OpCo. These entities are limited partnerships or similar entity structures in which the limited partners or
non-managing members do not have substantive rights over the significant activities of these entities, and therefore are considered
VIEs. NEE is not the primary beneficiary because  it does not have a controlling financial interest in these entities, and therefore does not
consolidate any of these entities. NEE’ s investment in these entities totaled approximately $3,932  millio n and $4,254  millio n at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . At December 31, 2020, subsidiaries of NEE had commitments to invest additional amounts
in five of the entities. Such commitments are included in the NEER amounts in the table in Note 15 - Contracts.
10. Leases
NEE has operating and finance leases primarily related to purchased power agreements, land use agreements that convey exclusive
use of the land during the arrangement for certain of its renewable energy projects and substatio ns, buildings and equipment. Operating
and finance leases primarily have fixed payme nts with expected expiration dates ranging from 2021 to 2052, with the exception of
operating leases related to three  land use agreements with an expiration date of 2106, some of which include options to extend the
leases up to 20 years and some have options to terminate at NEE's discretion. At December 31, 2020, NEE’ s ROU assets and lease
liabilities for operating leases totaled approximately $535 million and $541 million, respectively; the respective amounts at December 31,
2019 were $499 millio n and $498 millio n. At December 31, 2020, NEE’ s ROU assets and lease liabilities for finance leases totaled
approximately $128 million and $124 million, respectively; the respective amounts at December 31, 2019 were $62 million and $56
million. NEE’ s lease liabilities at December 31, 2020 and 2019 were calculated using a weighted -average incremental borrowing rate at
the lease inception of 3.81% and 3.73%, respectiv ely, for operating leases and 3.50% and 3.15%, respectiv ely, for finance leases, and a
weighted-average rema ining lease term of 33 years and 31 years, respectively , for operating leases and 25 years and 14 years ,
respectively , for finance leases. At December 31, 2020, expected lease payments over the remaining terms of the leases were
approximately $1.2 billion with no one year being material. NEE's operating lease cost for the years ended December 31, 2020 and
2019 totaled approximately $95 million and $91 million, respectively . During the year ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, NEE's ROU
assets obtained in exch ange for operating lease obligations totaled approximately $121 million and $450 million, respectively , and in
2019 primarily relate to leases acquired with the Gulf Power and Trans Bay acquisitions (see Note 6). Other operating and finance
lease-related amounts were not material to NEE's consolidated statements of income or cash flows for the periods presented.
NEE has sales-type leases primarily related to a natural gas and oil electric generation facility and certain battery storage facilities that
sell their electric output under power sales agreements to third parties which provide the custom ers the ability to dispatch the facilities.
At Decembe r 31, 2020 and 2019, NEE recorde d a net investment in sales-type leases of approximately $47 million and $50 millio n,
respectively , and losses at commencement of sales-type leases due to the variable nature of the lease payments of approximately $20
million for the year ende d December 31, 2018, which are recorded in gains on disposal of businesses/assets - net in NEE's consolidated
statements of income. At December 31, 2020, the power sales agreements have expiration dates from 2021 to 2043 and NEE expects
to receive approximately  $117 million of lease payments over the remaining terms of the power sales agreements with no one year
being material.
11. Asset Retirement Obligations
NEE's AROs  relate primarily to decommissioning obligations of FPL's and NEER's nuclear units and to obligations for the dismantlement
of certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities. For NEE's rate-regulated operations, including FPL, the accounting provisions result in
timing differences in the recognition of legal asset retirement costs for financial reporting purpos es and the method the regulator allows
for recovery  in rates. See Note 1 - Rate Regu lation and - Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other
Accrued Asset Removal Costs.
96
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
A rollforward of NEE's and FPL's AROs is as follows:
NEE FPL
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2018 $ 3,135 $ 2,147 
Liabilities incurred 100 1 
Accretion expense 172 107 
Liabilities settled (65) (1)
Revision in estimated cash flows - net 32 14 
Additions from acquisitions 132 — 
Balances, December 31, 2019 3,506 2,268 
Liabilities incurred 138 — 
Accretion expense 169 100 
Liabilities settled (53) (6)
Revision in estimated cash flows - net (594) (558)
Balances, December 31, 2020 $ 3,166 $ 1,804 
______________________
(a)Primarily reflects sales of ownership interests to subsidiaries of NEP. See Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets.
(b)Includes an increase of approximately $75 million for additional estimated ash pond closure costs at Scherer, partly offset by a decrease of approximately $71 million due
to the approval of Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 license renewals for an additional 20 years.
(c)See Note 6 for 2019 acquisitions.
(d)Includes the current portion of AROs as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 of approximately $109 million ($21 million for FPL) and $49 million (none for FPL), respectively,
which is included in other current liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
(e)Primarily reflects the effect of revised cost estimates for decommissioning FPL's nuclear units consistent with the updated nuclear decommissioning studies filed with the
FPSC in December 2020.
Restricted funds for the payment of future expe nditures to decommission NEE's and FPL's nuclear units included in special use funds
on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets are presented below (see Note 4 - Special Use Funds). Duane Arnold is being actively
decommissioned and was granted an exemptio n from the NRC, which allows for use of the funds for certain other site restoration
activities in addition to decommissioning obligations recorded as AROs.
NEE FPL
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2020 $ 7,703 $ 5,271 
Balances, December 31, 2019 $ 6,880 $ 4,697 
NEE and FPL have identified but not recognize d ARO liabilities related to the majority of their electric transmission and distribution
assets and pipelines resulting from easements over property not owned by NEE or FPL. These easements are generally perpetual and
only require retirement action upon abandonment or cessation of use of the property or facility for its specified purpose. The related ARO
liability is not estimable for such easements as NEE and FPL intend to use these properties indefinitely . In the event NEE or FPL decide
to abandon or cease the use of a particular easement, an ARO liability would be recorded at that time.
12. Employee Retirement Benefits
Employee Pension Plan and Other Benefits Plans  - NEE sponsors a qualified noncontributory defined benefit pension plan for
substantially all employees of NEE and its subsidiaries. NEE also has a supplemental executive retirement plan (SERP), which includes
a non-qualified supplemental defined benefit pension component that provides benefits to a select group of management and highly
compensated employees, and sponsors a contributory postretirement plan for other benefits for retirees of NEE and its subsidiaries
meeting certain eligibilit y requirements. The total accrued benefit cost of the SERP  and postretirement plans is approximately $323
million ($ 155 million for FPL) and $ 313 million ($ 167 million for FPL) at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively .(a)
(b) (b)
(c)
(d) (d)
(e) (e)
(d) (d)
97
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Pension Plan Assets, Benefit Obligations and Funded Status - The changes in assets, benefit obligations and the funded status of the
pension plan are as follows:
 2020 2019
 (millions)
Change in pension plan assets:   
Fair value of plan assets at January 1 $ 4,800 $ 3,806 
Actual return on plan assets 723 736 
Benefit payments (209) (235)
Acquisitions — 493 
Fair value of plan assets at December 31 $ 5,314 $ 4,800 
Change in pension benefit obligation:   
Obligation at January 1 $ 3,363 $ 2,522 
Service cost 85 80 
Interest cost 92 114 
Acquisitions — 503 
Special termination benefits 16 19 
Plan amendments 1 3 
Actuarial losses - net 259 357 
Benefit payments (209) (235)
Obligation at December 31 $ 3,607 $ 3,363 
Funded status:   
Prepaid pension benefit costs at NEE at December 31 $ 1,707 $ 1,437 
Prepaid pension benefit costs at FPL at December 31 $ 1,554 $ 1,477 
_________________________
(a)Relates to substantially funded pension obligations in connection with the acquisition of Gulf Power, see Note 6 - Gulf Power Company.
(b)Reflects enhanced early retirement programs.
(c)Primarily driven by decrease in discount rates.
(d)NEE's accumulated pension benefit obligation, which includes no assumption about future salary levels, at December 31, 2020 and 2019 was approximately $3,521
million and $3,281 million, respectively.
(e)Reflects FPL's allocated benefits under NEE's pension plan.
NEE's unrecognized amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) yet to be recognized as components of
prepaid pension benefit costs are as follows:
2020  2019
(millions)
Unrecognized prior service benefit (net of $1 and $2 tax expense, respectively) $ 2 $ 2 
Unrecognized losses (net of $24 and $37 tax benefit, respectively) (60) (108)
Total $ (58)$ (106)
NEE's unrecognized amounts included in regulatory assets yet to be recognized as components of net prepaid pension benefit costs are
as follows:
2020 2019
(millions)
Unrecognized prior service benefit $ (1)$ (2)
Unrecognized losses 163 263 
Total $ 162 $ 261 
The followin g table provides the assumptions used to determine the benefit obligation for the pension plan. These rates are used in
determining net periodic pension income in the following year .
2020 2019
Discount rate 2.53 % 3.22 %
Salary increase 4.40 % 4.40 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.83 %
_________________________
(a)The method of estimating the interest cost component of net periodic benefit costs uses a full yield curve approach by applying a specific spot rate along the yield curve.(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(a)
98
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE's investment policy for the pension plan recognizes the benefit of protecting the plan's funded status, thereby avoiding the
necessity of future emplo yer contributions. Its broad objectives are to achieve a high rate of total return with a prudent level of risk taking
while maintaining suf ficient liquidity and diversification to avoid large losses and preserve capital over the long term.
The NEE pension plan fund's current target asset allocation, which is expected to be reached over time, is 45% equity investments, 32%
fixed income investments, 13% alternative investments and 10% convertible securities. The pension fund's investment strategy
emphasizes traditional investments, broadly diversified across the global equity and fixed income markets, using a combination of
different investment styles and vehicles. The pension fund's equity and fixed income holdings consist of both directly held securities as
well as commingled investment arrangements such as common and collective trusts, pooled separate accounts, registered investment
companies and limited partnerships. The pension fund's convertible security assets are principally direct holdings of convertible
securities and include a convertible security oriented limited partnership. The pension fund's alternative investments consist primarily of
private equit y and real estate oriented investments in limited partnerships as well as absolute return oriented limited partnerships that
use a broad range of investment strategies on a global basis.
The fair value measurements of NEE's pension plan assets by fair value hierarchy level are as follows:
December 31, 2020
Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
or Liabilities
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
(millions)
Equity securities $ 2,017 $ 10 $ 3 $ 2,030 
Equity commingled vehicles — 668 — 668 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds 169 8 — 177 
Corporate debt securities — 340 — 340 
Asset-backed securities — 375 — 375 
Debt security commingled vehicles — 201 — 201 
Convertible securities 64 453 — 517 
Total investments in the fair value hierarchy $ 2,250 $ 2,055 $ 3 4,308 
Total investments measured at net asset value 1,006 
Total fair value of plan assets $ 5,314 
_____________________
(a)See Notes 3 and 4 for discussion of fair value measurement techniques and inputs.
(b)Includes foreign investments of $881 million.
(c)Includes foreign investments of $156 million.
(d)Includes foreign investments of $93 million.
(e)Includes foreign investments of $5 million.
(f)Includes foreign investments of $35 million.
(g)Includes foreign investments of $153 million.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
99
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
 December 31, 2019
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
or Liabilities
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
 (millions)
Equity securities $ 1,593 $ 9 $ 3 $ 1,605 
Equity commingled vehicles — 706 — 706 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds 95 7 — 102 
Corporate debt securities — 247 — 247 
Asset-backed securities — 416 — 416 
Debt security commingled vehicles 47 143 — 190 
Convertible securities 32 372 — 404 
Total investments in the fair value hierarchy $ 1,767 $ 1,900 $ 3 3,670 
Total investments measured at net asset value 1,130 
Total fair value of plan assets $ 4,800 
______________________
(a)See Notes 3 and 4 for discussion of fair value measurement techniques and inputs.
(b)Includes foreign investments of $741 million.
(c)Includes foreign investments of $141 million.
(d)Includes foreign investments of $76 million.
(e)Includes foreign investments of $5 million.
(f)Includes foreign investments of $20 million.
(g)Includes foreign investments of $190 million.
Expected Cash Flows - The following table provides information about benefit payments expec ted to be paid by the pension plan for
each of the following calendar years (in millions):
2021 $ 228 
2022 $ 200 
2023 $ 202 
2024 $ 204 
2025 $ 206 
2026 - 2030 $ 1,024  
Net Periodic Income - The components of net periodic income for the plans are as follows:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
 (millions)
Service cost $ 85 $ 80 $ 70 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
Interest cost 92 114 82 8 9 7 
Expected return on plan assets (321) (312) (276) — — — 
Amortization of actuarial loss 18 — — 3 —  — 
Amortization of prior service benefit (1) (1) (1) (16) (15) (15)
Special termination benefits 16 19 35 — — — 
Net periodic income at NEE $ (111)$ (100)$ (90)$ (4)$ (5)$ (7)
Net periodic income allocated to FPL $ (77)$ (71)$ (57)$ (3)$ (4)$ (6)(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
100
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Other Comprehensive Income - The components of net periodic income recognized in OCI for the pension plan are as follows:
 2020 2019 2018
 (millions)
Net gains (losses) (net of $13 tax expense, $10 tax benefit and $4 tax benefit, respectively) $ 42 $ (36)$ (13)
Amortization of unrecognized losses (net of $1 tax expense) 5 — — 
Total $ 47 $ (36)$ (13)
Regulatory Assets (Liabilities) - The component s of net periodic income recognized during the year in regulatory assets (liabilities) for
the pension plan are as follows:
 2020 2019
 (millions)
Prior service cost $ 1 $ — 
Unrecognized gains (89) (113)
Amortization of prior service cost 1 $ 1 
Amortization of unrecognized losses (12) — 
Total $ (99)$ (112)
The assumptions used to determine net periodic pension income for the pension plan are as follows:
 2020 2019 2018
Discount rate 3.22 % 4.26 % 3.59 %
Salary increase 4.40 % 4.40 % 4.10 %
Expected long-term rate of return, net of investment management fees 7.35 % 7.35 % 7.35 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.83 % 3.88 % 3.94 %
______________________
(a)In developing the expected long-term rate of return on assets assumption for its pension plan, NEE evaluated input, including other qualitative and quantitative factors,
from its actuaries and consultants, as well as information available in the marketplace. NEE considered different models, capital market return assumptions and historical
returns for a portfolio with an equity/bond asset mix similar to its pension fund. NEE also considered its pension fund's historical compounded returns.
Employee Contribution Plan - NEE offers an employee retirement saving s plan which allows eligible participants to contribute a
percentage of qualified compensation through payroll deductions. NEE makes matching contributions to participants' accounts. Defined
contribution expense pursuant to this plan was approximately $64 million, $58 million and $54 million for NEE ($37 million, $36 million
and $ 34 million for FPL) for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .(a)
101
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
13. Debt
Long-term debt consists of the following:
December 31,
2020 2019
Maturity
Date BalanceWeighted-
Average
Interest Rate BalanceWeighted-
Average
Interest Rate
(millions) (millions)
FPL:  
First mortgage bonds - fixed 2023-2049 $ 13,090 4.32 % $ 12,005 4.46 %
Pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development
revenue bonds - primarily variable 2021-2049 948 0.12 % 1,076 1.67 %
Senior unsecured notes - variable 2023-2070 1,806 0.44 % 1,236 2.18 %
Unamortized debt issuance costs and discount (168) (156)
Total long-term debt of FPL 15,676 14,161 
Less current portion of long-term debt 54 30 
Long-term debt of FPL, excluding current portion 15,622 14,131 
GULF POWER:
Senior unsecured notes - fixed 2022-2044 815 4.05 % 990 4.17 %
   Other long-term debt - primarily variable 2021-2050 759 0.70 % 709 1.93 %
Unamortized debt issuance costs and discount (14) (14)
Total long-term debt of Gulf Power 1,560 1,685 
Less current portion of long-term debt 300 175 
Long-term debt of Gulf Power, excluding current portion 1,260 1,510 
NEER:  
    NextEra Energy Resources:
   Senior secured limited-recourse long-term debt - primarily variable 2024-2049 3,325 2.33 % 3,419 3.79 %
   Other long-term debt - primarily variable 2024-2040 450 2.72 % 440 3.78 %
    NEET - long-term debt - primarily fixed 2021-2049 937 3.09 % 837 3.50 %
 Unamortized debt issuance costs and premium (65) (74)
 Total long-term debt of NEER 4,647 4,622 
 Less current portion of long-term debt 239 215 
 Long-term debt of NEER, excluding current portion 4,408 4,407 
NEECH:  
Debentures - fixed 2021-2030 11,540 2.86 % 9,550 3.05 %
Debentures - variable 2021-2022 1,225 0.80 % 1,375 3.00 %
Debentures, related to NEE's equity units - fixed 2024-2025 6,000 1.46 % 1,500 2.10 %
Junior subordinated debentures - primarily fixed 2057-2079 3,693 4.78 % 4,643 5.13 %
Japanese yen denominated long-term debt - primarily variable 2023-2030 650 1.49 % 645 3.10 %
Australian dollar denominated long-term debt - fixed 2026 385 2.20 % 351 2.59 %
Other long-term debt - fixed 2021 221 0.92 % 524 2.00 %
Other long-term debt - variable 2021 600 0.70 % 750 2.60 %
Unamortized debt issuance costs, premium and discount (115) (139)
Total long-term debt of NEECH 24,199 19,199 
Less current portion of long-term debt 3,545 1,704 
Long-term debt of NEECH, excluding current portion 20,654 17,495 
Total long-term debt $ 41,944 $ 37,543 
______________________
(a)See Note 6 - Merger of FPL and Gulf Power regarding FPL's assumption of all of Gulf Power's outstanding debt on January 1, 2021.
(b)Includes variable rate tax exempt bonds that permit individual bondholders to tender the bonds for purchase at any time prior to maturity. In the event these variable rate
tax exempt bonds are tendered for purchase, they would be remarketed by a designated remarketing agent in accordance with the related indenture. If the remarketing is
unsuccessful, FPL or Gulf Power, as the case may be, would be required to purchase the variable rate tax exempt bonds. At December 31, 2020, variable rate tax
exempt bonds totaled approximately $948 million at FPL and $426 million at Gulf Power. All variable rate tax exempt bonds tendered for purchase have been successfully
remarketed. FPL's and Gulf Power's syndicated revolving credit facilities, as the case may be, are available to support the purchase of the variable rate tax exempt
bonds. Variable interest rate is established at various intervals by the remarketing agent. Gulf Power's remaining debt is primarily variable which is based on an
underlying index plus a margin.
(c)Includes approximately $556 million of floating rate notes that permit individual noteholders to require repayment prior to maturity. FPL’s syndicated revolving credit
facilities are available to support the purchase of the senior unsecured notes.
(d)Variable rate is based on an underlying index plus a specified margin.
(e)Interest rate contracts, primarily swaps, have been entered into with respect to certain of these debt issuances. See Note 3.
(f)Excludes approximately $463 million classified as held for sale, which is included in current other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. See Note 1 - Disposal
of Businesses/Assets.
(g)Foreign currency contracts have been entered into with respect to these debt issuances. See Note 3.(a)
(b)
(c)(d)
(a)
(b)
(d)(e)
(d)(e)(f)
(e)
(e)
(d)
(e)
(d)(e)(g)
(g)
(d)
102
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
As of December 31, 2020, minimum annual maturities of long -term debt for NEE are approximately $4,138  million, $2,471  million,
$3,329  million, $3,564  million and $7,640  million for 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024 and 2025, respectively . The respective amounts for FPL are
approximately $ 54 million, $ 96 million, $ 1,765  million, $ 646 million and $ 1,700  million.
At Decembe r 31, 2020 and 2019, short-term borrowings had a weighted-average interest rate of 0.35% (0.17% for FPL) and 1.95%
(1.80% for FPL), respectively . Subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, had credit facilities with available capacity at December 31, 2020 of
approximately $11.9 billion ($3.6 billion for FPL), of which approximately $11.8 billion ($3.6 billion for FPL) relate to revolving line of
credit facilitie s and $65 million (none  for FPL) relate to letter of credit facilities. Certain of the revolving line of credit facilities provide for
the issuance of letters of credit at December 31, 2020 of up to approximately $2.0 billion ($572 million for FPL). The issuance of letters
of credit under certain revolving line of credit facilities is subject to the aggregate commitment of the relevant banks to issue letters of
credit under  the applicable facility . See Note 6 - Merger of FPL and Gulf Power regarding FPL's assumption of Gulf Power's revolving
credit facilities on January 1, 2021.
NEE has guaranteed certain payment obligations of NEECH, including most of those under NEECH's debt, including all of its
debentures and commercial paper issuances, as well as most of its payment guarantees and indemnifications. NEECH has guaranteed
certain debt and other obligations of subsidiaries within the NEER segment.
In August 2018, NEECH  completed a remarketing of approximately $700 million aggregate princi pal amount of its Series H Debentures
due September 1, 2020 (Series H Debentures) that were issued in September 2015 as components of equity units issued concurrently
by NEE (September 2015 equity units). The Series H Debentures were fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE. In connection with
the remarke ting of the Series H Debentures, the interest rate on the Series H Debentures was reset to 3.342 % per year, and interest
was payable on March 1 and September 1 of each year, commencing September 1, 2018. In connection with the settlement of the
contracts to purchase NEE common stock that were issued as components of the September 2015 equity units, in the third quarter of
2018, NEE issued approximately 6.2 million shares of common stock (24.9 million shares after giving effect to the 2020 stock split) in
exchange for $ 700 million .
In August 2019, NEECH completed a remarketing of $1.5 billion aggregate principal amount of its Series I Debentures due September 1,
2021 (Series  I Debentures) that were issued in August 2016 as components of equity units issued concurrently by NEE (August 2016
equity units) . The Series I Debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE. In connection with the remarketing of the Series
I Debenture s, the interest rate on the Series I Debentures was reset to 2.403 % per year, and interes t is payable on March 1 and
September 1 of each year, commencing September 1, 2019. In connection with the settlement of the contracts to purchase NEE
common stock that were issued as components of the August 2016 equity units, in the third quarter of 2019, NEE issued approximately
9.5 million shares of common stock ( 38.2 million shares after giving ef fect to the 2020 stock split) in exchange for $ 1.5 billion.
As a result of the 2020 stock split (and other adjustments related to the current dividend rate with respect to the 4.872 % Corporate
Units), the fixed settlement rates of NEE’ s three outstanding series of Corporate Units have been adjusted as described below . In
addition, the Corporate Units provide that the applicable market value (as described below) for each series of Corporate Units will also
be adjusted (when determined) to give effect to the 2020 stock split and certain other anti-dilution adjustments to determine the
applicable settlement rate. However , for purposes of the presentation below , corresponding adjustments were instead made to the
reference prices and the threshold appreciation prices for each series of Corporate Units to prese nt the practical effect of the antidilution
adjustments as of December 31, 2020.
In Septembe r 2019, NEE sold $1.5 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated amou nt of
$50 and consis ts of a contract to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided beneficial
ownership interest in a Series J Debenture due September 1, 2024, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH. Each stock
purchase contract requir es the holder to purchase by no later than September 1, 2022 (the final settlement date) for a price of $50 in
cash, a number of share s of NEE common stock (subject to antidilution adjustments) based on a price per share range described in the
following sentence. If purchased on the final settlement date, as of December 31, 2020, the number of shares issued per equity unit
would (subject to antidilution adjustments) range from 0.8940  shares if the applicable market value of a share of NEE common stock is
less than or equal to $55.93  (the adjuste d reference  price) to 0.7156  shares if the applicable  market value of a share is equal to or
greater than $69.91  (the adjusted threshold appreciation price), with the applicable market value to be determined using the average
closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period ending August 29, 2022. Total annual distributions on the equity units
are at the rate of 4.872 %, consisting of interest on the debentures (2.10% per year) and payments under the stock purchase contracts
(2.772 % per year). The interest rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after March 1, 2022. A holder of an equity unit may
satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debenture s that are part of its equity unit. The
undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each  Corporate Unit is pledged to NEE to
secure the holder's obligation to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchas e contract. If a successful remarketing
does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date, and a holder has not notified NEE of its intention to
settle the stock purchase  contract with cash, the debentures that are components of the Corpora te Units will be used to satisfy in full the
holders' obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The
debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
103
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
In February 2020, NEE sold $2.5 billion  of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated amount of
$50 and consis ts of a contract to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided beneficial
ownership interest in a Series K Debenture due March 1, 2025, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH. Each stock
purchase contract requires the holder to purchase by no later than March 1, 2023 (the final settle ment date) for a price of $50 in cash, a
number of shares of NEE common stock (subject to antidilution adjustments) based on a price per share range described in the
following sentence. If purchased on the final settlement date, as of December 31, 2020, the number of shares issued per equity unit
would (subject to antidilution adjustments) range from 0.7092  shares if the applicable market value of a share of NEE common stock is
less than or equal to $70.51  (the adjuste d reference  price) to 0.5672  shares if the applicable  market value of a share is equal to or
greater than $88.14  (the adjusted threshold appreciation price), with the applicable market value to be determined using the average
closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period ending February 24, 2023. Total annual distributions on the equity
units are at the rate of 5.279 %, consisting of interes t on the debentures (1.84% per year) and payments under the stock purchase
contracts (3.439 % per year). The interes t rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after September 1, 2022. A holder of an
equity unit may satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debentures that are part of its equity
unit. The undivided beneficial ownership interest  in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each Corporate Unit is pledged to NEE
to secure the holder's obligation to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purcha se contract. If a successful remarketing
does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date, and a holder has not notified NEE of its intention to
settle the stock purchase  contract with cash, the debentures that are components of the Corpora te Units will be used to satisfy in full the
holders' obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The
debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
In Septembe r 2020, NEE sold $2.0 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated amou nt of
$50 and consis ts of a contract to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided beneficial
ownership interest in a Series L Debenture due September 1, 2025, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH. Each stock
purchase contract requir es the holder to purchase by no later than September 1, 2023 (the final settlement date) for a price of $50 in
cash, a number of share s of NEE common stock (subject to antidilution adjustments) based on a price per share range described in the
following sentence. If purchased on the final settlement date, as of December 31, 2020, the number of shares issued per equity unit
would (subject to antidilution adjustments) range from 0.6764  shares if the applicable market value of a share of NEE common stock is
less than or equal to $73.93  (the adjuste d reference  price) to 0.5412  shares if the applicable  market value of a share is equal to or
greater than $92.41  (the adjusted threshold appreciation price), with the applicable market value to be determined using the average
closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period ending August 29, 2023. Total annual distributions on the equity units
are at the rate of 6.219 %, consistin g of interest on the debentures (0.509 % per year) and paymen ts under the stock purchase contracts
(5.710 % per year). The interest rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after March 1, 2023. A holder of an equity unit may
satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debenture s that are part of its equity unit. The
undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each  Corporate Unit is pledged to NEE to
secure the holder's obligation to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchas e contract. If a successful remarketing
does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date, and a holder has not notified NEE of its intention to
settle the stock purchase  contract with cash, the debentures that are components of the Corpora te Units will be used to satisfy in full the
holders' obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The
debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
Prior to the issuance of NEE’ s common stock, the stock purchase contracts, if dilutive, will be reflected in NEE’ s diluted earnings per
share calcul ations using the treasury stock method. Under this method, the number of shares of NEE common stock used in calculating
diluted earnings per share is deemed to be increased by the excess, if any, of the number of shares that would be issued upon
settlement of the stock purchase contracts over the number of shares that could be purchased  by NEE in the market, at the average
market price during the period, using the proceeds receivable upon settlement.
104
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
14. Equity
Earnings Per Share  - The reconciliation of NEE's basic and diluted earnings per share attributable to NEE is as follows:
 Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
 (millions, except per share amounts)
Numerator:
Net income attributable to NEE - basic $ 2,919 $ 3,769 $ 6,638 
Adjustment for the impact of dilutive securities at NEP — — (19)
Net income attributable to NEE - assuming dilution $ 2,919 $ 3,769 $ 6,619 
Denominator:    
Weighted-average number of common shares outstanding - basic 1,959.0 1,927.9 1,892.8 
Equity units, stock options, performance share awards and restricted stock 9.8 14.0 15.1 
Weighted-average number of common shares outstanding - assuming dilution 1,968.8 1,941.9 1,907.9 
Earnings per share attributable to NEE:   
Basic $ 1.49 $ 1.95 $ 3.51 
Assuming dilution $ 1.48 $ 1.94 $ 3.47 
______________________
(a)The 2018 adjustment is related to both the NEP Series A convertible preferred units and the NEP senior unsecured convertible notes issued in 2017 (see Potentially
Dilutive Securities at NEP below).
(b)Calculated using the treasury stock method. Performance share awards are included in diluted weighted-average number of common shares outstanding based upon
what would be issued if the end of the reporting period was the end of the term of the award.
Common shares issuable pursuant to equity units, stock options and/or performance share awards, as well as restricted stock which
were not included in the denominator above due to their antidilutive effect were approximately 27.1 million , 3.0 million  and 0.5 million  for
the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
On September 14, 2020, NEE's board of directors approved a four-for-one split of NEE common stock effective October 26, 2020.
NEE's authorized common stock increased from 800 million to 3.2 billion shares. Prior years' share and share-based data includ ed in
NEE's consolidated financial statements have been retrospectively adjusted to reflect the 2020 stock split.
Potentially Dilutive Securities at NEP - Convertible preferred units representing limited partner interests in NEP (NEP  preferred units)
and NEP senior unsec ured convertible notes, when outstanding, are potentially dilutive securities to NEE. In 2017, NEP issued
approximately $550 million of Series A NEP preferred units and $300 million of senior unsecured convertible notes. As of December 31,
2020, all of the Series A NEP preferred units and all of the senior unsecured convertible notes issued in 2017 were no longer
outstanding.
In December 2020, NEP issued $600 million principal amount of new senior unsecure d convertible notes. Holders of these notes may
convert all or a portion of the notes in accordance with the related indenture. Upon conversion , NEP will pay cash up to the principal
amount of the notes to be converted and pay or deliver , as the case may be, cash, NEP comm on units or a combination of cash and
common units, at NEP's election, in respect of the remainder , if any, of NEP's conversion obligat ion in excess of the principal amount of
the notes being converted.(a)
(b)
105
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Common Stock Dividend Restrictions  - NEE's charter does not limit the dividends that may be paid on its common stock. FPL's
mortgage securing FPL's first mortgage bonds contains provisions which, under certain condition s, restrict the payment of dividends and
other distributions to NEE. These restrictions do not currently limit FPL's ability to pay dividends to NEE.
Stock-Based Compensa tion - Net incom e for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 includes approximately $107 million,
$100 million and $82 million, respectively , of compensation costs and $21 million, $17 million and $21 million, respectively , of income tax
benefits related to stock-based compensation arrangements. Compensation cost capitalized for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018 was not material. At December 31, 2020, there were approximately $109 million of unrecognized compensation costs
related to nonvested/no nexercisable stock-based compensation arrangements. These costs are expected to be recognized over a
weighted-average period of 1.7 years.
At Decembe r 31, 2020, approximately 60 million shares of common stock were authorized for awards to officers, employees and non-
employee directors of NEE and its subsidiaries under NEE's: (a) Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan, (b) 2017 Non-
Employee Directors Stock Plan and (c) earlier equity compensation plans under which shares are reserved for issuance under existing
grants, but no additional shares are available for grant under the earlier plans. NEE satisfies restricted stock and performance share
awards by issuing new shares of its common stock or by purchasing shares of its common stock in the open market. NEE satisfies stock
option exercises by issuing new shares of its common stock. NEE generally grants most of its stock-based compensation awards in the
first quarter of each year .
Restricted Stock and Performance Share Awards - Restricted stock typica lly vests within three years  after the date of grant and is
subject to, among other things, restrictions on transferability prior to vesting. The fair value of restricted stock is measured based upon
the closing market price  of NEE common stock as of the date of grant. Performance share awar ds are typically payable at the end of a
three -year performance period if the specified performance criteria are met. The fair value for the majority of performance share awards
is estimated based upon the closing market price of NEE common stock as of the date of grant less the present value of expected
dividends, multiplied by an estimated performance multiple which is subsequently trued up based on actual performance. 
The activity in restricted stock and performance share awards for the year ended December 31, 2020 was as follows:
SharesWeighted-
Average
Grant Date
Fair Value
Per Share
Restricted Stock:
Nonvested balance, January 1, 2020 1,980,592 $ 39.93 
Granted 631,186 $ 68.25 
Vested (870,780)$ 39.58 
Forfeited (66,756)$ 49.21 
Nonvested balance, December 31, 2020 1,674,242 $ 50.26 
Performance Share Awards:   
Nonvested balance, January 1, 2020 2,680,584 $ 35.61 
Granted 1,535,436 $ 46.09 
Vested (2,081,264)$ 32.93 
Forfeited (196,148)$ 44.85 
Nonvested balance, December 31, 2020 1,938,608 $ 47.46 
The weighted-average grant date fair value per share of restricted stock granted for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 was
$46.64  and $38.92  respectively . The weighted-average grant date fair value per share of performance share awards granted for the
years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $ 34.75  and $ 31.06 , respectively .
The total fair value of restricted stock and performance share awards vested was $177 million, $125 million and $115 million for the
years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
106
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Options - Options typically vest within three years  after the date of grant and have a maximum term of ten years . The exercise price of
each option granted equals the closing market price of NEE common stock on the date of grant. The fair value of the options is
estimated on the date of the grant using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model and based on the following assumptions:
 2020 2019 2018
Expected volatility 14.63 – 16.31% 14.20 - 14.31% 14.41%
Expected dividends 2.50 – 2.72% 2.85 - 2.93% 3.05%
Expected term (years) 7.0 7.0 7.0
Risk-free rate 0.49 – 1.52% 2.24 - 2.54% 2.83%
______________________
(a)Based on historical experience.
(b)Based on historical exercise and post-vesting cancellation experience adjusted for outstanding awards.
Option activity for the year ended December 31, 2020 was as follows:
 Shares
Underlying
OptionsWeighted-
Average
Exercise
Price
Per ShareWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Term
(years)Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value
(millions)
Balance, January 1, 2020 9,666,752  $ 30.77    
Granted 1,519,712  $ 68.76    
Exercised (1,513,324 )$ 64.53    
Forfeited (54,936 )$ 59.18    
Balance, December 31, 2020 9,618,204  $ 38.32  6.2 $ 373 
Exercisable, December 31, 2020 6,382,356  $ 29.69  5.1 $ 303 
The weighted-average grant date fair value of options granted was $7.08, $5.01 and $4.51 per share for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively . The total intrinsic value of stock options exercised was approximately $71 million , $81 million  and
$35 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
Cash receiv ed from option exercises was approximately $30 million, $34 million and $18 million for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively . The tax benefits realized from options exercised were approximately $17 million, $19 million and $9
million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
Preferred Stock - NEE's charter authoriz es the issuance of 100 million  shares of serial preferred stock, $0.01 par value, none  of which
are outstanding. FPL's charter authorizes the issuance of 10,414,100  shares of preferred stock, $100 par value, 5 million shares of
subordinated preferred stock, no par value, and 5 million shares of preferred stock, no par value, none  of which are outstanding.(a)
(b)
107
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  - The components of AOCI, net of tax, are as follows:
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Net Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Cash Flow
HedgesNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Available for
Sale SecuritiesDefined Benefit
Pension and
Other Benefits
PlansNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Foreign
Currency
TranslationOther
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Related to Equity
Method Investees Total
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2017 $ (77) $ 316 $ (39) $ (69) $ (20)$ 111 
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications — (12) (14) (31) 4 (53)
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 26 1 (3) — — 24 
Net other comprehensive income (loss) 26 (11) (17) (31) 4 (29)
Impact of NEP deconsolidation 3 — — 37 18 58 
Adoption of accounting standards updates (7) (312) (9) — — (328)
Balances, December 31, 2018 (55) (7) (65) (63) 2 (188)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications — 20 (46) 22 1 (3)
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 29 (2) (3) — — 24 
Net other comprehensive income (loss) 29 18 (49) 22 1 21 
Less other comprehensive income
attributable to noncontrolling interests — — — 1 — 1 
Acquisition of Gulf Power (see Note 6) (1) — — — — (1)
Balances, December 31, 2019 (27) 11 (114) (42) 3 (169)
Other comprehensive income before
reclassifications — 12 37 13 1 63 
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 12 (3) 2 — — 11 
Net other comprehensive income 12 9 39 13 1 74 
Less other comprehensive income
attributable to noncontrolling interests — — — 7 — 7 
Impact of disposal of a business 23 — — (13) — 10 
Balances, December 31, 2020 $ 8 $ 20 $ (75) $ (49) $ 4 $ (92)
Attributable to noncontrolling interests $ — $ — $ — $ (8) $ — $ (8)
Attributable to NEE $ 8 $ 20 $ (75) $ (41) $ 4 $ (84)
————————————
(a)Reclassified to interest expense in NEE's consolidated statements of income. See Note 3 - Income Statement Impact of Derivative Instruments.
(b)Reclassified to gains on disposal of investments and other property - net in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
(c)Reclassified to other net periodic benefit income in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
(d)Reclassified and included in gain on NEP deconsolidation. See Note 1 - Basis of Presentation.
(e)Reclassified to gains on disposal of businesses/assets - net and interest expense in NEE's consolidated statements of income. See Note 3 - Income Statement Impact of
Derivative Instruments and Note 1 - Disposal of Businesses/Assets.(a) (b) (c)
(d)
(a) (b) (c)
(a) (b) (c)
(e) (e)
108
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
15. Commitments and Contingencies
Commitments  - NEE and its subsidiaries have made commitm ents in connection with a portion of their projected capital expenditures.
Capital expenditures at FPL and Gulf Power include, among other things, the cost for constructio n of additional facilities and equipment
to meet customer demand, as well as capital improvements to and maintenance of existing facilities. At NEER, capital expenditures
include, among other things, the cost, including capitalized interest, for construction and devel opment of wind and solar projects, the
procurement of nuclear fuel and the cost to maintain existing rate-regulated transmission facilities , as well as equity contributions to joint
ventures for the develop ment and construction of natural gas pipeline assets and a rate-regulated transmission facility . Also see Note 6 -
GridLiance.
At December 31, 2020,  estimated capital expenditures for 2021 through 2025  for which applicable internal approvals (and also, if
required, regulatory approvals such as FPSC approvals for FPL  and Gulf Power) have been received were as follows:
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 Total
(millions)
FPL:       
Generation:       
New $ 780 $ 880 $ 680 $ 540 $ 530 $ 3,410 
Existing 1,085 1,155 1,045 1,010 750 5,045 
Transmission and distribution 4,065 3,665 3,825 4,290 4,490 20,335 
Nuclear fuel 220 170 120 145 145 800 
General and other 740 760 810 725 780 3,815 
Total $ 6,890 $ 6,630 $ 6,480 $ 6,710 $ 6,695 $ 33,405 
Gulf Power $ 860 $ 695 $ 625 $ 685 $ 685 $ 3,550 
NEER:
Wind $ 1,770 $ 60 $ 15 $ 15 $ 5 $ 1,865 
Solar 1,565 340 185 — — 2,090 
Battery storage 355 — — — — 355 
Nuclear, including nuclear fuel 230 190 145 190 200 955 
Natural gas pipelines 285 165 — — — 450 
Rate-regulated transmission 205 25 10 15 30 285 
Other 730 125 100 75 60 1,090 
Total $ 5,140 $ 905 $ 455 $ 295 $ 295 $ 7,090 
______________________
(a)Includes AFUDC of approximately $75 million, $50 million, $25 million, $15 million and $15 million for 2021 through 2025, respectively.
(b)Includes land, generation structures, transmission interconnection and integration and licensing.
(c)Includes AFUDC of approximately $50 million, $50 million, $40 million, $55 million and $45 million for 2021 through 2025, respectively.
(d)Consists of capital expenditures for new wind projects, repowering of existing wind projects and related transmission totaling approximately 2,394 MW.
(e)Includes capital expenditures for new solar projects and related transmission totaling approximately 2,354 MW.
(f)Construction of natural gas pipelines are subject to certain conditions, including applicable regulatory approvals and in certain cases the resolution of legal challenges.
The above estimates are subject to continuing review and adjustment and actual capital expenditures may vary significantly from these
estimates.
In addition to guarantee s noted in Note 8 with regards to NEP, NEECH has guaranteed or provided indemnifications or letters of credit
related to third parties, including certain obligations of investments in joint ventures accounted  for under the equity method, totaling
approximately $288 million at December 31, 2020. These obligation s primarily related to guaranteeing the residual value of a financing
lease. Payment guarantees and related contracts with respect to unconsolidated entities for which NEE or one of its subsidiaries are the
guarantor are recorded at fair value and are included in noncurrent other liabilities on NEE’ s consolidated balance sheets. Management
believes that the exposure associated with these guarantees is not material.
Contracts  - In addition to the commitments made in connection with the estimated capital expenditures included in the table in
Commitments above, FPL has firm commitments under long-term contracts primarily for the transportation of natural gas with expiration
dates through 2042.
At Decembe r 31, 2020, NEER has entered into contracts with expiration dates ranging from late February 2021 through 2033 primarily
for the purchase of wind turbines, wind towers and solar modules and related construction and development activities, as well as for the
supply of uranium, and the conversion, enrichm ent and fabrication of nuclear fuel, and has made commitments for the construction of
natural gas pipelines and a rate-regulated transmission facility . Approximately $3.4 billion of related commitments are included in the
estimated capital expenditures table in Commitm ents above. In addition, NEER has contracts primarily for the transportation and storage
of natural gas with expiration dates ranging from late February 2021 through 2041.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
109
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The required capacity and/or minimum payments under contracts, including those discussed above at December 31, 2020, were
estimated as follows:
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 Thereafter
(millions)
FPL $ 1,030 $ 970 $ 950 $ 940 $ 890 $ 9,380 
NEER $ 3,250 $ 530 $ 210 $ 210 $ 140 $ 1,635 
_______________________
(a)Includes approximately $415 million, $415 million, $410 million, $410 million, $405 million and $6,360 million in 2021 through 2025 and thereafter, respectively, of firm
commitments related to the natural gas transportation agreements with Sabal Trail and Florida Southeast Connection, LLC. The charges associated with these
agreements are recoverable through the fuel clause and totaled approximately $386 million, $316 million and $303 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018, respectively, of which $108 million, $108 million and $95 million, respectively, were eliminated in consolidation at NEE.      
(b)Includes approximately $25 million, $70 million, $70 million, $70 million and $1,155 million for 2022 through 2025 and thereafter, respectively, of firm commitments related
to a natural gas transportation agreement with a joint venture, in which NEER has a 31.5% equity investment, that is constructing a natural gas pipeline. These firm
commitments are subject to the completion of construction of the pipeline which is currently estimated to be in 2022.
(c)Includes approximately $85 million of commitments to invest in technology investments through 2029.
(d)Includes approximately $480 million, $20 million, $20 million, $10 million, $10 million and $5 million for 2021 through 2025 and thereafter, respectively, of joint obligations
of NEECH and NEER.
Insurance  - Liability for accidents  at nuclear power plants is governed by the Price-Anderson Act, which limits the liability of nuclear
reactor owners to the amount of insurance available from both private sources and an industry retrospective payment plan. In
accordance with this Act, NEE maintains $450 million of private liability insurance per site, which is the maximum obtainable, and
participates in a second ary financial protection system, which provides up to $13.3 billion of liability insurance coverage per inciden t at
any nuclear reactor in the U.S. Under the secondary financial protection system, NEE is subjec t to retrospective assessments of up to
$1.1 billion ($550 million for FPL), plus any applicable taxes, per incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S., payable at a rate not to
exceed $164 million  ($82 million  for FPL) per incident per year. NEE and FPL are contractually entitled to recover a propo rtionate share
of such assessments from the owners of minority interests in Seabrook, Duane Arnold and St. Lucie Unit No. 2, which approximates $16
million, $ 41 million and $ 20 million, plus any applicable taxes, per incident, respectively .
NEE participates in a nuclear insurance mutual company that provides $2.75 billion of limited insuran ce coverage per occurr ence per
site for property damage, decontamination and premature decommissioning risks at its nuclear  plants and a sublimit of $1.5 billion for
non-nuclear perils, except for Duane Arnold which has a sublimit of $500 million. NEE participate s in co-insurance of 10% of the first
$400 million of losses per site per occurrence. The proceeds from such insurance, however , must first be used for reactor stabilization
and site decontamination before they can be used for plant repair . NEE also participates in an insurance program that provides limited
coverage for replacemen t power costs if a nucle ar plant is out of service for an extended period  of time because of an accident. In the
event of an accident at one of NEE's or another participating insured's nuclear plants, NEE could be assessed up to $173 million ($106
million for FPL), plus any applicable taxes, in retrospective premiums in a policy year. NEE and FPL are contractually entitled to recover
a proportionate share of such assessments from the owners of minority interests in Seabrook, Duane Arnold and St. Lucie Unit No. 2,
which approximates $ 2 million, $ 4 million and $ 4 million, plus any applicable taxes, respectively .
Due to the high cost and limited coverage available from third-party insurers, NEE does not have property insurance coverage for a
substantial portion of either its transmission and distribution property or natural gas pipeline asse ts. If either FPL's or Gulf Power's future
storm restoration costs exceed their respective storm reserve, FPL and Gulf Power may recover  their storm restoration costs, subject to
prudence review by the FPSC, through surcharges approved by the FPSC or through securitiza tion provisions pursuant to Florida law.
See Note 1 - Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
In the event of a loss, the amount of insurance available might not be adequate to cover property  damage and other expenses incurred.
Uninsured losses and other expenses, to the extent not recovered from customers in the case of FPL or Gulf Power , would be borne by
NEE and either FPL or Gulf Power , and could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's financial condition, results of
operations and liquidity .
Coronavirus Pandemic  - NEE and FPL are closely monitoring the global outbreak of the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) and are taking
steps intended to mitiga te the potential risks to NEE and FPL posed by COVID-19. NEE, including FPL, has implemented its pandemic
plan, which includes putting in place various processes and procedures to limit the impact on its business, as well as the spread of the
virus in its workforce. NEE and its subsidiaries, including FPL, have been able to access the capital markets. To date, there has been no
material impact on NEE’ s or FPL’s workforce, operations, financial performance, liquidity or on their supply chain as a result of COVID-
19; however , the ultimate severity or duration of the outbreak or its effects on the global, national  or local economy , the capital and credit
markets, or NEE’ s and FPL’s workforce, customers and suppliers are uncertain. NEE and FPL cannot predict whether COVID-19 will
have a material impact on their businesses, financial condition, liquidity or results of operations.(a)
(b)(c)(d)
110
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
16. Segment Information
The table below presents information for NEE's reportable segments, FPL, a rate-regulated utility business, and NEER, which is
comprised of competitive energy and rate-regula ted transmission businesses, as well as for Gulf Power , a rate-regulated utility business
acquired by NEE in Janu ary 2019. Corporate and Other represents other business activities and includes eliminating entries. See Note 2
for information regarding NEE's and FPL's operating revenues.
NEE's segment information is as follows:
2020
FPL Gulf Power NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 11,662 $ 1,398 $ 5,046 $ (109)$ 17,997 
Operating expenses - net $ 7,862 $ 1,081 $ 4,125 $ 166 $ 13,234 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets - net $ — $ — $ 363 $ (10)$ 353 
Interest expense $ 600 $ 41 $ 659 $ 650 $ 1,950 
Interest income $ 2 $ 2 $ 28 $ 6 $ 38 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,246 $ 281 $ 1,460 $ 65 $ 4,052 
Equity in losses of equity method investees $ — $ — $ (1,351)$ — $ (1,351)
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 610 $ 67 $ (416)$ (217)$ 44 
Net income (loss) $ 2,650 $ 238 $ (19)$ (500)$ 2,369 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 2,650 $ 238 $ 531 $ (500)$ 2,919 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and
nuclear fuel purchases $ 6,680 $ 1,012 $ 6,893 $ 25 $ 14,610 
Property, plant and equipment - net $ 48,933 $ 4,946 $ 37,842 $ 82 $ 91,803 
Total assets $ 61,610 $ 6,725 $ 55,633 $ 3,716 $ 127,684 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ — $ 5,713 $ 15 $ 5,728 
2019
FPL Gulf Power NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 12,192 $ 1,487 $ 5,639 $ (114)$ 19,204 
Operating expenses - net $ 8,895 $ 1,216 $ 4,037 $ 109 $ 14,257 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets - net $ 5 $ — $ 402 $ (1)$ 406 
Interest expense $ 594 $ 55 $ 873 $ 727 $ 2,249 
Interest income $ 5 $ 3 $ 38 $ 8 $ 54 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,524 $ 247 $ 1,387 $ 58 $ 4,216 
Equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees $ — $ — $ 67 $ (1)$ 66 
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 441 $ 42 $ 162 $ (197)$ 448 
Net income (loss) $ 2,334 $ 180 $ 1,426 $ (552)$ 3,388 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 2,334 $ 180 $ 1,807 $ (552)$ 3,769 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and
nuclear fuel purchases $ 5,755 $ 729 $ 6,505 $ 4,473 $ 17,462 
Property, plant and equipment - net $ 45,074 $ 4,763 $ 32,042 $ 131 $ 82,010 
Total assets $ 57,188 $ 5,855 $ 51,516 $ 3,132 $ 117,691 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ — $ 7,453 $ — $ 7,453 
_________________________
(a)See Note 6 - Gulf Power Company and - Merger of FPL and Gulf Power.
(b)Interest expense allocated from NEECH is based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources'
subsidiaries. Residual NEECH corporate interest expense is included in Corporate and Other.
(c)NEER includes PTCs that were recognized based on its tax sharing agreement with NEE. See Note 1 - Income Taxes.
(d)FPL's income statement line for total operating expenses - net includes gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets - net.(a) (b)
(c)
(a) (b)
(d)
(d)
(c)
111
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
2018
FPL NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 11,862 $ 4,984 $ (119)$ 16,727 
Operating expenses - net $ 8,714 $ 3,698 $ 115 $ 12,527 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets - net $ 6 $ 82 $ (8)$ 80 
Interest expense $ 541 $ 595 $ 362 $ 1,498 
Interest income $ 4 $ 40 $ 7 $ 51 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,633 $ 1,230 $ 48 $ 3,911 
Equity in earnings of equity method investees $ — $ 321 $ 37 $ 358 
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 539 $ 1,196 $ (159)$ 1,576 
Net income (loss) $ 2,171 $ 3,842 $ (237)$ 5,776 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 2,171 $ 4,704 $ (237)$ 6,638 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel purchases$ 5,135 $ 7,189 $ 680 $ 13,004 
Property, plant and equipment - net $ 41,499 $ 28,602 $ 233 $ 70,334 
Total assets $ 53,484 $ 44,509 $ 5,709 $ 103,702 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ 6,521 $ 227 $ 6,748 
_________________________
(a)Interest expense allocated from NEECH is based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources'
subsidiaries. Residual NEECH corporate interest expense is included in Corporate and Other.
(b)NEP was deconsolidated from NEER in January 2018. See Note 1 - Basis of Presentation.
(c)FPL's income statement line for total operating expenses - net includes gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets - net.
(d)NEER includes PTCs that were recognized based on its tax sharing agreement with NEE. See Note 1 - Income Taxes.(a)(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
112
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Concluded)
17. Quarterly Data (Unaudited)
NEE's previo usly reported share-based information in the following table has been retrospectively adjusted to reflect the 2020 stock
split. See Note 14 - Earnings Per Share.
March 31 June 30 September 30 December 31
2020
Earnings per share attributable to NEE - basic $ 0.21 $ 0.65 $ 0.63 $ — 
Earnings per share attributable to NEE - assuming dilution $ 0.21 $ 0.65 $ 0.62 $ — 
Dividends per share $ 0.35 $ 0.35 $ 0.35 $ 0.35 
High-low common stock sales prices $70.84 - $43.70 $65.56 - $53.26 $74.82 - $59.58 $83.34 - $69.63
2019     
Earnings per share attributable to NEE - basic $ 0.36 $ 0.64 $ 0.46 $ 0.50 
Earnings per share attributable to NEE - assuming dilution $ 0.35 $ 0.64 $ 0.45 $ 0.50 
Dividends per share $ 0.3125  $ 0.3125  $ 0.3125  $ 0.3125  
High-low common stock sales prices $48.89 - $42.17 $52.23 - $46.82 $58.36 - $50.27 $61.25 - $55.17
______________________
(a)The sum of the quarterly amounts may not equal the total for the year due to rounding and changes in weighted-average number of common shares outstanding.(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
113
Table of Contents
Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None
Item 9A.  Controls and Procedures
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
As of December 31, 2020, each of NEE and FPL had performed an evaluation, under the supe rvision and with the participation of its
management, including NEE's and FPL's chief executive officer and chief financial officer, of the effectiveness of the design and
operation of each company's disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(e)
and 15d-15(e)). Based upon that evaluation, the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer of each of NEE and FPL concluded
that the company's disclosure controls and procedures were ef fective as of December 31, 2020.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
(a) Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
See Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
(b) Attestation Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
See Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
(c) Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
NEE and FPL are continuously seeking to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of their operations and of their internal
controls. This results in refinements to processes throughout NEE and FPL. However , there has been no change in NEE's or
FPL's interna l control over financial reporting (as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f))
that occurred during NEE's and FPL's most recent fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially
affect, NEE's or FPL's internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B.  Other Information
None
114
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10.  Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this item will be included under the headings "Business of the Annua l Meeting," "Information About NextEra
Energy and Managemen t" and "Corporate Gove rnance and Board Matters" in NEE's Proxy Statement which will be filed with the SEC in
connection with the 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareholders (NEE's Proxy Statement) and is incorporated herein by reference, or is
included in Item 1. Business - Information About Our Executive Of ficers.
NEE has adopted the NextEra Energy , Inc. Code of Ethics for Senior Executive and Financial Officers (the Senior Financial Executive
Code), which  is applicable to the chief executive  officer, the chief financial officer, the chief accounting officer and other senior executive
and financial officers. The Senior Financial Executive Code is available under Corporate Governa nce in the Investor Relations section of
NEE’ s internet website at www .nexteraenergy .com. Any amendments or waivers of the Senior Financial Executive Code which are
required to be disclosed to shareholders under SEC rules will be disclosed on the NEE website at the address listed above.
Item 11.  Executive Compensation
The information required by this item will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the headings "Executive Compensation" and
"Corporate Governance and Board Matters" and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
The information required by this item relating to security ownership of certain beneficial owner s and management will be included in
NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading "Information About NextEra Energy and Management" and is incorporated herein by
reference.
Securities Authorized For Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
NEE's equity compensation plan information at December 31, 2020 is as follows:
Plan CategoryNumber of
securities to be
issued upon
exercise of
outstanding
options, warrants
and rights
(a)Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding
options, warrants
and rights
(b)Number of
securities
remaining
available for future
issuance under
equity
compensation
plans (excluding
securities reflected
in column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by security holders 15,381,534 $ 38.32 22,266,583 
Equity compensation plans not approved by security holders — — — 
Total 15,381,534 $ 38.32 22,266,583 
__________________________________
(a)All share and per share amounts reflect the 2020 stock split.
(b)Includes an aggregate of 9,618,204 outstanding options, 4,461,784 unvested performance share awards (at maximum payout), 994,272 deferred fully vested
performance shares and 265,995 deferred stock awards (including future reinvested dividends) under the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term
Incentive Plan and former LTIP, and 41,279 fully vested shares deferred by directors under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2007 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan and its
predecessor, the FPL Group, Inc. Amended and Restated Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan.
(c)Relates to outstanding options only.
(d)Includes 20,400,565 shares under the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan and 1,866,018 shares under the NextEra Energy, Inc.
2017 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan.
Item 13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
The informa tion required by this item, to the extent applicable, will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading "Corporate
Governance and Board Matters" and is incorporated herein by reference.(a)
(b) (c) (d)
115
Table of Contents
Item 14.  Principal Accounting Fees and Services
NEE - The information requir ed by this item will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading "Audit-Related Matters" and is
incorporated herein by reference.
FPL - The follow ing table presents fees billed for professional services rendered by Deloitte & Touche LLP, the member firms of Deloitte
Touche Tohmatsu, and their respective affiliates  (collectively , Deloitte & Touche) for the fiscal years ended December 31, 2020 and
2019. The amounts presented below reflect allocations from NEE for FPL's portion of the fees, as well as amounts billed directly to FPL.
 2020 2019
Audit fees $ 3,613,000  $ 3,621,000 
Audit-related fees 222,000  380,000 
Tax fees 486,000  2,097,000 
All other fees 6,000  15,000 
Total $ 4,327,000  $ 6,113,000 
______________________
(a)Audit fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for the audit of FPL's and NEE's annual consolidated financial statements for the fiscal year, the
reviews of the financial statements included in FPL's and NEE's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q during the fiscal year and the audit of the effectiveness of internal
control over financial reporting, comfort letters, and consents.
(b)Audit-related fees consist of fees billed for assurance and related services that are reasonably related to the performance of the audit or review of FPL's and NEE's
consolidated financial statements and are not reported under audit fees. These fees primarily relate to audits of subsidiary financial statements and attestation services.
(c)Tax fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for tax compliance, tax advice and tax planning. These fees primarily relate to research and development
tax credit advice and planning services.
(d)All other fees consist of fees for products and services other than the services reported under the other named categories. In 2020 and 2019, these fees relate to training.
In accordanc e with the requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, the Audit Committee Charter and the Audit Committee's pre-
approval policy for servic es provided by the independent registered public accounting firm, all services performed by Deloitte & Touche
are approved in advance by the Audit Committee, except for audits of certain trust funds where the fees are paid by the trust. Permitted
services specifically identified in an appendix to the pre-approval policy are pre-approved by the Audit Committee each year. This pre-
approval allows management to request the specified permitted services on an as-needed basis during the year, provided any such
services are reviewed with the Audit Committee at its next regularly scheduled meeting. Any permitted service for which the fee is
expected to exceed $500,000, or that involves a service not listed on the pre-approval list, must be specifically approved by the Audit
Committee prior to commencement of such service. The Audit Committee has delegated to the Chair of the committee the right to
approve audit, audit-related, tax and other services, within certain limitations, between meetings of the Audit Committee, provided any
such decision is present ed to the Audit Committee at its next regularly scheduled meeting. At each Audit Committee meeting (other than
meetings held to review earnings materials), the Audit Committee reviews a schedule of service s for which Deloitte & Touche has been
engaged since the prior Audit Committee meeting under existing pre-approvals and the estimated fees for those services. In 2020 and
2019, none of the amounts presented above represent services provided to NEE or FPL by Deloitte & Touche that were approved by the
Audit Committee after services were rendered pursuant to Rule 2-01(c)(7)(i)(C) of Regulation S-X  (which provides for a waiver of the
otherwise applicable pre-approval requirement if certain conditions are met).(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
116
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15.  Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules
Page(s)
(a) 1. Financial Statements
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 55
Attestation Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 56
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 57
NEE:
Consolidated Statements of Income 60
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 61
Consolidated Balance Sheets 62
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 63
Consolidated Statements of Equity 64
FPL:
Consolidated Statements of Income 65
Consolidated Balance Sheets 66
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 67
Consolidated Statements of Common Shareholder's Equity 68
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 69 - 113
2. Financial Statement Schedules - Schedules are omitted as not applicable or not required.
3. Exhibits (including those incorporated by reference)
Certain exhibits listed below refer to "FPL  Grou p" and "FPL  Group Capital," and were effective prior to the change of the
name FPL Group, Inc. to NextEra Energy , Inc., and of the name FPL Group Capital Inc to NextEra Energy Capital
Holdings, Inc., during 2010.
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*2(a) Stock Purchase Agreement by and among The Southern Company , 700 Universe, LLC and
NextEra Energy, Inc. dated as of May 20, 2018 (filed as Exhibit 2(a) to Form 8-K dated May
23, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x
*2(b) Stock Purch ase Agreement by and among NUI Corporation, Southern Company Gas, 700
Universe, LLC and NextEra Energy , Inc. dated as of May 20, 2018 (filed as Exhibit 2(b) to
Form 8-K dated May 23, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x
*2(c) Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of December 18, 2020, between Gulf Power
Company and Florida Power & Light Company (filed as Exhibit 2 to Form 8-K dated
December 18, 2020)x
*3(i)a Restated Articles of Incorporation of NextEra Energy , Inc. (filed as Exhibit 3(i) to Form 8-K
dated October 26, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*3(i)b Restated Articles of Incorporation of Florida Power & Light Company (filed as Exhibit 3(i)b to
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, File No. 2-27612)x
3(i)c Articles of Merger of Florida Power & Light Company and Gulf Power Company x
*3(ii)a Amended and Restated Bylaws of NextEra Energy, Inc., effective October 14, 2016 (filed as
Exhibit 3(ii)(b) to Form 8-K dated October 14, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*3(ii)b Amended and Restated Bylaws of Florida Power & Light Company , Inc., as amended through
October 17, 2008 (filed as Exhibit 3(ii)b to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2008, File No. 2-27612)x
117
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(a) Mortgage and Deed of Trust dated as of January 1, 1944, as amended, between Florida
Power & Light Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, Trustee (filed as
Exhibit B-3, File No. 2-4845; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7126; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7523;
Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7990; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-9217; Exhibit 4(a)-5, File No. 2-10093;
Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-11491; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-12900; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-
13255; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-13705; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-13925; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File
No. 2-15088 ; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-15677; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-20501; Exhibit 4(b)-1,
File No. 2-22104; Exhibi t 2(c), File No. 2-23142; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-24195; Exhibit 4(b)-1,
File No. 2-25677; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-29001; Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-30542; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-33038 ; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-37679; Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-39006; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-41312 ; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-44234; Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-46502; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-48679 ; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-49726; Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-50712; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-52826 ; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-53272; Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-54242; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-56228; Exhibits 2(c) and 2(d), File No. 2-60413;
Exhibits 2(c) and 2(d), File No. 2-65701; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-66524; Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-67239; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-69716; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-70767; Exhibit 4(b), File
No. 2-71542; Exhibit 4(b), File No. 2-73799; Exhibits 4(c), 4(d) and 4(e), File No. 2-75762;
Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-77629; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-79557; Exhibit 99(a) to Post-Ef fective
Amendment No. 5 to Form S-8, File No. 33-18669; Exhibit 99(a) to Post-Ef fective Amendment
No. 1 to Form S-3, File No. 33-46076; Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 1995, File No. 1-3545 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
1996, File No. 1-3545 ; Exhibit 4(o), File No. 333-102169 ; Exhibit 4(k) to Post-Ef fective
Amendment No. 1 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(l) to Post-Ef fective
Amendment No. 2 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(m) to Post-E ffective
Amendment No. 3 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(f) to Amendment No. 1 to
Form S-3, File No. 333-125275 ; Exhibit 4(y) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 2 to Form S-3,
File Nos. 333-116300, 333-116300-01 and 333-116300-02 ; Exhibit 4(z) to Post-Ef fective
Amendment No. 3 to Form S-3, File Nos. 333-116300, 333-116300-01 and 333-116300-02 ;
Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit
4(a) to Form 8-K dated April 17, 2007, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
January 16, 2008, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated March 17, 2009, File No.
2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated February 9, 2010 , File No. 2-27612; Exhibit 4 to Form
8-K dated December 9, 2010, File No. 2-2761 2; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated June 10,
2011, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated December 13, 2011, File No. 2-27612 ;
Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2012, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
December 20, 2012, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 5, 2013, File No. 2-
27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2014, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K
dated Septe mber 10, 2014, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated November 19,
2015, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-K dated December 31, 2017, File No. 2-
27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 10-Q dated March 31, 2018, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(j), File
No. 333-226 056, 333-226056-01 and 333-226056-02 ; Exhibit 4(k), File No. 333-226056, 333-
226056-01 and 333-226056-02 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 10-Q dated March 31, 2019, File No. 2-
27612 ; Exhibit 4(f) to Form 10-Q dated September 30, 2019, File No. 2-27612 ; and Exhibit
4(e) to Form 10-Q dated March  31, 2020, File No. 2-27612)x x
4(b) One Hundred Thirty-Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of January 1, 2021 between
Florida Power & Light Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, Trusteex x
*4(c) Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities), dated as of November 1, 2017, between Florida
Power & Light Company and The Bank of New York Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(a)
to Form 8-K dated November 6, 2017, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(d) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated June 15, 2018, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due June 15, 2068 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 15,
2018, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(e) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated November 14, 2018, creating
the Floating Rate Notes, Series due November 14, 2068 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
November 14, 2018, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(f) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated March 27, 2019, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due March 27, 2069 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated
March 27, 2019, File No. 2-27612)x x
118
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(g) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated May 7, 2019, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due May 6, 2022 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
May 7, 2019, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(h) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated March 13, 2020, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due March 13, 2070 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated March
13, 2020, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(i) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated July 31, 2020, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due July 28, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated July 31,
2020, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(j) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated August 24, 2020, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due August 24, 2070 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated August
24, 2020, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(k) Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities), dated as of June 1, 1999, between FPL Group
Capital Inc and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Trustee (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K
dated July 16, 1999, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(l) First Supplemental Indenture to Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities) dated as of
June 1, 1999, dated as of September 21, 2012, between NextEra Energy Capital Holdings,
Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Trustee (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended September 30, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(m) Guarantee Agreement, dated as of June 1, 1999, between FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor)
and The Bank of New York Mellon (as Guarantee Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K
dated July 16, 1999, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(n) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated June 10, 2011, creating
the 4.50% Debentures, Series due June 1, 2021 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated June
10, 2011, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(o) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. dated June 6, 2013, creating the
3.625% Debentures, Series due June 15, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 6,
2013, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(p) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated August 8, 2016, creating
the Series I Debentures  due September 1, 2021 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated
August 8, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(q) Letter , dated  August 8, 2019, from NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. to The Bank of New
York Mellon, as trustee, setting forth certain terms of the Series I Debentures due September
1, 2021 effective August  8, 2019 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated August 8, 2019, File
No. 1-8841)x
*4(r) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 28, 2017, creating
the 3.55% Debentures, Series due May 1, 2027 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated April 28,
2017, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(s) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 14, 2017,
creating the 2.80% Debentures, Series due January 15, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K
dated December 14, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(t) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated May 4, 2018, creating the
Floating Rate Debentures, Series due May 4, 2021 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May
4, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(u) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated August 28, 2018, creating
the Floating Rate Debentures, Series due August 28, 2021 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K
dated August 28, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(v) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capita l Holdings, Inc., dated February 27, 2019,
creating the Floating Rate Debentures, Series due February 25, 2022 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 8-K dated February 27, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(w) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 4, 2019, creating the
2.90% Debentures, Series due April 1, 2022 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated April 4,
2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(x) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 4, 2019, creating the
3.15% Debentures, Series due April 1, 2024 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated April 4,
2019, File No. 1-8841)x
119
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(y) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 4, 2019, creating the
3.25% Debentures, Series due April 1, 2026 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated April 4,
2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(z) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 4, 2019, creating the
3.50% Debentures, Series due April 1, 2029 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 8-K dated April 4,
2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(aa) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 9, 2019,
creating the Series J Debentures due September 1, 2024 (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q
dated September 30, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(bb) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated October 3, 2019, creating
the 2.75% Debentures, Series due November 1, 2029 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
October 3, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(cc) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated October 7, 2019, creating
the 1.95% Debentures, Series due September 1, 2022 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
October 7, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(dd) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capita l Holdings, Inc., dated February 21, 2020,
creating the Series K Debentures due March 1, 2025 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ee) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. dated April 6, 2020, creating the
2.75% Debentures, Series due May 1, 2025 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated April 6,
2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ff) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated May 12, 2020, creating
the 2.25% Debentures, Series due June 1, 2030  (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 12,
2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(gg) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 18, 2020,
creating the Series L Debentures due September 1, 2025  (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(hh) Indenture (For Unsecured Subordinated Debt Securities relating to Trust Securities), dated as
of March 1, 2004, amon g FPL Group Capital Inc, FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor) and The
Bank of New York Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(au) to Post-Ef fective Amendment
No. 3 to Form S-3, File Nos. 333-102173, 333-102173-01, 333-102173-02 and 333-102173-
03)x
*4(ii) Indenture (For Unsecured Subordinated Debt Securities), dated as of September 1, 2006,
among FPL Group Capital Inc, FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor) and The Bank of New York
Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File No. 1-
8841)x
*4(jj) First Supplemental Indenture to Indenture (For Unsecured Subordinated Debt Securities)
dated as of September 1, 2006, dated as of November 19, 2012, between NextEra Energy
Capital Holdings, Inc., NextEra Energy , Inc. as Guarantor , and The Bank of New York Mellon,
as Trustee (filed as Exhibit 2 to Form 8-A  dated January 16, 2013, File No. 1-33028)x
*4(kk) Officer's Certificate of FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL Group, Inc., dated September 19,
2006, creating the Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2066 (filed as
Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ll) Replacement Capital Covenant, dated Septemb er 19, 2006, by FPL Group Capital Inc and
FPL Group, Inc. relating  to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated
Debentures due 2066 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File No.
1-8841)x
*4(mm) Amendment, dated November 9, 2016, to the Replacement Capital Covenant, dated
September 19, 2006, by NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. (formerly known as FPL
Group Capit al Holdings Inc) and NextEra Energy , Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.),
relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures due
2066 (filed as Exhibit 4 (cc) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-
8841)x
*4(nn) Officer's Certificate of FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL Group, Inc., dated June 12, 2007,
creating the Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form
8-K dated June 12, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x
120
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(oo) Replacement Capital Covenant, dated June 12, 2007, by FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL
Group, Inc. relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due
2067 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated June 12, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x  
*4(pp) Amendment, dated November 9, 2016, to the Replacement Capital Covenant, dated June 12,
2007 by NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group Capital
Holdings Inc) and NextEra Energy , Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.), relating to FPL
Group Capital Inc's Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (filed as Exhibit 4(hh)
to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(qq) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc., dated
June 7, 2016, creating the Series K Junior Subordinated Debentures due June 1, 2076 (filed
as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 7, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(rr) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 29, 2017,
creating the Series L Junior Subordinated Debentures due September 29, 2057 (filed as
Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated September 29, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ss) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated November 2, 2017,
creating the Series M Junior Subordinated Debentures due December 1, 2077 (filed as
Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated November 2, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(tt) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc., dated
March 15, 2019, creating the Series N Junior Subordinated Debentures due March 1, 2079
(filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated March 15, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(uu) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc., dated
April 4, 2019, creating the Series O Junior Subordinated Debentures due May 1, 2079 (filed
as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 8-K dated April 4, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(vv) Indenture (For Securing Senior Secured Bonds, Series A), dated May 22, 2007, between FPL
Recovery Funding LLC (as Issuer) and The Bank of New York Mellon (as Trustee and
Securities Intermediary)  (filed as Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K dated May 22, 2007 and filed
June 1, 2007, File No. 333-141357) x
*4(ww) Purchase Contract Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2019, between NextEra Energy , Inc.
and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(xx) Pledge Agre ement, dated as of September 1, 2019, between NextEra Energy , Inc., Deutsche
Bank Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and Securities
Intermediary , and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit
4(d) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(yy) Purchase Contract Agreement, dated as of February 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc.
and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(zz) Pledge Agreement, dated as of February 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc., Deutsche
Bank Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and Securities
Intermediary , and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit
4(b) to From 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(aaa) Purchase Contract Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc.
and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent  (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(bbb) Pledge Agre ement, dated as of September 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc., Deutsche
Bank Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and Securities
Intermediary , and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit
4(d) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ccc) Senior Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 1998, between Gulf Power Company and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures
supplemental thereto (filed as Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K dated June 17, 1998, File No. 0-2429 ;
File No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated September 9, 2010, File No. 1-31737;  Exhibit
4.2 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2012, File No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated June
10, 2013, File No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated September 16, 2014, File No. 1-
31737 ; and Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2017, File No. 1-31737)x x
121
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
4(ddd) Twenty-Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of January 1, 2021 to the Senior Note
Indenture dated as of January 1, 1998 between Florida Power & Light Company (as
successor to Gulf Power Company) and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Successor Trusteex x
4(eee) Description of Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934x
*10(a) FPL Group, Inc. Supple mental Executive Retirement Plan, amended and restated effective
April 1, 1997 (SERP) (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
1999, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(b) FPL Group, Inc. Supple mental Executive Retirement Plan, amended and restated effective
January 1, 2005 (Restated SERP) (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 8-K dated December 12,
2008, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(c) Amendment Number 1 to the Restated SERP  changing name to NextEra Energy , Inc.
Supplemental Executive  Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2010, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(d) Appendix A1 (revised as of March 16, 2016) to the NextEra Energy , Inc. Supplemental
Executive Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(d) to Form 10-K dated December 31, 2017,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(e) Appendix A2 (revised as of October 1, 2017) to the NextEra Energy , Inc. Supplemental
Executive Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-K dated December 31, 2017,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(f) Supplement to the Resta ted SERP  relating to a special credit to certain executive officers and
other officers effective February 15, 2008 (filed  as Exhibit 10(g) to Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(g) NextEra Energy, Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.) Amended and Restated Long-T erm
Incentive Plan, most recently amended and restated on May 22, 2009 (filed as Exhibit 10(a)
to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2009, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(h) NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit
10(c) to Form 8-K dated March 16, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(i) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(j) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(d)
to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(k) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(b)
to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(l) Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(e)
to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(m) Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(n) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Award Agre ement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2011
Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 8-K dated October 13, 2011, File No.
1-8841)x x
*10(o) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(f) to
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(p) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(g)
to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(q) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(d)
to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
122
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(r) Form of FPL Group, Inc. Amended and Restat ed Long-T erm Incentive Plan Amended and
Restated Deferred Stock Award Agreement effective February 12, 2010 between FPL Group,
Inc. and James L. Robo (filed as Exhibit 10(dd) to Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(s) Form of Deferred Stock Award Agreement under NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form 8-K dated March 16,
2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(t) NextEra Energy, Inc. 2013 Executive Annual Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to Form 8-K
dated October 11, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(u) NextEra Energy, Inc. Deferred Compensation Plan effective January 1, 2005 as amended and
restated through February 11, 2016 (filed as Exhibit 10(h) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(v) FPL Group, Inc. Deferre d Compensation Plan, amended and restated effective January 1,
2003 (filed as Exhibit 10(k) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002, File No. 1-
8841)x x
*10(w) FPL Group,  Inc. Executive Long-T erm Disability Plan effective January 1, 1995 (filed as
Exhibit 10(g) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1995, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(x) FPL Group, Inc. Amend ed and Restated Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan, as amended
and restated  October 13, 2006 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2006, File No. 1-8841)x  
*10(y) FPL Group, Inc. 2007 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan (filed as Exhibit 99 to Form S-8,
File No. 333-143739)x  
*10(z) NextEra Energy , Inc. 2017 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan, as amended and restated as
of May 18, 2017 (filed as Exhibit 10 to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2017, File
No. 1-8841)x
*10(aa) NextEra Energy, Inc. Non-Employee Director Compensation Summary effective January 1,
2020 (filed as Exhibit 10(hh)  to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019, File No. 1-
8841)x
10(bb) NextEra Energy, Inc. Non-Employee Director Compensation Summary effective January 1,
2021x
*10(cc) Form of Amended and Restated Executive Retention Employment Agreement effective
December 10, 2009 between FPL Group, Inc. and each of James L. Robo  and Charles E.
Sieving (filed as Exhibit 10(nn) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File No.
1-8841)x x
*10(dd) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Eric E. Silagy
dated as of May 2, 2012 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30,
2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ee) Form of 2012 409A  Amendment to NextEra Energy , Inc. Executive Retention Employment
Agreement effective October 11, 2012 between NextEra Energy , Inc. and each of James L.
Robo , Eric E. Silag y and Charles E. Sieving (filed as Exhibit 10(ddd) to Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(f f) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Deborah H.
Caplan dated as of April 23, 2013 (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2013, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(gg) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Miguel
Arechabala dated as of January 1, 2014 (filed as Exhibit 10(bbb) to Form 10‑K for the year
ended December 31, 2013, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(hh) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and John W.
Ketchum dated as of March 4, 2016 (filed as Exhibit 10(i) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ii) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Rebecca J.
Kujawa dated as of March 1, 2019 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(jj) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Donald Moul
dated as of January 1, 2020  (filed as Exhibit 10(ss) to Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 20 19, File No, 1-8841)x x
123
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(kk) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Ronald
Reagan dated as of January 1, 2020  (filed as Exhibit 10(tt) to Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ll) NextEra Energy, Inc. Executive Severance Benefit Plan effective February 26, 2013 (filed as
Exhibit 10(eee) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(mm) Guarantee Agreement between FPL Group, Inc. and FPL Group Capital Inc, dated as of
October 14, 1998 (filed as Exhibit 10(y) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001,
File No. 1-8841)x  
*10(nn) NextEra Energy Partners , LP 2014 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10.8 to Form 8-
K dated July 1, 2014, File No. 1-36518)x
*10(oo) Form of Restricted Unit Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy Partners, LP 2014 Long-
Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10.17 to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2017, File No. 1-36518)x
21 Subsidiaries of NextEra Energy , Inc. x  
22 Guaranteed Securities x
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm x x
31(a) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of NextEra Energy , Inc. x  
31(b) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of NextEra Energy , Inc. x
31(c) Rule 13a-14 (a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Executive Officer of Florida Power & Light
Companyx
31(d) Rule 13a-14 (a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Financial Officer of Florida Power & Light
Companyx
32(a) Section 1350 Certification of NextEra Energy , Inc. x
32(b) Section 1350 Certification of Florida Power & Light Company x
101.INS XBRL  Instan ce Document - the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data
File because its XBRL  tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL  documentx x
101.SCH Inline XBRL  Schema Document x x
101.PRE Inline XBRL  Presentation Linkbase Document x x
101.CAL Inline XBRL  Calculation Linkbase Document x x
101.LAB Inline XBRL  Label Linkbase Document x x
101.DEF Inline XBRL  Definition Linkbase Document x x
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL  and contained in Exhibit 101) x x
______________________
* Incorporated herein by reference
NEE and FPL agree to furnish to the SEC upon request any instrument with respect to long-term  debt that NEE and FPL have not filed
as an exhibit pursuant to the exemption provided by Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A) of Regulation S-K.
Item 16.  Form 10-K Summary
Not applicable
124
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
NextEra Energy , Inc.
JAMES L. ROBO
James L. Robo
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer
and Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Date: February 12, 2021
Pursuant to the requirem ents of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Signature and Title as of February 12, 2021:
REBECCA J. KUJAWA  JAMES M. MAY
Rebecca J. Kujawa
Executive V ice President, Finance
and Chief Financial Of ficer
(Principal Financial Of ficer) James M. May
Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting
Officer
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
Directors:
SHERRY S. BARRATAMY B. LANE
Sherry S. Barrat  Amy B. Lane
JAMES L. CAMAREN DAVID L. PORGES
James L. Camaren  David L. Porges
KENNETH B. DUNN  RUDY E. SCHUPP
Kenneth B. Dunn  Rudy E. Schupp
NAREN K. GURSAHANEY JOHN L. SKOLDS
Naren K. Gursahaney  John L. Skolds
KIRK S. HACHIGIAN WILLIAM H. SWANSON
Kirk S. Hachigian  William H. Swanson
TONI JENNINGS LYNN M. UTTER
Toni Jennings Lynn M. Utter
DARRYL L. WILSON
Darryl L. Wilson
125
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Florida Power & Light Company
ERIC E. SILAGY
Eric E. Silagy
President and Chief Executive Of ficer and Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Date: February 12, 2021
Pursuant to the requirem ents of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Signature and Title as of February 12, 2021:
REBECCA J. KUJAWA KEITH FERGUSON
Rebecca J. Kujawa
Executive V ice President, Finance
and Chief Financial Of ficer and Director
(Principal Financial Of ficer) Keith Ferguson
Controller
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
Director:
JAMES L. ROBO
James L. Robo
Supplemental Information to be Furnished With Reports Filed Pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
by Registrants Which Have Not Registered Securities Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
No annual report, proxy statement, form of proxy or other proxy soliciting material has been sent to security holders of FPL during the
period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
126
